Table of Contents
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
☑ ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2022
OR
☐ TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from ________ to ________
Commission
File
NumberExact name of registrants as specified in their
charters, address of principal executive offices and
registrants' telephone numberIRS Employer
Identification
Number
1-8841 NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. 59-2449419
2-27612 FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY 59-0247775
700 Universe Boulevard
Juno Beach, Florida 33408
(561) 694-4000
State or other jurisdiction of incorporation or organization:  Florida
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Registrants Title of each class Trading Symbol(s)Name of each exchange
on which registered
NextEra Energy, Inc. Common Stock, $0.01 Par Value NEE New York Stock Exchange
5.279% Corporate Units NEE.PRP New York Stock Exchange
6.219% Corporate Units NEE.PRQ New York Stock Exchange
6.926% Corporate Units NEE.PRR New York Stock Exchange
Florida Power & Light Company None
Indicate by check mark if the registrants are well-known seasoned issuers, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act of 1933.
NextEra Energy, Inc.    Yes ☑  No ☐                                                                      Florida Power & Light Company    Yes ☑    No ☐
Indicate by check mark if the registrants are not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
NextEra Energy, Inc.    Yes ☐  No ☑                                                                     Florida Power & Light Company    Yes ☐     No ☑
Indicate by check mark whether the registrants (1) have filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the
preceding 12 months, and (2) have been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days.
NextEra Energy, Inc.    Yes ☑  No ☐                                                                      Florida Power & Light Company    Yes ☑    No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrants have submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S‑T
during the preceding 12 months.
NextEra Energy, Inc.    Yes ☑  No ☐                                                                      Florida Power & Light Company    Yes ☑    No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrants are a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller reporting company, or an emerging
growth company.
NextEra Energy, Inc. Large Accelerated Filer ☑ Accelerated Filer ☐ Non-Accelerated Filer ☐ Smaller Reporting Company ☐ Emerging Growth Company ☐
Florida Power & Light Company Large Accelerated Filer ☐ Accelerated Filer ☐ Non-Accelerated Filer ☑ Smaller Reporting Company ☐ Emerging Growth Company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrants have elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or revised
financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. ☐
Indicate by check mark whether each registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management’s assessment of the effectiveness of its internal control over
financial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public accounting firm that prepared or issued its audit report. ☑
Indicate by check mark whether the registrants are shell companies (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934).  Yes ☐    No ☑
Aggregate market value of the voting and non-voting common equity of NextEra Energy, Inc. held by non-affiliates at June 30, 2022 (based on the closing market price on
the Composite Tape on June 30, 2022) was $152,043,646,294.
There was no voting or non-voting common equity of Florida Power & Light Company held by non-affiliates at June 30, 2022.
Number of shares of NextEra Energy, Inc. common stock, $0.01 par value, outstanding at January 31, 2023: 1,987,495,306
Number of shares of Florida Power & Light Company common stock, without par value, outstanding at January 31, 2023, all of which were held, beneficially and of record,
by NextEra Energy, Inc.: 1,000
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
Portions of NextEra Energy, Inc.'s Proxy Statement for the 2023 Annual Meeting of Shareholders are incorporated by reference in Part III hereof.
__________________________________
This combined Form 10-K represents separate filings by NextEra Energy, Inc. and Florida Power & Light Company. Information contained herein relating to an individual
registrant is filed by that registrant on its own behalf. Florida Power & Light Company makes no representations as to the information relating to NextEra Energy, Inc.'s
other operations.
Florida Power & Light Company meets the conditions set forth in General Instruction I.(1)(a) and (b) of Form 10-K and is therefore filing this Form with the reduced
disclosure format.
Table of Contents
DEFINITIONS
Acronyms and defined terms used in the text include the following:
Term Meaning
AFUDC – equity equity component of allowance for funds used during construction
Bcf billion cubic feet
CAISO California Independent System Operator
capacity clause capacity cost recovery clause, as established by the FPSC
DOE U.S. Department of Energy
Duane Arnold Duane Arnold Energy Center
environmental clause environmental cost recovery clause, as established by the FPSC
EPA U.S. Environmental Protection Agency
ERCOT Electric Reliability Council of Texas
FERC U.S. Federal Energy Regulatory Commission
Florida Southeast Connection Florida Southeast Connection, LLC, a wholly owned NextEra Energy Resources subsidiary
FPL Florida Power & Light Company
FPSC Florida Public Service Commission
fuel clause fuel and purchased power cost recovery clause, as established by the FPSC
GAAP generally accepted accounting principles in the U.S.
ISO independent system operator
ISO-NE ISO New England Inc.
ITC investment tax credit
kW kilowatt
kWh kilowatt-hour(s)
Management's Discussion Item 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
MISO Midcontinent Independent System Operator
MMBtu One million British thermal units
mortgage mortgage and deed of trust dated as of January 1, 1944, from FPL to Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas, as supplemented
and amended
MW megawatt(s)
MWh megawatt-hour(s)
NEE NextEra Energy, Inc.
NEECH NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc.
NEER an operating segment comprised of NextEra Energy Resources and NEET
NEET NextEra Energy Transmission, LLC
NEP NextEra Energy Partners, LP
NEP OpCo NextEra Energy Operating Partners, LP
NERC North American Electric Reliability Corporation
net capacity net ownership interest in pipeline(s) capacity
net generating capacity net ownership interest in plant(s) capacity
net generation net ownership interest in plant(s) generation
Note __ Note __ to consolidated financial statements
NextEra Energy Resources NextEra Energy Resources, LLC
NRC U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission
NYISO New York Independent System Operator
O&M expenses other operations and maintenance expenses in the consolidated statements of income
OEB Ontario Energy Board
OTC over-the-counter
OTTI other than temporary impairment
PJM PJM Interconnection, LLC
PMI NextEra Energy Marketing, LLC
Point Beach Point Beach Nuclear Power Plant
PPA purchased power agreement(s)
PTC production tax credit
PUCT Public Utility Commission of Texas
regulatory ROE return on common equity as determined for regulatory purposes
RPS renewable portfolio standards
RTO regional transmission organization
Sabal Trail Sabal Trail Transmission, LLC, an entity in which a NextEra Energy Resources subsidiary has a 42.5% ownership interest
Seabrook Seabrook Station
SEC U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission
storm protection plan storm protection plan cost recovery clause, as established by the FPSC
U.S. United States of America
NEE, FPL, NEECH, NextEra Energy Resources and NEET each has subsidiaries and affiliates with names that may include NextEra Energy, FPL, NextEra Energy
Resources, NextEra Energy Transmission, NextEra, FPL Group, FPL Energy, FPLE, NEP and similar references. For convenience and simplicity, in this report the terms
NEE, FPL, NEECH, NextEra Energy Resources, NEET and NEER are sometimes used as abbreviated references to specific subsidiaries, affiliates or groups of
subsidiaries or affiliates. The precise meaning depends on the context.
2
Table of Contents
TABLE OF CONTENTS
Page No.
Definitions 2
Forward-Looking Statements 3
PART I
Item 1. Business 4
Item 1A. Risk Factors 21
Item 1B. Unresolved Staf f Comments 33
Item 2. Properties 33
Item 3. Legal Proceedings 33
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures 33
PART II
Item 5. Market for Registrants' Common Equity , Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity
Securities34
Item 6. Reserved 34
Item 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 35
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk 55
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 56
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements With Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 113
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures 113
Item 9B. Other Information 113
Item 9C. Disclosure Regarding Foreign Jurisdictions that Prevent Inspections 113
PART III
Item 10. Directors, Executive Of ficers and Corporate Governance 114
Item 11. Executive Compensation 114
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters 114
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence 114
Item 14. Principal Account ant Fees and Services 115
PART IV
Item 15. Exhibits  and Financial Statement Schedules 116
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary 124
Signatures 125
FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS
This report includes forward-looking statements  within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Any
statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, strategies, future events
or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as may result, are expected to, will continue, is
anticipated, believe, will, could, should, would, estimated, may, plan, potential, future, projection, goals, target, outlook, predict and
intend or words of simila r meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward looking. Forward-looking statements
involve estimates, assumptions and uncertainties. Accordingly , any such statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to,
and are acco mpanied by, important factors includ ed in Part I, Item 1A. Risk Factors (in addition to any assumptions and other factors
referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements) that could have a significant impact on NEE's and/or
FPL's operations and financial results, and could cause NEE's and/or FPL's actual results to differ materially from those contained or
implied in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of NEE and/or FPL in this combined Form 10-K, in presentations, on
their respective websites, in response to questions or otherwise.
Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made , and NEE and FPL undertake no
obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances, including, but not limited to, unanticipated
events, after the date on which such statement is made, unless otherwise required by law. New factors emerge from time to time and
it is not possible for management to predict all of such factors, nor can it assess the impact of each such factor on the business or
the extent to which any factor , or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained or implied
in any forward-looking statement.
3
Table of Contents
PART I
Item 1. Business
OVERVIEW
NEE is one of the largest electric power and energy infrastructure companies in North America and a leader in the renewable energy
industry . NEE has two principal businesses, FPL and NEER. FPL is the largest electric utility in the state of Florida and one of the
largest electric utilities in the U.S. FPL’s strategic focus is centered on investing in generation, transmission and distribution facilities
to deliver on its value proposition of low custome r bills, high reliability , outstanding customer service and clean energy for the benefit
of its approximately  5.8 million  customer accounts. NEER is the world's largest generator of renewable energy from the wind and
sun, as well as a world leader in battery storage. NEER’ s strategic focus is centered on the development, construction and operation
of long-term contracted assets throughout the U.S. and Canada, primarily consisting of clean  energy assets such as renewable
generation facilities and battery storage projects, and electric transmission facilities.
In January 2019, NEE acquired Gulf Power Company , a rate-regulated electric utility engaged in the generation, transmission,
distribution and sale of electric energy in northwest Florida. On January 1, 2021, FPL and Gulf Power Company merged, with FPL as
the surviving  entity . However , during 2021, FPL continued to be regulated as two separate ratemaking entities in the former service
areas of FPL and Gulf Power Company . Effective January 1, 2022, FPL became regulated as one electric ratemaking entity with new
unified rates and tariffs (see FPL – FPL Regulation – FPL Electric Rate Regulation – Base Rates – Base Rates Effective January
2022 through December 2025).
As described in more detail in the following sections, NEE seeks to create value in its two principal businesses by meeting its
customers' needs more economically and more  reliably than its competitors. NEE's strategy has resulted in profitable growth over
sustained periods at both FPL and NEER. Management seeks to grow each business (see Note 15 – Commitments) in a manner
consistent with the varying opportunities available to it; however , management believes that the diversification and balance
represented by FPL and NEER is a valuable characteristic of the enterprise and recognizes that each business contributes to NEE's
financial strength in different ways. FPL and NEER share a common platform with the objective of lowering costs and creating
efficiencies for their businesses. NEE and its subsidiaries, with employees totaling approximately 15,300 as of December 31, 2022,
continue to develop and implement enterprise-wide initiatives focused on improving productivity , process ef fectiveness and quality .
On August 16, 2022, the Inflation Reduction Act (IRA) was signed into law which, among other things, extends the period for wind
and solar tax credits and expands the tax credits to support a broader range of renewable techn ologies. See NEER – Clean Energy
and Other Operations – Clean Energy – Policy Incentives for Renewable Energy Projects. NEE believes the IRA provides long-term
visibility and supports the growth of its businesses.
As of Januar y 1, 2022, NEE's segments for finan cial reporting purposes are FPL and NEER (see Note 16). NEECH, a wholly owned
subsidiary of NEE, owns and provides funding for NEE's operating subsidiaries, other than FPL and its subsidiaries. NEP, an affiliate
of NextEra Energy Reso urces, acquires, manages and owns contracted clean energy projects with stable, long-term cash flows. See
NEER section below for further discussion of NEP . The following diagram depicts NEE's simplified ownership structure:
4
Table of Contents
FPL
FPL is a rate-regulated electric utility engaged primarily in the generation, transmission, distrib ution and sale of electric energy in
Florida. FPL is the large st electric utility in the state of Florida and one of the largest electric utilities in the U.S. At December 31,
2022, FPL had approximately 32,100 MW of net generating capacity , approximately 88,000 circuit miles of transmission and
distribution lines and 871 substations. FPL provides service to its electric customers through an integrated transmission and
distribution system that links its generation facilities to its customers. FPL also owns a retail gas business, which serves
approximately 119,000 residential and commerc ial natural gas customers in eight counties throughout southern Florida with 3,795
miles of natural gas distribution pipelines.
FPL serves more than 12 million people through approximately 5.8 million customer account s. The following map shows FPL's
service areas and plant locations as of February 17, 2023, which cover most of the east and lower west coasts of Florida and are in
nine counties throughout northwest Florida (see FPL  Sources of Generation below).

5
Table of Contents
CUSTOMERS AND REVENUE
FPL's primary source of operating revenues is from its retail customer base; it also serves a limited number of wholesale customers
within Florida. The percentage of FPL's operating revenues and customer accounts  (as of December 31, 2022)  by customer class
were as follows:
For both retail and wholesale customers, the prices (or rates) that FPL may charge are approved by regulatory bodies, by the FPSC
in the case of retail customers and by the FERC in the case of wholesale customers. In general, under U.S. and Florida law,
regulated rates are intended to cover the cost of providing service, including a reasonable rate of return on invested capital. Since
the regulator y bodies have authority to determine the relevant cost of providing service and the appropriate rate of return on capital
employed, there can be no guarantee that FPL will be able to earn any particular rate of return or recover all of its costs through
regulated rates. See FPL  Regulation below .
FPL seeks to maintain attractive rates for its customers. Since rates are largely cost-based, main taining low rates requires a strategy
focused on developing and maintaining a low-cost position, including the implementation of ideas generated from cost savings
initiatives.
FRANCHISE AGREEMENTS AND COMPETITION
FPL's service to its electric retail customers is provided primarily under franchise agreements negotiated with municipalities or
counties. During the term of a franchise agreement, which is typically 30 years, the municipality or county agrees not to form its own
utility , and FPL has the right to offer electric service to residents. At December 31, 2022, FPL held 225 franchise agreements with
various municipalities and counties in Florida with varying expiration dates through 2052. These franchise agreements cover the vast
majority of FPL's retail customer base in Florida. At December 31, 2022, FPL also provided service to customers in 11 other
municipalities and to 27 unincorporated areas within its service area without franchise agreements pursuant to the general obligation
to serve as a public utility . FPL  relies upon Florida law for access to public rights of way .
Because any customer may elect to provide their own electric services, FPL effectively must compete for an individual customer's
business. As a practical matter , few customers provide their own service at the present time since FPL's cost of service is lower than
the cost of self-generation for the vast majority of customers. Changing technology (particularly increasing efficiency of solar power
generation), tax incentives, economic conditions , regulatory changes, increasing cost-competitiveness of rooftop solar and batteries
and other factors could  alter the favorable relative cost position that FPL currently enjoys; however , FPL seeks as a matter of
strategy to ensure that it delivers superior value, in the form of comparatively low customer bills, high reliability , outstanding
customer service and clean energy .
In addition to self-generation by residential, commercial and industrial customers, FPL also faces competition from other suppliers of
electrical energy to wholesale and industrial customers and from alternative energy sources. In 2022, 2021 and 2020, operating
revenues from wholesale and industrial electric customers combined represented  approximately 7%, 6% and 5%, respectively , of
FPL's total operating revenues.
For the building of new steam and solar generati ng capacity of 75 MW or greater , the FPSC requires investor-owned electric utilities,
including FPL, to issue a request for proposal (RFP) except when the FPSC determines that an exception from the RFP process is
in the public  interest. The RFP process allows  independent power producers and others to bid to supply the new generating
capacity . If a bidder has the most cost-ef fective alternative, meets other criteria such as financial viability and demonstrates
adequate expertise and experience in building and/or operating generating capacity of the type proposed, the investor-owned
electric utility would seek to negotiate a PP A with the selected bidder and request that the FPSC approve the
6
Table of Contents
terms of the PP A and, if appropriate, provide the required authorization for the construction of the bidder's generating capacity .
FPL SOURCES OF GENERATION
At December 31, 2022, FPL's resources for serving load consisted of approximately 33,195 MW of net generating capacity , of which
32,066 MW were from FPL-owned facilities and 1,129 MW were available through PPAs. FPL owned and operated 44 units with
generating capacity of 24,236 MW that primarily use natural gas and 50 solar generation facilities with generating capacity totaling
3,611 MW. In addition, FPL owned, or had undivided interests in, and operated 4 nuclear units with net generating capacity totaling
3,502 MW (see Nuclear Operations below) and had joint ownership interests in 3 coal units located in Mississippi and Georgia it did
not operate with net generating capacity totaling 717 MW. FPL intends to retire its share of 2 of these coal units in 2024 and together
with a joint owner retire  the remaining unit in 2028. See Note 7 – Jointly-Owned Electric Plant s regarding the retirement of these
plants. FPL also develops and constructs battery storage projects, which when combined with its solar projects, serve to enhance its
ability to meet customer needs for a nearly firm generation source. At December 31, 2022, FPL had 469 MW of battery storage
capacity that delivers energy to the transmission system. FPL customer usage and operating revenues are typically higher during the
summer months, largely due to the prevalent use of air conditioning in its service area. Occasionally , unusually cold temperatures
during the winter months result in significant increases in electricity usage for short periods of time.
Through 2025, FPL plans to add new solar generation with cost recovery mechanisms through base rates, a Solar Base Rate
Adjustment (SoBRA) and SolarT ogether  (a voluntary community solar program that gives FPL electric customers an opportunity to
participate directly in the expansion of solar energy where participants pay a fixed monthly subs cription charge and receive credits
on their related monthly customer bill). FPL placed 745 MW of solar generating capacity in service in January 2023 and is currently
in the proce ss of constructing an additional 447 MW and 1,639 MW of solar generating capacity , which is expected to be placed in
service by mid-2023 and in 2024, respectively (see FPL Regulation – FPL Electric Rate Regu lation – Base Rates – Base Rates
Effective January 2022 through December 2025 below).
Fuel Sources
FPL relies upon a mix of fuel sources for its generation facilities, the ability of some of its generation facilities to operate on both
natural gas and low sulfur diesel, and on purchased power to maintain the flexibility to achieve a more economical fuel mix in order
to respond to market and industry  developments. See discussion of planned solar generation additions above.
*approximately 66% has dual fuel capability
Significant Fuel and Transportation Contracts.  At December 31, 2022, FPL had the following significant fuel and transportation
contracts in place:
•firm transpo rtation contracts with nine different transportation suppliers for natural gas pipeline capacity for an aggregate
maximum delivery quantity of 2,966,000 MMBtu/day with expiration dates through 2042  (see Note 15 – Contracts);
•several contracts for the supply of uranium and the conversion, enrichment and fabrication of nuclear fuel with expiration
dates through 2037; and
•short- and medium-term  natural gas supply contracts to provide a portion of FPL's anticipated needs for natural gas, with
the remainder of FPL's natural gas requirements being purchased in the spot market.TM
7
Table of Contents
Nuclear Operations
At December 31, 2022, FPL owned, or had undivided interests in, and operated the four nuclear units in Florida discussed below .
FPL's nuclea r units are periodically removed from service to accommodate planned refueling and maintenance outages, including
inspections, repairs and certain other modifications. Scheduled nuclear refueling outages require the unit to be removed from service
for variable lengths of time.
FacilityNet Generating
Capacity
(MW)Beginning of Next
Scheduled Refueling OutageOperating License
Expiration Date
St. Lucie Unit No. 1 981 March 2024 2036
St. Lucie Unit No. 2    840 February 2023 2043
Turkey Point Unit No. 3 837 April 2023 2032
Turkey Point Unit No. 4 844 September 2023 2033
______________________
(a)    In 2021, FPL filed an application with the NRC to renew both St. Lucie operating licenses for an additional 20 years. License renewals are pending.
(b)    Excludes 147 MW operated by FPL but owned by non-affiliates.
(c)    In 2022, FPL filed a site-specific environmental impact statement with the NRC related to the previously approved 20-year renewal application for both Turkey Point
operating licenses. Approval of the additional 20 years of operations is pending.
NRC regulat ions require  FPL to submit a plan for decontamination and decommissioning five years before the projected end of plant
operation. If the license renewals are approved by the NRC, FPL's plans provide for St. Lucie Unit No. 1 to be shut down in 2056
with decomm issioning activities to be integrated  with the dismantlement of St. Lucie Unit No. 2 commencing in 2063. If the NRC
approves an additional 20 years of operations, FPL's plans provide for the dismantlement of Turkey Point Units Nos. 3 and 4 with
decommissioning activities commencing in 2052 and 2053, respectively .
FPL's nuclear facilities use both on-site storage pools and dry storage casks to store spent nuclear fuel generated by these facilities,
which are expected to provide sufficient storage of spent nuclear fuel that is generated at these facilities through license expiration,
as well as through any pending license extensions.
FPL ENERGY MARKETING AND TRADING
FPL's Energy Marketing & Trading division (EMT) buys and sells wholesale energy commoditi es, such as natural gas, low sulfur
diesel, electricity and renewable energy credits (RECs) from certain FPL solar generation assets . EMT  procures natural gas and low
sulfur diesel  for FPL's use in power generatio n and sells excess natural gas, low sulfur diesel and electricity . EMT  also uses
derivative instruments (primarily swaps, options and forwards) to manage the physical and financial risks inherent in the purchase
and sale of fuel and electricity . Substantially all of the results of EMT's activities are passed through to customers in the fuel or
capacity clauses. See Management's Discussion – Energy Marketing and Trading and Market Risk Sensitivity and Note 3.
FPL REGULATION
FPL's operations are subject to regulation by a number of federal, state and other organization s, including, but not limited to, the
following:
•the FPSC, which has jurisdiction over retail rates, service area, issuances of securities, and planning, siting and construction of
facilities, among other things;
•the FERC, which overse es the acquisition and disposition of electric generation, transmission and other facilities, transmission
of electricity and natural gas in interstate comme rce, proposals to build and operate interstate natural gas pipelines and storage
facilities, and wholesale purchases and sales of electric energy , among other things;
•the NERC, which, through its regional entities, establishes and enforces mandatory reliability standards, subject to approval by
the FERC, to ensure the reliability of the U.S. electric transmission and generation system and to prevent major system
blackouts;
•the NRC, which has jurisdiction over the operation of nuclear power plants through the issuan ce of operating licenses, rules,
regulations and orders; and
•the EPA, which has the responsibility to maintain and enforce national standards under a variety of environmental laws, in some
cases delegating authority to state agencies. The EPA also works with industries and all levels of government, including federal
and state governments, in a wide variety of voluntary pollution prevention programs and energy conservation ef forts.(a)
(b) (a)
(c)
(c)
8
Table of Contents
FPL Electric Rate Regulation
The FPSC sets rates at a level that is intended  to allow the utility the opportunity to collect from retail customers total revenues
(revenue requirements) equal to its cost of providing service, including a reasonable rate of return on invested capital. To accomplish
this, the FPSC uses various ratemaking mechanisms, including, among other things, base rates and cost recovery clauses. Although
FPL and Gulf Power Company merged effective January 1, 2021, FPL continued to be regulated as two separate rate making
entities until January 1, 2022 when new unified  rates and tariffs became effective for the combined utility system (including the
former Gulf Power Company service area). See Base Rates Ef fective January 2022 through December 2025 below .
Base Rates . In general, the basic costs of providing electric service, other than fuel and certain other costs, are recovered through
base rates, which are designed to recover the costs of constructing, operating and maintaining the utility system. These basic costs
include O&M expenses, depreciation and taxes , as well as a return on investment in assets used and useful in providing electric
service (rate base). At the time base rates are established, the allowed rate of return on rate base approximates the FPSC's
determination of the utility's estimated weighted-average cost of capital, which includes its costs for outstanding debt and an allowed
return on common equit y. The FPSC monitors the utility's actual regulatory ROE through a surveillance report that is filed monthly
with the FPSC. The FPSC does not provide assurance that any regulatory ROE will be achieved. Base rates are determined in rate
proceedings or throu gh negotiated settlements of those proceedings. Proceedings can occur at the initiative  of the utility or upon
action by the FPSC. Existing base rates remain in ef fect until new base rates are approved by the FPSC.
Base Rates  Effective January 2022 through December 2025  – In Decem ber 2021, the FPSC issued a final order approving a
stipulation and settlement between FPL  and several intervenors in FPL's base rate proceeding (2021 rate agreement).
Key elements of the 2021 rate agreement, which is effective from January 2022 through at least December 2025, include, among
other things, the following:
•New retail base rates and charges were establis hed for the combined utility system (including the former Gulf Power Company
service area) resulting in the following increases in annualized retail base revenues:
◦$692 million beginning January 1, 2022, and
◦$560 million beginning January 1, 2023.
•In addition, FPL is eligibl e to receive, subject to conditions specified in the 2021 rate agreement, base rate increases associated
with the addition of up to 894 MW annually of new solar generation through the SoBRA  mechanism in each of 2024 and 2025,
and may carry forward any unused MW in 2024 to 2025. FPL has agreed to an installed cost cap of $1,250 per kW and will be
required to demonstrate that these proposed solar facilities are cost ef fective.
•FPL's authorized regulatory ROE was 10.60%, with a range of 9.70% to 11.70%. However , in the event the average 30-year
U.S. Treasury rate was 2.49% or greater over a consecutive six-month period, FPL was author ized to increase the regulatory
ROE to 10.80% with a range of 9.80% to 11.80%. During August 2022, this provision was triggered and effective September 1,
2022, FPL's authorized regulatory ROE and ROE  range were increased. The revised authorized regulatory ROE will have only a
minimal impact to base rates. If FPL's earned regulatory ROE falls below 9.80%, FPL may seek retail base rate relief. If the
earned regulatory ROE rises above 11.80%, any party with standing may seek a review of FPL's retail base rates.
•Subject to certain condit ions, FPL may amortize , over the term of the 2021 rate agreement, up to $1.45 billion of depreciation
reserve surplus, provided that in any year of the 2021 rate agreement FPL must amortize at least enough reserve amount to
maintain its minimum authorized regulatory ROE  and also may not amortize any reserve amount that would result in an earned
regulatory ROE in excess of its maximum authorized regulatory ROE.
•FPL is authorized to expand SolarT ogether™ by constructing an additional 1,788 MW of solar generation from 2022
through 2025, such that the total capacity of SolarT ogether™ would be 3,278 MW .
•Future storm restoration costs would be recoverable on an interim basis beginning 60 days from the filing of a cost recovery
petition, but capped at an amount that produces  a surcharge of no more than $4 for every 1,000 kWh of usage on residential
bills during the first 12 months of cost recovery . Any additional costs would be eligible for recover y in subsequent years. If storm
restoration costs exceed  $800 million in any given calendar year, FPL may request an increase to the $4 surcharge. See Note 1
– Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm Cost Recovery .
•If federal or state perma nent corporate income tax changes become effective during the term of the 2021 rate agreement, FPL
will prospectively adjust base rates after a revie w by the FPSC. As a result of the enactment of the IRA (see NEER – Clean
Energy and Other Operations – Clean Energy – Policy Incentives for Renewable Energy Projects and Note 5), FPL's customers
are expected to save approximately $400 million over the remaining term of the 2021 rate agreement which includes a $36
million one-time refund made in January 2023.
On February  8, 2023, the Florida Supreme Court heard oral argument on the appeal of the FPSC's final order regarding the 2021
rate agreem ent by Floridians Against Increased Rates, Inc. and, as a group, Florida Rising, Inc., Environmental Confederation of
Southwest Florida, Inc. and League of United Latin American Citizens of Florida. A ruling by the Florida Supreme Court is pending.
See Note 1 – Rate Regulation.
Base Rates Effective January 2017 through December 2021 – From January 2017 to December 2021, FPL operated under a base
rate agreem ent (2016 rate agreement) that provided for, among other things, a regulatory ROE of 10.55%, with a range of 9.60% to
11.60% and, subject to certain conditions, the right to reduce depreciation expense up to $1.25 billion (reserve),
9
Table of Contents
provided that in any year of the 2016 rate agreement FPL was required to amortize enough reser ve to maintain an earned regulatory
ROE within the range of 9.60% to 11.60%.
Cost Recovery Clauses . Cost recove ry clauses are designed to permit full recovery of certain costs and provide a return  on certain
assets allowed to be recovered through these clauses. Cost recovery clause costs are recovered through levelized monthly charges
per kWh or kW, depend ing on the customer's rate class. These cost recovery clause charges  are calculated annually based on
estimated costs and estimated customer usage for the following year, plus or minus true-up adjustments to reflect the estimated over
or under recovery of costs for the current and prior periods. An adjustment to the levelized charges may be approved during the
course of a year to reflect revised estimates. FPL  recovers costs from customers through the following clauses:
•Fuel – primarily fuel costs, the most significant of the cost recovery clauses in terms of operating revenues (see Note 1 – Rate
Regulation);
•Storm Protection Plan – costs associated with an FPSC-approved transmission and distribution storm protection plan, which
includes costs for hardening of overhead transmission and distribution lines, undergrounding of certain distribution lines and
vegetation management;
•Capacity – primarily certain costs associated with the acquisition of several electric generation facilities (see Note 1 – Rate
Regulation) and capacity payments related to PP As;
•Energy Conservatio n – costs associated with implementing energy conservation programs; and
•Environmental – certain costs of complying with federal, state and local environmental regulation s enacted after April 1993 and
costs associated with certain of FPL's solar facilities placed in service prior to 2016.
The FPSC has the authority to disallow recovery of costs that it considers excessive or imprudently incurred. These costs may
include, among others, fuel and O&M expense s, the cost of replacing power lost when generation units are unavailable, storm
restoration costs and costs associated with the construction or acquisition of new facilities.
FERC
The Federal Power Act grants the FERC exclusi ve ratemaking jurisdiction over wholesale sales of electricity and the transmission of
electricity and natural gas in interstate commerce. Pursuant to the Federal Power Act, electric utilities must file for FERC acceptance
and maintain tariffs and rate schedules which govern the rates, terms and conditions for the provision of FERC-jurisdictional
wholesale power and transmission services. Wholesale power sales tariffs on file at FERC may authorize sales at cost-based rates
or, where the seller lacks market power , at market-based rates. The Federal Power Act also gives the FERC authority to certify and
oversee an electric reliability organization with authority to establish and independently enforce mandatory reliability standards
applicable to all users, owners and operators of the bulk-power system. See NERC below . Electr ic utilities are subject to accounting,
record-keeping and reporting requirements administered by the FERC. The FERC also places  certain limitations on transactions
between electric utilities and their af filiates.
NERC
The NERC has been certified by the FERC as an electric reliability organization. The NERC's mandate is to ensure the reliability and
security of the North American bulk-power system through the establishment and enforcement of reliability standards approved by
FERC. The NERC's regional entities also enforce reliability standards approved by the FERC . FPL is subject to these reliability
standards and incurs costs to ensure compliance with continually heightened requirements, and can incur significant penalties for
failing to comply with them.
FPL Environmental Regulation
FPL is subject to environmental laws and regula tions as described in the NEE Environmental Matters section below . FPL expects to
seek recovery through the environmental clause for compliance costs associated with any new environmental laws and regulations.
FPL HUMAN CAPITAL
FPL had approximately 9,300  employees at Decembe r 31, 2022, with approximately 31% of these employees represented by the
International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers  (IBEW ). The collective bargaining agreements have approximately two- to three-year
terms and expire between April 2024 and January 2025.
10
Table of Contents
NEER
NEER,  comprised of NEE's competitive energy and rate-regulated transmission businesses, is a diversified clean energy business
with a strategy that emphasizes the development, construction and operation of long-term contracted assets with a focus on clean
energy . NEE reports NextEra Energy Resources and NEET , a rate-regulated transmission business, on a combined basis for
segment reporting purposes, and the combined segment is referred to as NEER. The NEER segment currently owns, develops,
constructs, manages and operates electric generation facilities in wholesale energy markets in the U.S. and Canada and also
includes assets and investments in other businesses with a clean energy focus, such as battery storage and renewable fuels. NEER,
with approximately 27,400 MW of total net generating capacity at December 31, 2022, is one of the largest wholesale generators of
electric power in the U.S., including approximately 26,890 MW of net generating capacity across 40 states and 520 MW of net
generating capacity in 4 Canadian provinces. At December 31, 2022 , NEER opera tes facilities, in which it has partial or full
ownership interests, with a total generating capacity of approximately 33,800 MW. NEER produces the majority of its electricity from
clean and renewable sources as described more fully below . In addition, NEER develops and constructs battery storage projects,
which when combined with its renewable projec ts, serve to enhance its ability to meet customer needs for a nearly firm generation
source, or as standalone  facilities. NEER is the world's largest generator of renewable energy from the wind and sun based on 2022
MWh produced on a net generation basis, as well as a world leader in battery storage. The NEER segment also owns, develops,
constructs and operates  rate-regulated transmission facilities in North America. At December 31, 2022, NEER's rate-regulated
transmission facilities and the transmission lines that connect its electric generation facilities to the electric grid are comprised of
approximately 290 substations and 3,420 circuit miles of transmission lines.
NEER also engages in energy-related commod ity marketing and trading activities, including entering into financial and physical
contracts. These contracts primarily include power and fuel commodities and their related products for the purpose of providing full
energy and capacity requirements services, primarily to distribution utilities in certain markets, and offering customized power and
fuel and related risk management services to wholesale customers, as well as to hedge the production from NEER's generation
assets that is not sold under long-term power supply agreements. In addition, NEER participates in natural gas, natural gas liquids
and oil production through operating and non-op erating ownership interests, and in pipeline infrastructure construction, management
and operations, through either wholly owned subsidiaries or noncontrolling or joint venture interests, hereafter referred to as the gas
infrastructure business. NEER also hedges the expected output from its gas infrastructure production assets to protect against price
movements.
NEP – NEP acquires, manages and owns contracted  clean energy projects with stable long-term cash flows through a limited
partner interest in NEP OpCo. NEP's projects include energy projects contributed by or acquired from NextEra Energy Resources, or
acquired from third parties, as well as ownership interests in contracted natural gas pipelines acquired from third parties. NEP from
time to time also invests  to repower or expand certain of its assets. NextEra Energy Resources' indirect limited partnership interest in
NEP OpCo based on the number of outstandi ng NEP OpCo common units was approximately 53.8% at December 31, 2022.
NextEra Energy Resourc es accounts for its ownership interest in NEP as an equity method investment with its earnings/losses from
NEP as equity in earnin gs (losses)  of equity method investees and accounts for its project sales to NEP as third-party sales in its
consolidated financial statements. See Note 1 – Basis of Presentation.  At December 31, 2022, NEP owned, or had a partial
ownership interest in, a portfolio of wind, solar and solar plus battery storage projects with energy project capacity totaling
approximately 9,345 MW and contracted natural gas pipelines, all located in the U.S. as further discussed in Clean Energy and
Other Opera tions.  NextEra Energy Resources operates essential ly all of the energy projects in NEP's portfolio and its ownership
interest in the portfolio's capacity was approximately 4,289 MW at December 31, 2022.
CLEAN ENERGY AND OTHER OPERATIONS
NEER sells products associated with its generation facilities (energy , capacity , RECs and ancillary services) in competitive markets
in regions where those facilities are located. Customer transactions may be supplied from NEER generation facilities or from
purchases in the wholesale markets, or from a combination thereof. See Markets and Competition below .
11
Table of Contents
NEER's generation and battery storage projects, natural gas pipelines and transmission facilities (including noncontrolling or joint
venture interests) at December 31, 2022 are as follows:
12
Table of Contents
Clean Energy
*Primarily natural gas
Generation Assets
NEER's portfolio of generation assets primarily consists of generation facilities with long- term power sales agreements for
substantially all of their capacity and/or energy output. Information related to contracted genera tion assets at December 31, 2022
was as follows:
•represented approximately 25,534 MW of total net generating capacity;
•weighted-average remaining contract term of the power sales agreements, including the remaining life of the PTCs
associated with repowered wind facilities, of approximately 15 years, based on forecasted contributions to earnings and
forecasted amounts of electricity produced by the repowered wind facilities; and
•several contracts for the supply of uranium and the conversion, enrichment and fabrication of nuclear fuel for all nuclear
units with expiration dates through 2033 (see Note 15 – Contracts).
13
Table of Contents
NEER's merchant generation assets primarily consist of generation facilities that do not have long-term power sales agreements to
sell their capacity and/or energy output and therefore require active marketing and hedging. Merchant generation assets at
December 31, 2022 represented approximately 1,878 MW of total net generating capacity , including 840 MW from nuclear
generation and 1,032 MW from other peak generation facilities, and are primarily located in the Northeast region of the U.S. NEER
utilizes swaps, options, futures and forwards to lock in pricing and manage the commodity price risk inherent in power sales and fuel
purchases.
NEER Generation Assets Fuel/Technology Mix
NextEra Energy Resources utilized the following mix of fuel sources for generation facilities in which it has an ownership interest:
*Primarily natural gas
Wind Facilities
•located in 22 states in the U.S. and 4 provinces in Canada;
•operated a total generating capacity of 23,380 MW at December 31, 2022;
•ownership interests in a total net generating capacity of 18,891 MW at December 31, 2022;
◦essentially all MW are from contracted wind assets located primarily throughout Texas and the West and Midwest
regions of the U.S. and Canada;
◦added appro ximately 2,850 MW of new generating capacity  and repowered wind generati ng capacity totaling 239
MW in the U.S. in 2022 and sold assets to NEP totaling approximately 431 MW (see Note  1 – Dispo sal of
Businesses/Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests ).
Solar Facilities
•located in 30 states in the U.S.;
•operated photovoltaic and solar thermal facilities with a total generating capacity of 5,407 MW at December 31, 2022;
•ownership interests in solar facilities with a total net generating capacity of 3,924 MW at December 31, 2022;
◦essentially all MW are from contracted solar facilities located primarily throughout the West and South regions of
the U.S.;
◦added appro ximately 887 MW of generating capacity in the U.S. in 2022 and sold assets to NEP and third parties
totaling approximately 338 MW (see Note 1 – Disposal of Businesses/Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling
Ownership Interests ).
Nuclear Facilities
At December 31, 2022, NextEra Energy Resources was the sole owner of the two Point Beac h nuclear units shown in the table
below and was the largest joint owner of the Seabrook nuclear facility shown in the table below . NEER's nuclear units are
periodically removed from service to accommod ate planned refueling and maintenance outages , including inspections, repairs and
certain other  modificatio ns. Scheduled nuclear refueling outages require the unit to be removed  from service for variable lengths of
time.
14
Table of Contents
Facility LocationNet Generating
Capacity
(MW)Portfolio
CategoryBeginning of Next
Scheduled
Refueling OutageOperating License
Expiration Date
Seabrook New Hampshire 1,102 Merchant April 2023 2050
Point Beach Unit No. 1 Wisconsin 595 Contracted October 2023 2030
Point Beach Unit No. 2 Wisconsin 595 Contracted March 2023 2033
______________________
(a)    Excludes 147 MW operated by NEER but owned by non-affiliates.
(b)    Includes 262 MW sold under a long-term contract.
(c)    NEER sells all of the output of Point Beach Units Nos. 1 and 2 under long-term contracts through their current operating license expiration dates.
(d)    In 2020, NEER filed an application with the NRC to renew both Point Beach operating licenses for an additional 20 years. License renewals are pending.
NEER is responsible for all nuclear unit operations and the ultimate decommissioning of the nuclear units, the cost of which is
shared on a pro-rata basis by the joint owners with respect to the Seabrook unit. NRC regulatio ns require plant owners to submit a
plan for decontamination  and decommissioning five years before the projected end of plant operation. NEER's nuclear facilities use
both on-site storage pools and dry storage casks to store spent nuclear fuel generated by these facilities, which, based on existing
regulations, are expected to provide sufficient storage of spent nuclear fuel that is generated  at these facilities through current
license expiration, as well as through any pending license extensions.
NEER also maintains an approximately 70% interest in Duane Arnold, a nuclear facility located in Iowa that ceased operations in
August 2020. NEER submitted a site-specific cost estimate and plan for decontamination and decommissioning to the NRC. All
spent nuclear fuel house d onsite is in long-term dry storage until the DOE is able to take possession. NEER estimates that the cost
of decommissioning Duane Arnold is fully funded and expects completion by approximately 2080.
Other Clean Energy
NEER's portfolio also includes assets and investments in other businesses with a clean energy  focus, such as battery storage and
renewable fuels. At Dece mber 31, 2022, NEER had net ownership interests in approximately 1,208 MW of battery storage capacity .
In October  2022, a wholly owned subsidiary of NextEra Energy Resources entered into several agreemen ts to acquire 100% of a
portfolio of renewable energy projects from the owners of Energy Power Partners Fund I, L.P. and North American Sustainable
Energy Fund, L.P. The portfolio primarily consists of 31 biogas projects, one of which is an operating renewable natural gas facility
and the others of which are primarily operating landfill gas-to-electric facilities. The acquisition is expected to close in early 2023,
subject to receipt of required regulatory approvals including approvals from the FERC. See Note 6 – RNG Acquisition.
Policy Incentives for Renewable Energy Projects
U.S. federal, state and local governments have established various incentives to support the development of renewable energy
projects. These incentives include accelerated tax depreciation, PTCs, ITCs, cash grants, tax abatements and RPS programs.
Pursuant to the U.S. federal Modified Accelerated Cost Recovery System, wind and solar genera tion facilities are depreciated for tax
purposes over a five-year period even though the useful life of such facilities is generally much longer than five years.
Owners of wind and solar facilities are eligible to claim an income tax credit (the PTC, or an ITC in lieu of the PTC) upon initially
achieving commercial operation. This incentive was created under the Energy Policy Act of 1992 and has been extended several
times for wind (the previous PTC for solar expired in 2006). The IRA expanded the PTC to include solar generation facilities and
extended the 100% PTC and the 30% ITC to wind and solar generation facilities that start construction before the later of 2034 or the
end of the calendar year following the year in which greenhouse gas emissions from U.S. electric generation are reduced by 75%
from 2022 levels. Accord ingly, owners of wind and solar generation facilities placed in service in 2022 or later are eligible to claim a
PTC (or an ITC in lieu of the PTC) upon initially achieving commercial operation. The PTC is determined based on the amount of
electricity produced by the facility during the first ten years of commercial operation. Alternatively , an ITC equal to 30% of the cost of
the facility may be claimed in lieu of the PTC. A facility must also meet certain labor requireme nts to qualify for the 100% PTC or
30% ITC rate or construction must have started on the facility before January 29, 2023. In addition, the PTC is increased by 10%
and the ITC rate is increased by 10 percentage points for facilities that satisfy certain tax credit enhancement requirements.
Retrofitted wind and solar generation facilities may qualify for a PTC or an ITC if the cost basis of the new investment is at least 80%
of the retrofitted facility’ s total fair value.
In addition, the IRA expanded the 30% ITC to include storage projects placed in service after 2022 (previously , such projects
qualified only if they were connected to and charged by a renewable generation facility that claimed the ITC) as well as renewable
natural gas facilities that are placed in service after 2022 and begin construction before 2025. The IRA created a PTC of $3/kilogram
of green (low emission) hydrogen produced at a facility after 2022 and during the first ten years  of commercial operation (or a 30%
ITC in lieu of the PTC), provided that construction of the facility begins before 2033. These credits are also subject to certain other
requirements. In addition, storage projects and hydrogen facilities claiming an ITC are eligible for a 10 percentage point increase in
the ITC rate if the facilities satisfy certain tax credit enhancement requirements. A wind or solar(a) (b)
(c) (d)
(c) (d)
15
Table of Contents
project that provides electricity to a green hydrogen facility may qualify for the PTC or ITC and the hydrogen facility may separately
qualify for its own PTC or ITC.
For taxable years begin ning after 2022, renewable energy tax credits generated during the taxable year can be transferred to an
unrelated transferee.
Other countries, including Canada, provide for incentives like feed-in-tarif fs for renewable energy projects. The feed-in-tarif fs
promote renewable energy investments by offering long-term contracts to renewable energy producers, typically based on the cost
of generation of each technology .
Other Operations
Gas Infrastructure Business – At December 31, 2022, NextEra Energy Reso urces had ownership interests in natural gas pipelines,
the most significant of which are discussed below , and in oil and gas shale formations located primarily in the Midwest and South
regions of the U.S.
Miles
of
PipelinePipeline
Location/Route OwnershipTotal
Net Capacity
(per day)In-Service
Dates
Texas Pipelines 386 South Texas 51.8% 1.92 Bcf 1960s – 2015
Sabal Trail 517 Southwestern Alabama to Central Florida 42.5% 0.43 Bcf June 2017 – May
2020
Florida Southeast Connection 169 Central Florida to South Florida 100% 0.64 Bcf June 2017
Central Penn Line 191 Northeastern Pennsylvania to Southeastern
Pennsylvania21.0% 0.39 Bcf October 2018 –
October 2021
______________________
(a)    A NEP portfolio of six natural gas pipelines, of which a third party owns a 10% interest in a 120-mile pipeline with a daily capacity of approximately 2.3 Bcf.
Approximately 1.54 Bcf per day of net capacity is contracted with firm ship-or-pay contracts that have expiration dates ranging from 2023 to 2035.
(b)    Ownership percentage based on NextEra Energy Resources limited partnership interest in NEP OpCo common units.
(c)    See Note 15 – Contracts for a discussion of transportation contracts with FPL.
(d)    NEP has an indirect equity method investment in the Central Penn Line (CPL) which represents an approximately 39% aggregate ownership interest in the CPL.
NEER also has a 32.2%  ownership interest in a 303-mile natural gas pipeline that is under constr uction in West Virginia and Virginia.
Completion of construction of the natural gas pipeline is subject to certain conditions, including applicable regulatory approvals and
the resolution of legal challenges. See Note 4 – Nonrecurring Fair Value Measurements for a discussion of impairment charges in
the first quarter of 2022  and in 2020 and Note 15 – Contracts for a discussion of a transportation contract with a NextEra Energy
Resources subsidiary .
Rate-Regulated Transmission – At December 31, 2022, certain entities within the NEER segment had ownership interests in rate-
regulated transmission facilities, the most significant of which are discussed below , which are located primarily in ERCOT , CAISO,
Southwest Power Pool (SPP), Independent Electricity System Operator (IESO) and NYISO jurisdictions.
Miles Substations Kilovolt LocationRate
Regulator OwnershipIn-Service
Dates
Lone Star 352 10 345 Texas PUCT 100% 2013
Trans Bay Cable 53 2 200 DC California FERC 100% 2010
GridLiance 685 26 69 – 230 Illinois, Kansas, Kentucky ,
Missouri, Nevada and OklahomaFERC 100% 1960 – 2021
NextBridge Infrastructure 280 - 230 Ontario, Canada OEB 50% March 2022
NEET  New York 20 2 345 New York FERC 100% December 2021 –
July-2022
______________________
(a)    Direct current
(b)    Comprised of three FERC-regulated transmission utilities; the assets of which are owned 100% except for a 26-mile transmission line and 5 substations, of which
NEET owns a 65% interest.
Customer Supply and Proprietary Power and Gas Trading – NEER provides commodities-related products to customers, engages in
energy-related commod ity marketing and trading activities and includes the operations of a retail electricity provider . Through
NextEra Energy Resources subsidiary PMI, NEER:
•manages risk associated with fluctuating commodity prices and optimizes the value of NEER's power generation and gas
infrastructure production assets through the use of swaps, options, futures and forwards;
•sells output from NEER' s plants that is not sold under long-term contracts and procures fuel for use by NEER's generation
fleet;
•provides full energy and capacity requirements to customers; and
•markets and trades energy-related commodity products, including power , fuel, renewable attribu tes and carbon offsets, as
well as marketing and trading services to customers.(a) (b)
(c)
(c)
(d)(b)
(a)
(b)(b)
16
Table of Contents
MARKETS AND COMPETITION
Electricity markets in the U.S. and Canada are regional and diverse in character . All are extensively regulated, and competition in
these markets is shape d and constrained by regulation. The nature of the products offered varies based on the specifics of
regulation in each region. Generally , in addition to the natural constraints on pricing freedom presented by competition, NEER may
also face specific constr aints in the form of price caps, or maximum allowed prices, for certain products. NEER's ability to sell the
output of its generation facilities may also be constrained by available transmission capacity , which can vary from time to time and
can have a significant impact on pricing.
The degree and nature of competition is different in wholesale markets than in retail markets. A majority of NEER's revenues are
derived from sales of energy , capacity , credits and ancillary products under long-term PPAs to customers located in wholesale
electricity markets. Wholesale power generat ion is a capital-intensive, commodity-driven business with numerous industry
participants. NEER primarily competes on the basis of price, but believes the green attributes of NEER's generation assets, its track
record of completing projects on schedule, its creditworthiness and its ability to offer and manag e reliable customized risk solutions
to wholesale customers are competitive advantages. Wholesale power generation is a regional business that is highly fragmented
relative to many other commodity industries and diverse in terms of industry structure. As such, there is a wide variation in terms of
the capabilities, resources, nature and identity of the companies NEER competes with depending on the market. In wholesale
markets, customers' needs are met through a variety of means, including long-term bilater al contracts, standardized bilateral
products such as full requirements service and customized supply and risk management services.
In general, U.S. and Canadian electricity markets encompass three classes of services: energy and related energy credits, capacity
and ancillary services. Energy services relate to the physical delivery of power; capacity servi ces relate to the availability of MW
capacity of a power generation asset; and ancillary services are other services that relate to power generation assets, such as load
regulation and spinning and non-spinning reser ves. The exact nature of these classes of services is defined in part by regional
tariffs. Not all regions have a capacity services class, and the specific definitions of ancillary services vary from region to region.
RTOs and ISOs exist throughout much of North America to coordinate generation and transmis sion across wide geographic areas
and to run markets. NEER operates in all RTO and ISO jurisdictions. At December 31, 2022, NEER also had generation facilities
with a total net generatin g capacity of approxima tely 6,581 MW that fall within reliability regions that are not under the jurisdiction of
an establish ed RTO or ISO, including 4,430 MW within the Western Electricity Coordinating Council and 2,109 MW within the SERC
Reliability Corporation. Although each RTO and ISO may have differing objectives and structures, some benefits of these entities
include regional planning, managing transmiss ion congestion, developing larger wholesale markets for energy and capacity ,
maintaining reliability and facilitating competitio n among wholesale electricity providers. NEER has operations that fall within the
following R TOs and ISOs :
17
Table of Contents
NEER comp etes in different regions to differing degrees, but in general it seeks to enter into long-term bilateral contracts for the full
output of its generation facilities. At December 31, 2022, approximately 93% of NEER's net generating capacity was committed
under long-t erm contracts. Where long-term contracts are not in effect, NEER sells the output of its facilities into daily spot markets.
In such cases, NEER will frequently enter into shorter term bilateral contracts, typically of less than three years duration, to hedge
the price risk associated with selling into a daily spot market. Such bilateral contracts, which may be hedges either for physical
delivery or for financial (pricing) offset, serve to protect a portion of the revenue that NEER expects to derive from the associated
generation facility . Contracts that serve the economic purpose of hedging some portion of the expected revenue of a generation
facility but are not recorded as hedges under GAAP  are referred to as “non-qualifying hedges” for adjusted earnings purposes. See
Management's Discussion – Overview – Adjusted Earnings.
Certain facilities within the NEER wind and solar generation portfolio produce RECs and other environmental attributes which are
typically sold along with the energy from the plants under long-term contracts, or may be sold separately from wind and solar
generation not sold under long-term contracts. The purchasing party is solely entitled to the reporting rights and ownership of the
environmental attributes.
While the majority of NEER's revenue is derived from the output of its generation facilities, NEER is also an active competitor in
several regions in the wholesale full requirements business and in providing structured and custo mized power and fuel products and
services to a variety of customers. In the full requirements service, typically , the supplier agrees to meet the customer's needs for a
full range of products for every hour of the day, at a fixed price, for a predetermined period of time, thereby assuming the risk of
fluctuations in the customer's volume requirements.
Expanded competition in a frequently chang ing regulatory environment presents both opportunities and risks for NEER.
Opportunities exist for the selective acquisition of generation assets and for the construction and operation of efficient facilities that
can sell power in comp etitive markets. NEER seeks to reduce its market risk by having a diversified portfolio by fuel type and
location, as well as by contracting for the future sale of a significant amount of the electricity output of its facilities.
18
Table of Contents
NEER REGULATION
The energy markets in which NEER operates are subject to domestic and foreign regulation, as the case may be, including local,
state and federal regulation, and other specific rules.
At Decembe r 31, 2022 , essentially all of NEER 's generation facilities  located in the U.S. have received exempt whole sale generator
status as defined under  the Public Utility Holding Company Act of 2005. Exempt wholesale generators own or operate a facility
exclusively to sell electricity to wholesale customers. They are barred from selling electricity directly to retail customers. While
projects with exempt wholesale generator status are exempt from various restrictions, each project must still comply with other
federal, state and local laws, including, but not limited to, those regarding siting, construction, operation, licensing, pollution
abatement and other environmental laws.
Additionally , most of the NEER facilities located in the U.S. are subject to FERC regulations and market rules and the NERC's
mandatory reliability standards, all of its facilities are subject to environmental laws and the EPA's environmental regulations, and its
nuclear facilities are also subject to the jurisdiction of the NRC. See FPL – FPL Regulation for additional discussion of FERC, NERC,
NRC and EPA regulation s. Rates of NEER's rate-regulated transmission businesses are set by regulatory bodies as noted in Clean
Energy and Other Operations – Other Operations – Rate-Regulated Transmission. With the exce ption of facilities located in ERCOT ,
the FERC has jurisdiction over various aspec ts of NEER's business in the U.S., including the oversight and investigation of
competitive wholesale energy markets, regulation of the transmission and sale of natural gas, and oversight of environmental
matters related to natural gas projects and major electricity policy initiatives. The PUCT  has jurisdiction, including the regulation of
rates and services, oversight of competitive markets, and enforcement of statutes and rules, over NEER facilities located in ERCOT .
Certain entities within the NEER segment and their affiliates are also subject to federal and provincial or regional regulations in
Canada related to energy operations, energy markets and environmental standards. In Canada, activities related to owning and
operating wind and solar projects and participating in wholesale and retail energy markets are regulated at the provincial level. In
Ontario, for example, electric generation facilities must be licensed by the OEB and may also be required to complete registrations
and maintain  market participant status with the IESO, in which case they must agree to be boun d by and comply with the provisions
of the market rules for the Ontario electricity market as well as the mandatory reliability standards of the NERC.
In addition, NEER is subject to environmental laws and regulations as described in the NEE Environmental Matters section below . In
order to better anticipate potential regulatory changes, NEER continues to actively evaluate and participate in regional market
redesigns of existing operating rules for the integration of renewable energy resources and for the purchase and sale of energy
commodities.
NEER HUMAN CAPITAL
NEER had approximately 5,900 employees at December 31, 2022. NEER has collective bargain ing agreements with the IBEW , the
Utility Workers Union of Amer ica and the Security Police and Fire Professionals of America, which collectively represent
approximately 8% of NEER's employees. The collective bargaining agreements have approxim ately two- to four-year terms and
expire between June 2024 and December 2025.
NEE ENVIRONMENTAL MATTERS
NEE and its subsidiaries , including FPL, are subject to environmental laws and regulations, including extensive federal, state and
local environmental statutes, rules and regulations relating to, among others, air quality , water quality and usage, waste
management, wildlife protection and historical resources, for the siting, construction and ongoing operations of their facilities. The
U.S. governm ent and certain states and regions, as well as the Government of Canada and its provinces, have taken and continue
to take certain actions, such as proposing and finalizing regulations or setting targets or goals, regarding the regulation and
reduction of greenhouse gas emissions and the increase of renewable energy generation. The environmental laws in the U.S.,
including, among others, the Endangered Species Act, the Migratory Bird Treaty Act, and the Bald and Golden Eagle Protection Act
(BGEP A), provide for the protection of numerous species, including endangered species and/or their habitats, migratory birds, bats
and eagles. In 2022, the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Services proposed new rules that would add two bat species to the endangered
species list. If such rules are enacted, certain of NEER’ s existing and new wind generation facilities would incur additional costs to
comply with the proposed regulations. The envir onmental laws in Canada, including, among others, the Species at Risk Act, provide
for the recovery of wildlif e species that are endangered or threatened and the management of species of special concern. Complying
with these environmental laws and regulations could result in, among other things, changes in the design and operation of existing
facilities and changes or delays in the location, design, construction and operation of new facilities. Failure to comply could result in
fines, penalties, criminal sanctions or injunction s. NEE's rate-regulated subsidiaries expect to seek recovery for compliance costs
associated with any new environmental laws and regulations, which recovery for FPL  would be through the environmental clause.
In April 2022, a subsidia ry of NextEra Energy Resources entered into an agreement with the U.S. Department of Justice (DOJ) to
implement an eagle management plan requiring, among other things, certain existing or in development wind sites to apply for eagle
"take" permits under the BGEP A. Under the agreement, the DOJ will not prosecute NextEra Energy Resources or its
19
Table of Contents
affiliates for any eagle fatalities that have previously occurred, or may occur , at wind facilities operated by NextEra Energy
Resources nationwide prior to the earlier of the date such facility obtains a permit or the date that is up to ten years following court
approval of the agreement, provided that the NextEra Energy Resources subsidiary remains in compliance with its commitments
under the agreement. NextEra Energy Resourc es voluntarily undertakes adaptive management practices designed to avoid and
minimize eagle impacts and continues to believe that the criminal liability provisions of these laws were intended only to apply to
hunting, poaching and other intentional activities, and do not apply to accidental collisions with wind turbines or other manufactured
items, such as airplanes, locomotives, automobiles and buildings.
WEBSITE ACCESS TO SEC FILINGS
NEE and FPL make their SEC filings, including the annual report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, current reports on
Form 8-K, and any amendments to those repor ts, available free of charge on NEE's internet website, www .nexteraenergy .com, as
soon as reasonably practicable after those documents are electronically filed with or furnishe d to the SEC. The information and
materials available on NEE's website (or any of its subsidiaries' or affiliates' websites) are not incorporated by reference into this
combined Form 10-K.
INFORMATION ABOUT OUR EXECUTIVE OFFICERS
Name Age Position Effective Date
Deborah H. Caplan 60 Executive V ice President, Human Resources and Corporate Services of NEE
Executive V ice President, Human Resources and Corporate Services of FPLApril 15, 2013
Robert Cof fey 59 Executive V ice President, Nuclear Division and Chief Nuclear Of ficer of NEE
Vice President and Chief Nuclear Of ficer of FPLJune 14, 2021
June 15, 2021
Terrell Kirk Crews II 44 Executive V ice President, Finance and Chief Financial Of ficer of NEE
Executive V ice President, Finance and Chief Financial Of ficer of FPLMarch 1, 2022
Michael H. Dunne 47 Treasurer of NEE
Treasurer of FPL
Assistant Secretary of NEEJanuary 1, 2023
John W . Ketchum 52 Chairman, President and Chief Executive Of ficer of NEE
Chairman of FPLJuly 29, 2022
February 15, 2023
Rebecca J. Kujawa 47 President and Chief Executive Of ficer of NextEra Energy Resources March 1, 2022
Mark Lemasney 47 Executive V ice President, Power Generation Division of NEE
Executive V ice President, Power Generation Division of FPLJanuary 1, 2023
James M. May 46 Vice President, Controller and Chief Accounting Of ficer of NEE March 1, 2019
Armando Pimentel, Jr . 60 President and Chief Executive Of ficer of FPL February 15, 2023
Ronald R. Reagan 54 Executive V ice President, Engineering, Construction and Integrated Supply Chain of NEE
Vice President, Engineering and Construction of FPLJanuary 1, 2020
March 1, 2019
Charles E. Sieving 50 Executive V ice President & General Counsel of NEE
Executive V ice President of FPLDecember 1, 2008
January 1, 2009
______________________
(a)Information is as of February 17, 2023. Executive officers are elected annually by, and serve at the pleasure of, their respective boards of directors. Except as noted
below, each officer has held his/her present position for five years or more and his/her employment history is continuous. Mr. Coffey served as Vice President,
Nuclear for FPL from May 2019 to June 2021 and was Regional Vice President for FPL's southern fleet from January 2018 to May 2019. Mr. Crews served as Vice
President, Business Management of NextEra Energy Resources from March 2019 to February 2022 and was Vice President, Controller and Chief Accounting Officer
of NEE from September 2016 until March 2019. Mr. Dunne served as Vice President Finance of NEE from April 2022 to December 2022. He was previously
Managing Director, Global Energy & Power Investment Banking for Bank of America from January 2012 to March 2022. Mr. Ketchum served as President and Chief
Executive Officer of NEE from March 2022 to July 2022. He previously served as President and Chief Executive Officer of NextEra Energy Resources from March
2019 to February 2022 and Executive Vice President, Finance and Chief Financial Officer of NEE and FPL from March 2016 to February 2019. Ms. Kujawa served
as Executive Vice President, Finance and Chief Financial Officer of NEE and FPL from February 2019 to February 2022 and Vice President, Business Management
of NextEra Energy Resources from March 2012 to February 2019. Mr. Lemasney served as Vice President of Power Generation Division Engineering and
Operations Support Services of NEE from November 2018 to December 2022 and Vice President of NEE Wind and Solar Operations from October 2016 to
November 2018. Mr. May served as Controller of NextEra Energy Resources from April 2015 to February 2019. Mr. Pimentel serves as a member of the Board of
Directors of Ameriprise Financial, Inc. since September 2022 and previously served as President and Chief Executive Officer of NextEra Energy Resources from
October 2011 to March 2019. Mr. Reagan served as Vice President, Engineering and Construction of NEE from November 2018 to December 2019 and Vice
President, Integrated Supply Chain of NEE from October 2012 to November 2018.(a)
20
Table of Contents
Item 1A. Risk Factors
Risks Relating to NEE's and FPL's Business
The busines s, financial condition, results of operations and prospects of NEE and FPL are subject to a variety of risks, many of
which are beyond the control of NEE and FPL. These risks, as well as additional risks and uncertainties either not presently known
or that are currently believed to not be material to the business, may materially adversely affect the business, financial condition,
results of operations and prospects of NEE and FPL and may cause actual results of NEE and FPL to differ substantially from those
that NEE or FPL currently expects or seeks. In that event, the market price for the securit ies of NEE or FPL could decline.
Accordingly , the risks described below should be carefully considered together with the other information set forth in this report and
in future reports that NEE and FPL  file with the SEC.
Regulatory, Legislative and Legal Risks
NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects may be materially adversely affected by
the extensive regulation of their business.
The operatio ns of NEE and FPL are subject to complex and comprehensive federal, state and other regulation. This extensive
regulatory framework, portions of which are more specifically identified in the following risk factors, regulates, among other things
and to varying degrees, NEE's and FPL's industry , businesses, rates and cost structures, operation and licensing of nuclear power
facilities, planning, construction and operation of electric generation, transmission and distribution facilities and natural gas and oil
production, natural gas, oil and other fuel trans portation, processing and storage facilities, acquisition, disposal, depreciation and
amortization of facilities and other assets, decommissioning costs and funding, service reliability , wholesale and retail competition,
and commodities trading and derivatives transa ctions. In their business planning and in the management of their operations, NEE
and FPL must address the effects of regulation on their business and any inability or failure to do so adequately could have a
material adverse ef fect on their business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects could be materially adversely affected if
they are unable to recover in a timely manner any significant amount of costs, a return on certain assets or a reasonable
return on invested capital through base rates, cost recovery clauses, other regulatory mechanisms or otherwise.
FPL operates as an electric utility and is subject to the jurisdiction of the FPSC over a wide range of business activities, including,
among other items, the retail rates charged to its customers through base rates and cost recovery clauses, the terms and conditions
of its services, procurement of electricity for its customers and fuel for its plant operations, issuances of securities, and aspects of
the siting, planning, construction and operation of its generation plants and transmission and distribution systems for the sale of
electric energy. The FPSC has the authority to disallow recovery by FPL of costs that it considers excessive or imprudently incurred,
including those incurred to transition to lower carbon emission technology , and to determine the level of return that FPL is permitted
to earn on invested capital. The regulatory process, which may be adversely affected by the geopolitical, political, regulatory ,
operational and economic environment in Florida and elsewhere, limits or could otherwise adversely impact FPL's earnings. The
regulatory process also does not provide any assurance as to achievement of authorized or other earnings levels, or that FPL will be
permitted to earn an acceptable return on capital investments it wishes to make. NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition,
results of operations and prospects could be materially adversely affected if any material amount of costs, a return on certain assets
or a reason able return on invested capital cannot be recovered through base rates, cost recovery clauses, other regulatory
mechanisms or otherwise. Certain other subsidiaries of NEE are utilities subject to the jurisdiction of their regulators and are subject
to similar risks.
Regulatory decisions that are important to NEE and FPL may be materially adversely affected by political, regulatory ,
operational and economic factors.
The local and national political, regulatory and economic environment has had, and may in the future have, an adverse effect on
regulatory decisions with negative consequen ces for NEE and FPL. These decisions, which may come from any level of
government, may require, for example, FPL or NEER to cancel or delay planned development activities, to reduce or delay other
planned capital expenditures or to pay for investments or otherwise incur costs that it may not be able to recover through rates or
otherwise, each of which could have a material adverse effect on the business, financial condition, results of operations and
prospects of NEE and FPL.
FPL's use of derivative instruments could be subject to prudence challenges and, if found imprudent, could result in
disallowances of cost recovery for such use by the FPSC.
The FPSC engages in an annual prudence review of FPL's use of derivative instruments in its risk management fuel procurement
program and should it find any such use to be imprudent, the FPSC could deny cost recovery for such use by FPL. Such an
outcome could have a material adverse ef fect on FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
21
Table of Contents
Any reductions or modifications to, or the elimination of, governmental incentives or policies that support utility scale
renewable energy , including, but not limited to, tax laws, policies and incentives, RPS and feed-in-tariffs, or the imposition
of additiona l taxes, tariffs, duties or other assessments on renewable energy or the equipment necessary to generate or
deliver it, could result in, among other items, the lack of a satisfactory market for the deve lopment and/or financing of new
renewable energy projects, NEE and FPL abandoning the development of renewable energy projects, a loss of investments
in renewable energy projects and reduced project returns, any of which could have a material adverse effect on NEE and
FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE depend s heavily on government policies that support utility scale renewable energy and enhance the economic feasibility of
developing and operating wind and solar energy projects in regions in which NEER and FPL operate or plan to develop and operate
renewable energy facilities. The federal government, a majority of state governments in the U.S. and portions of Canada provide
incentives, such as tax incentives, RPS or feed-in-tarif fs, that support or are designed to support  the sale of energy from utility scale
renewable energy faciliti es, such as wind and solar energy facilities. The development of renew able energy facilities at acceptable
prices has not historically been burdened by actions taken by the U.S. government. However , as a result of budgetary constraints,
geopolitical factors, political factors or otherwise, governments from time to time may review their laws and policies that support, or
do not overly burden, the development and operation of renewable energy facilities and, instead , consider actions that would make
the laws and policies less conducive to the development and operation of renewable energy facilities. Any reductions or
modifications to, or the elimination of, governm ental incentives or policies that support renewable energy or the imposition of
additional taxes, tariffs, duties or other assessme nts on renewable energy or the equipment nece ssary to generate or deliver it, such
as policies in place to limit certain imports from China and other Southeast Asian countries, could result in, among other items, the
lack of a satisfactory market for the developmen t and/or financing of new renewable energy projects, NEE and FPL abandoning the
development of renewable energy projects, a loss of investments in the projects and reduced project returns, any of which could
have a material adverse ef fect on NEE and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE's and FPL's business, financial conditio n, results of operations and prospects could be materially adversely affected
as a result of new or revised laws or regulations or interpretations of these laws and regulations.
NEE's and FPL's business is influenced by various legislative and regulatory initiatives, including, but not limited to, new or revised
laws, including international trade laws, regula tions and interpretations, constitutional ballot and regulatory initiatives regarding
deregulation or restructuring of the energy industry , regulation of the commodities trading and derivatives markets, and regulation of
environmental matters, such as regulation of air emissions, regulation of water consumption and water discharges, and regulation of
gas and oil infrastructure operations, as well as associated environmental permitting. Changes in the nature of the regulation of
NEE's and FPL's business could have a mate rial adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of
operations and prospects. NEE and FPL are unable to predict future legislative or regulatory changes, including through
constitutional ballot initiatives or changed legal or regulatory interpretations, although any such changes may increase costs and
competitive pressures on NEE and FPL, which could have a material adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial
condition, results of operations and prospects.
FPL has limited competi tion in the Florida market for retail electricity customers and is not subject to a RPS. Any changes in Florida
law or regulation, whether through new or modified legislation or regulation or through citizen-approved state constitutional ballot
initiatives, which introduce competition in the Florida retail electricity market, such as government incentives that facilitate the
installation of solar generation facilities on residential or other rooftops at below cost or that are otherwise subsidized by non-
participants, would permit third-party sales of electricity or would mandate the transition to renewable energy at FPL, could have a
material adverse effect on FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects. There can be no assurance that
FPL will be able to respond adequately to such regulatory changes, which could have a material adverse effect on FPL's business,
financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEER is subject to FERC rules related to transmission that are designed to facilitate competition in the wholesale market on
practically a nationwide basis by providing great er certainty , flexibility and more choices to wholesale power customers. NEE cannot
predict the impact of changing FERC rules or the effect of changes in levels of wholesale supp ly and demand, which are typically
driven by factors beyon d NEE's control. There can be no assurance that NEER will be able to respond adequately or sufficiently
quickly to such rules and developments, or to any changes that reverse or restrict the competitive restructuring of the energy
industry in those jurisdictions in which such restructuring has occurred. Any of these events could have a material adverse effect on
NEE's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE and FPL are subject to numerous environmental laws, regulations and other standards that may result in capital
expenditures, increased operating costs and various liabilities, and may require NEE and FPL to limit or eliminate certain
operations.
NEE and FPL are subject to domestic environmental laws, regulations and other standards, including, but not limited to, extensive
federal, state and local environmental statutes, rules and regulations relating to air quality , water quality and usage, soil quality ,
climate change, emissions of greenhouse gases, waste management, hazardous wastes, marine, avian and other wildlife mortality
and habitat protection, historical artifact preservation, natural resources, health (including, but not limited to, electric and magnetic
fields from power lines and substations), safety and RPS, that could, among other things, prevent or delay
22
Table of Contents
the developm ent of power generation, power or natural gas transmission, or other infrastructure projects, restrict or enjoin the output
of some existing facilities, limit the availability and use of some fuels required for the production of electricity , require additional
pollution control equipment, and otherwise incre ase costs, increase capital expenditures and limit or eliminate certain operations.
Certain subs idiaries of NEE are also subject to foreign environmental laws, regulations and other standards and, as such, are
subject to similar risks.
There are significant capital, operating and other costs associated with compliance with these environmental statutes, rules and
regulations, and those costs could be even more significant in the future as a result of new requirements, stricter or more expansive
application of existing environmental laws and regulations, and the addition of species to the endangered species list.
Violations of current or future laws, rules, regulations or other standards could expose NEE and FPL to regulatory and legal
proceedings, disputes with, and legal challenges by, governmental entities and third parties, and potentially significant civil fines,
criminal penalties and other sanctions, such as restrictions on how NextEra Energy Resources  develops, sites and operates wind
facilities. These violations could result in, without limitation, litigation regarding property damage, personal injury , common law
nuisance and enforcement by citizens or gover nmental authorities of environmental requirements. For example, one of NextEra
Energy Resources' subsidiaries is currently on probation as a result of accidental collisions of eagles into wind turbines at a number
of NextEra Energy Resources' wind facilities. If NextEra Energy Resources' subsidiary violates the terms of the probation, or fails to
obtain eagle “take” perm its under the BGEP A for certain of its wind facilities and additional eagles perish in collisions with facility
turbines, NextEra Energy Resources or its subsidiaries may face criminal prosecution under these laws.
NEE's and FPL's business could be negatively affected by federal or state laws or regulat ions mandating new or additional
limits on the production of greenhouse gas emissions.
Federal or state laws or regulations may be adopted that would impose new or additional limits on the emissions of greenhouse
gases, including, but not limited to, carbon dioxide and methane, from electric generation units using fuels, such as natural gas. The
potential effects of greenhouse gas emission  limits on NEE's and FPL's electric generation units are subject to significant
uncertainties based on, among other things, the timing of the implementation of any new requirements, the required levels of
emission reductions, the nature of any market-based or tax-based mechanisms adopted to facilitate reductions, the relative
availability of greenhous e gas emission reduction offsets, the development of cost-ef fective, commercial-scale carbon capture and
storage technology and supporting regulations and liability mitigation measures, and the range of available compliance alternatives.
While NEE's and FPL's electric generation portfolio emits greenhouse gases at a lower rate of emissions than most of the U.S.
electric gene ration sector , the results of operations of NEE and FPL could be materially advers ely affected to the extent that new
federal or state laws or regulations impose any new greenhouse gas emission limits. Any future limits on greenhouse gas emissions
could:
•create substantial additional costs in the form of taxes or emissions allowances;
•make some of NEE's and FPL's electric generation units uneconomical to operate in the long term;
•require significant capital investment in carbon capture and storage technology , fuel switching, or the replacement of high-
emitting generation facilities with lower-emitting generation facilities; or
•affect the availability or cost of fuel, such as natural gas.
There can be no assurance that NEE or FPL would be able to completely recover any such costs or investments, which could have a
material adverse ef fect on their business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
Extensive federal regulation of the operations and businesses of NEE and FPL exposes NEE and FPL to significant and
increasing compliance costs and may also expose them to substantial monetary penalties and other sanctions for
compliance failures.
NEE's and FPL's operations and businesses are subject to extensive federal regulation, which generally imposes significant and
increasing compliance costs on their operations and businesses. Additionally , any actual or alleged compliance failures could result
in significant costs and other potentially adverse effects of regulatory investigations, proceedings, settlements, decisions and claims,
including, among other items, potentially significant monetary penalties. As an example, under the Energy Policy Act of 2005, NEE
and FPL, as owners and operators of bulk-powe r transmission systems and/or electric generation facilities, are subject to mandatory
reliability standards. Compliance with these mandatory reliability standards may subject NEE and FPL to higher operating costs and
may result in increased capital expenditures. If FPL or NEE is found not to be in compliance with these standards, they may incur
substantial monetary penalties and other sanctio ns. Both the costs of regulatory compliance and the costs that may be imposed as a
result of any actual or alleged compliance failures could have a material adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial
condition, results of operations and prospects.
Changes in tax laws, guidance or policies, including but not limited to changes in corpo rate income tax rates, as well as
judgments and estimates used in the determination of tax-related asset and liability amounts, could materially adversely
affect NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
23
Table of Contents
NEE's and FPL's provisi on for income taxes and reporting of tax-related assets and liabilities require significant judgments and the
use of estimates. Amounts of tax-related assets and liabilities involve judgments and estimat es of the timing and probability of
recognition of income, deductions and tax credits, including, but not limited to, estimates for potential adverse outcomes regarding
tax positions that have been taken and the ability to utilize tax benefit carryforwards, such as net operating loss and tax credit
carryforwards. Actual income taxes could vary significantly from estimated amounts due to the future impacts of, among other things,
changes in tax laws, guidance or policies, including changes in corporate income tax rates, the financial condition and results of
operations of NEE and FPL, and the resolution of audit issues raised by taxing authorities. These factors, including the ultimate
resolution of income tax matters, may result in material adjustments to tax-related assets and liabilities, which could materially
adversely af fect NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects may be materially adversely affected
due to adverse results of litigation.
NEE's and FPL's busine ss, financial condition, results of operations and prospects may be mate rially affected by adverse results of
litigation. Unfavorable resolution of legal or administrative proceedings in which NEE or FPL is involved or other future legal or
administrative proceedings may have a material adverse effect on the business, financial condition, results of operations and
prospects of NEE and FPL.
Allegations of violations of law by FPL or NEE have the potential to result in fines, penalties, or other sanctions or effects,
as well as cause repu tational damage for FPL and NEE, and could hamper FPL’s and NEE’ s effectiveness in interacting
with governmental authorities.
FPL’s and NEE’ s business and reputation could be adversely affected by allegations that FPL or NEE has violated laws, by any
investigations or proceedings that arise from such allegations, or by ultimate determinations of legal violations. For example, media
articles have been published that allege, among other things, Florida state and federal campa ign finance law violations by FPL.
These article s are referenced in a complaint subsequently filed with the Federal Election Com mission (FEC) that alleges certain
violations of the Federal  Election Campaign Act. FPL and NEE cannot guarantee that the FEC complaint process will not ultimately
result in a finding that FPL or NEE violated federal campaign finance or other laws, that applicable federal or state governmental
authorities may not investigate or take enforcement actions with respect to the allegations or assert that legal violations by FPL or
NEE have occurred, or that violations may not ultimately be found by a court of competent jurisdiction or other authorities to have
occurred.
In addition, notwithstanding the completion or pendency of any internal review or investigation by FPL or NEE of any allegations of
legal violatio ns, including  of the allegations regarding campaign finance laws set forth in the media articles or FEC complaint, FPL
and NEE cannot provide  assurance that any of the foregoing will not result in the imposition of material fines, penalties, or otherwise
result in other sanctions or effects on FPL or NEE, or will not have a material adverse impact on the reputation of NEE or FPL or on
the ef fectiveness of their interactions with governmental regulators or other authorities.
Development and Operational Risks
NEE's and FPL's busin ess, financial condition, results of operations and prospects could suffer if NEE and FPL do not
proceed with projects under development or are unable to complete the construction of, or capital improvements to,
electric generation, transmission and distrib ution facilities, gas infrastructure facilities or other facilities on schedule or
within budget.
NEE's and FPL's ability to proceed with projects under development and to complete construction of, and capital improvement
projects for, their electr ic generation, transmission and distribution facilities, gas infrastructu re facilities and other facilities on
schedule and within budget have been, in limited instances, and in the future may be, adversely affected by escalating costs for
materials and labor and regulatory compliance, inability to obtain or renew necessary licenses, rights-of-way , permits or other
approvals on acceptabl e terms or on schedule, disputes involving contractors, labor organiz ations, land owners, governmental
entities, environmental groups, Native American and aboriginal groups, lessors, joint venture partners and other third parties,
negative publicity , transmission interconnection issues, geopolitical factors, supply chain disruptions, inflation, rising interest rates
and other factors. For example, the ability of NEE and FPL to develop solar generation facilities is dependent on the international
supply chain  for solar panels and associated equipment, and governmental or regulatory action s have caused minor , and could in
the future cause materia l, disruptions in the ability of NEE and FPL to acquire solar panels on time and at acceptable costs. If any
development project or construction or capital improvement project is not completed, is delayed or is subject to cost overruns,
certain asso ciated costs  may not be approved for recovery or otherwise be recoverable through regulatory mechanisms that may be
available, and NEE and FPL could become oblig ated to make delay or termination payments or become obligated for other damages
under contracts, could experience the loss of tax credits or tax incentives, or delayed or diminished returns, and could be required to
write off all or a portion of their investment in the project. Any of these events could have a material adverse effect on NEE's and
FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
24
Table of Contents
NEE and FPL face risks related to project siting, financing, construction, permitting, governmental approvals and the
negotiation of project development agreements that may impede their development and operating activities.
NEE and FPL own, develop, construct, manage and operate electric generation and transmission facilities and natural gas
transmission facilities. A key component of NEE's and FPL's growth is their ability to construct and operate generation and
transmission facilities to meet customer needs. As part of these operations, NEE and FPL must periodically apply for licenses and
permits from various local, state, federal and other regulatory authorities and abide by their respective conditions. Should NEE or
FPL be unsuccessful in obtaining necessary licenses or permits on acceptable terms or resolving third-party challenges to such
licenses or permits, shou ld there be a delay in obtaining or renewing necessary licenses or permits or should regulatory authorities
initiate any associated investigations or enforce ment actions or impose related penalties or disallowances on NEE or FPL, NEE's
and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects could be materiall y adversely affected. Any failure to
negotiate successful project development agreements for new facilities with third parties could have similar results.
The operation and maintenance of NEE's and FPL's electric generation, transmission and distribution facilities, gas
infrastructure facilities, retail gas distribution system in Florida and other facilities are subject to many operational risks,
the consequences of which could have a material adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results
of operations and prospects.
NEE's and FPL's electric generation, transmissio n and distribution facilities, gas infrastructure facilities, retail gas distribution system
in Florida and other facilities are subject to many operational risks. Operational risks could result in, among other things, lost
revenues due to prolonged outages, increased expenses due to monetary penalties or fines for compliance failures or legal claims,
liability to third parties for property and persona l injury damage or loss of life, a failure to perform under applicable power sales
agreements or other agreements and associated loss of revenues from terminated agreements or liability for liquidated damages
under continuing agreements, and replacement equipment costs or an obligation to purchase or generate replacement power at
higher prices.
Uncertainties and risks inherent in operating and maintaining NEE's and FPL's facilities include, but are not limited to:
•risks associated with facility start-up operations, such as whether the facility will achieve projected operating performance on
schedule and otherwise as planned;
•failures in the availability , acquisition or transportation of fuel or other necessary supplies;
•the impact of unusual or adverse weather cond itions and natural disasters, including, but not limited to, hurricanes, tornadoes,
extreme temperatures, icing events, floods, earthquakes and droughts;
•performance below expected or contracted levels of output or ef ficiency;
•breakdown or failure, including, but not limited to, explosions, fires, leaks or other major events , of equipment, transmission or
distribution systems or pipelines;
•availability of replacement equipment;
•risks of property damage , human injury or loss of life from energized equipment, hazardous substances or explosions, fires, leaks
or other events, especially where facilities are located near populated areas;
•potential environmental impacts of gas infrastructure operations;
•availability of adequate water resources and ability to satisfy water intake and discharge requirements;
•inability to identify , manage properly or mitigate equipment defects in NEE's and FPL's facilities;
•use of new or unproven technology;
•risks associated with dependence on a specific type of fuel or fuel source, such as commodity price risk, availability of adequate
fuel supply and transportation, and lack of available alternative fuel sources;
•increased competition due to, among other factors, new facilities, excess supply , shifting demand and regulatory changes (such
as the passage of the IRA); and
•insuf ficient insurance, warranties or performance guarantees to cover any or all lost revenues or increased expenses from the
foregoing.
NEE's and FPL's busin ess, financial condition, results of operations and prospects may be negatively affected by a lack of
growth or slower growth in the number of customers or in customer usage.
Growth in customer accounts and growth of customer usage each directly influence the dema nd for electricity and the need for
additional power generation and power delivery facilities, as well as the need for energy-related  commodities, such as natural gas.
Customer growth and customer usage are affected by a number of factors outside the control of NEE and FPL, such as mandated
energy efficiency measures, demand side management requirements, and economic and demographic conditions, such as
population changes, job and income growth, housing starts, new business formation, inflation  and the overall level of economic
activity . A lack of growth,  or a decline, in the number of customers or in customer demand for electricity or natural gas and other fuels
may cause NEE and FPL to fail to fully realize the anticipated benefits from significant investmen ts and expenditures and could have
a material adverse ef fect on NEE's and FPL's growth, business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
25
Table of Contents
NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects can be materially adversely affected by
weather conditions, including, but not limited to, the impact of severe weather .
Weather conditions directly influence the deman d for electricity and natural gas and other fuels and affect the price of energy and
energy-related commod ities. In addition, severe  weather and natural disasters, such as hurricanes, floods, tornadoes, droughts,
extreme temperatures, icing events and earthquakes, can be destructive and cause power outages and property damage, reduce
revenue, affect the availability of fuel and water , and require NEE and FPL to incur additional costs, for example, to restore service
and repair damaged facilities, to obtain replacement power , to access available financing sources and to obtain insurance.
Furthermore, NEE's and FPL's physical plants could be placed at greater risk of damage should changes in the global climate
produce unusual variations in temperature and weather patterns, resulting in more intense, frequent and extreme weather events,
abnormal levels of precipitation and, particularly  relevant to FPL, a change in sea level. FPL operates in the east and lower west
coasts of Florida and in northwest Florida, areas that historically have been prone to severe weather events, such as hurricanes. A
disruption or failure of electric generation, transmission or distribution systems or natural gas production, transmission, storage or
distribution systems in the event of a hurricane,  tornado or other severe weather event, or otherwise, could prevent NEE and FPL
from operat ing their business in the normal course and could result in any of the advers e consequences described above.
Additionally , the actions taken to address the potential for severe weather such as additional winterizing of critical equipment and
infrastructure, modifying or alternating plant operations and expanding load shedding options could result in significant increases in
costs. Any of the foregoing could have a material adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's busin ess, financial condition, results of
operations and prospects.
At FPL and other businesses of NEE where cost recovery is available, recovery of costs to restore service, to repair damaged
facilities or for other actions to address severe weather is or may be subject to regulatory approval, and any determination by the
regulator not to permit timely and full recovery of the costs incurred could have a material adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's
business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
Changes in weather can also affect the production of electricity at power generation facilities, including, but not limited to, NEER's
wind and solar facilities. For example, the level of wind resource affects the revenue produced by wind generation facilities. Because
the levels of wind and solar resources are variable and difficult to predict, NEER's results of operations for individual wind and solar
facilities specifically , and NEE's results of operations generally , may vary significantly from perio d to period, depending on the level
of available resources. To the extent that resources are not available at planned levels, the finan cial results from these facilities may
be less than expected.
Threats of terrorism and catastrophic events that could result from geopolitical factors, terrorism, cyberattacks, or
individuals and/or groups attempting to disrupt NEE's and FPL's business, or the businesses of third parties, may
materially adversely affect NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE and FPL are subje ct to the potentially adverse operating and financial effects of geopolitical factors, terrorist acts and threats,
as well as cyberattacks and other disruptive activities of individuals or groups. There have been cyberattacks and other physical
attacks within the energy industry on energy infrastructure such as substations, gas pipelines and related assets in the past and
there may be such attacks in the future. NEE's and FPL's generation, transmission and distribu tion facilities, fuel storage facilities,
information technology systems and other infrastructure facilities and systems could be direct targets of, or otherwise be materially
adversely af fected by , such activities.
Geopolitical factors, terrorist acts, cyberattacks or other similar events affecting NEE's and FPL's systems and facilities, or those of
third parties on which NEE and FPL rely, could harm NEE's and FPL's business, for example,  by limiting their ability to generate,
purchase or transmit power , natural gas or other  energy-related commodities, by limiting their ability to bill customers and collect and
process payments, and by delaying their development and construction of new generation, distribution or transmission facilities or
capital improvements to existing facilities. These  events, and governmental actions in response, could result in a material decrease
in revenues, significant additional costs (for example, to repair assets, implement additional security requirements or maintain or
acquire insurance), significant fines and penalt ies, and reputational damage, could materially adversely affect NEE's and FPL's
operations (for example, by contributing to disruption of supplies and markets for natural gas, oil and other fuels), and could impair
NEE's and FPL's ability to raise capital (for exam ple, by contributing to financial instability and lower economic activity). In addition,
the implementation of security guidelines and measures has resulted in and is expected to continue to result in increased costs.
Such events  or actions may materially adversely affect NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and
prospects.
The ability of NEE and FPL to obtain insurance and the terms of any available insurance coverage could be materially
adversely affected by international, national, state or local events and company-specific events, as well as the financial
condition of insurers. NEE's and FPL's insurance coverage does not provide protection against all significant losses.
Insurance coverage may not continue to be available or may not be available at rates or on terms  similar to those presently available
to NEE and FPL. The ability of NEE and FPL to obtain insurance and the terms of any available insurance coverage could be
materially adversely affected by international, national, state or local events and company-specific events, including impacts of
actual or perceived climate-related events, as well as the financial condition of insurers. If insurance coverage is not available or
obtainable on acceptable terms, NEE or FPL  may be required to pay costs associated with adverse future events.
26
Table of Contents
NEE and FPL generally are not fully insured against all significant losses. For example, FPL is not fully insured against hurricane-
related losses, but could  instead seek recovery of such uninsured losses from customers subject to approval by the FPSC, to the
extent losse s exceed restricted funds set aside to cover the cost of storm damage. A loss for which NEE or FPL is not fully insured
could have a material adverse ef fect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE invests in gas and oil producing and transmission assets through NEER’ s gas infrastructure business. The gas
infrastructure business is exposed to fluctu ating market prices of natural gas, natural gas liquids, oil and other energy
commodities. A prolonged period of low gas and oil prices could impact NEER’ s gas infrastructure business and cause
NEER to delay or canc el certain gas infrastructure projects and could result in certain projects becoming impaired, which
could materially adversely affect NEE's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
Natural gas and oil prices are affected by supply and demand, both globally and regionally . Factors that influence supply and
demand include operational issues, natural disasters, weather , political instability , conflicts, new discoveries, technological advances,
economic conditions and actions by major oil-pro ducing countries. There can be significant volatility in market prices for gas and oil,
and price fluctuations could have a material effect on the financial performance of gas and oil producing and transmission assets.
For example, in a low gas and oil price environment, NEER would generate less revenue from its gas infrastructure investments in
gas and oil producing properties, and as a result certain investments might become less profitable or incur losses. Prolonged periods
of low oil and gas price s could also result in the delay or cancellation of oil and gas production and transmission projects, could
cause projec ts to experience lower returns, and could result in certain projects becoming impaire d, which could materially adversely
affect NEE's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
If supply costs necessary to provide NEER's full energy and capacity requirement services are not favorable, operating
costs could increase and materially adver sely affect NEE's business, financial cond ition, results of operations and
prospects.
NEER provid es full energy and capacity requirements  services primarily to distribution utilities, which include load-following services
and various ancillary services, to satisfy all or a portion of such utilities' power supply obligations to their customers. The supply
costs for these transacti ons may be affected by a number of factors, including, but not limited to, events that may occur after such
utilities have  committed to supply power , such as weather conditions, fluctuating prices for energy and ancillary services, and the
ability of the distribution utilities' customers to elect to receive service from competing suppliers. NEER may not be able to recover all
of its increased supply costs, which could have a material adverse effect on NEE's business, financial condition, results of operations
and prospects.
Due to the potential for significant volatility in market prices for fuel, electricity and renewable and other energy
commodities, NEER's inability or failure to manage properly or hedge effectively the commodity risks within its portfolios
could materially adversely affect NEE's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
There can be significant volatility in market price s for fuel, electricity and renewable and other energy commodities. NEE's inability or
failure to manage properly or hedge effectively its assets or positions against changes in commo dity prices, volumes, interest rates,
counterparty credit risk or other risk measures, based on factors that are either within, or wholly or partially outside of, NEE's control,
may materially adversely af fect NEE's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
Reductions in the liquidity of energy markets may restrict the ability of NEE to manage its operational risks, which, in turn,
could negatively affect NEE's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE is an active partici pant in energy markets.  The liquidity of regional energy markets is an important factor in NEE's ability to
manage risks in these operations. Market liquidity is driven in part by the number of active marke t participants. Liquidity in the energy
markets can be adverse ly affected by price volatility , restrictions on the availability of credit, inflation, rising interest rates and other
factors, and any reduction in the liquidity of energy markets could have a material adverse effect on NEE's business, financial
condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE's and FPL's hedging and trading procedures and associated risk management tools may not protect against
significant losses.
NEE and FPL have hedging and trading procedures and associated risk management tools, such as separate but complementary
financial, credit, operational, compliance and legal reporting systems, internal controls, manag ement review processes and other
mechanisms. NEE and FPL are unable to assure that such procedures and tools will be effective against all potential risks, including,
without limita tion, emplo yee misconduct or seve re weather or operating conditions. If such procedures and tools are not effective,
this could have a material adverse ef fect on NEE's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
If price movements significantly or persistently deviate from historical behavior , NEE's and FPL's risk management tools
associated with their hedging and trading procedures may not protect against significant losses.
27
Table of Contents
NEE's and FPL's risk management tools and metrics associated with their hedging and trading procedures, such as daily value at
risk, earnings at risk, stop loss limits and liquidity guidelines, are based on historical price  movements. Due to the inherent
uncertainty involved in price movements and potential deviation from historical pricing behavior , NEE and FPL are unable to assure
that their risk management tools and metrics will be effective to protect against material adverse effects on their business, financial
condition, results of operations and prospects.
If power transmission or natural gas, nuclear fuel or other commodity transportation facilities are unavailable or disrupted,
the ability for subsidiaries of NEE, including FPL, to sell and deliver power or natural gas may be limited.
Subsidiaries of NEE, including FPL, depend upon power transmission and natural gas, nuclear fuel and other commodity
transportation facilities, many of which they do not own. Occurrences affecting the operation of these facilities that may or may not
be beyond the control of subsidiaries of NEE, including FPL, (such as geopolitical factors, cybe r incidents, physical attacks, severe
weather or a generation  or transmission facility outage, pipeline rupture, or sudden and signific ant increase or decrease in wind or
solar genera tion) may limit or halt their ability to sell and deliver power and natural gas, or to purchase necessary fuels and other
commodities, which could materially adversely impact NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and
prospects.
NEE and FPL  are subject to credit and performance risk from customers, hedging counterparties and vendors.
NEE and FPL are expos ed to risks associated with the creditworthiness and performance of their customers, hedging counterparties
and vendors under contracts for the supply of equipment, materials, fuel and other goods and services required for their business
operations and for the construction and operation of, and for capital improvements to, their facilities. Adverse conditions in the
energy indus try or the general economy such as inflation, as well as circumstances of individua l customers, hedging counterparties
and vendors , may adversely affect the ability of some customers, hedging counterparties and vendors to perform as required under
their contracts with NEE and FPL.
If any vendor or hedging or other counterparty fails to fulfill its contractual obligations, NEE and FPL may need to make
arrangements with other counterparties or vendors, which could result in material financial losses, higher costs, untimely completion
of power generation facilities and other projec ts, and/or a disruption of their operations. If a defaulting counterparty is in poor
financial condition, NEE and FPL  may not be able to recover damages for any contract breach.
NEE and FPL could recognize financial losses or a reduction in operating cash flows if a counterparty fails to perform or
make payments in accordance with the terms of derivative contracts or if NEE or FPL is required to post margin cash
collateral under derivative contracts.
NEE and FPL use derivative instruments, such as swaps, options, futures and forwards, some of which are traded in the OTC
markets or on exchange s, to manage their commodity and financial market risks, and for NEE to engage in trading and marketing
activities. Any failures by their counterparties to perform or make payments in accordance with the terms of those transactions could
have a material adverse  effect on NEE's or FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects. Similarly , any
requirement for FPL or NEE to post margin cash collateral under its derivative contracts could have a material adverse effect on its
business, financial condition, results of operation s and prospects. These risks may be increased during periods of adverse market or
economic conditions such as inflation af fecting the industry in which NEE and FPL  participate.
NEE and FPL are highl y dependent on sensitive and complex information technology systems, and any failure or breach of
those systems could have a material adverse effect on their business, financial condition, results of operations and
prospects.
NEE and FPL operate in a highly regulated industry that requires the continuous functioning of sophisticated information technology
systems and network infrastructure. Despite NEE's and FPL's implementation of security measures, all of their technology systems
are vulnerable to disability , failures or unauthorized access due to such activities. If NEE's or FPL's information technology systems
were to fail or be breached, sensitive confidential and other data could be compromised and NEE and FPL could be unable to fulfill
critical business functions.
NEE's and FPL's busine ss is highly dependent on their ability to process and monitor , on a daily basis, a very large number of
transactions, many of which are highly complex  and cross numerous and diverse markets. Due to the size, scope, complexity and
geographical reach of NEE's and FPL's business, the development and maintenance of information technology systems to keep
track of and process information is critical and challenging. NEE's and FPL's operating system s and facilities may fail to operate
properly or become disabled as a result of events that are either within, or wholly or partially outside of, their control, such as
operator error, severe weather , geopolitical activities, terrorist activities or cyber incidents. Any such failure or disabling event could
materially adversely affect NEE's and FPL's ability to process transactions and provide services, and their business, financial
condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE and FPL add, modify and replace information systems on a regular basis. Modifying existing information systems or
implementing new or replacement information systems is costly and involves risks, including, but not limited to, integrating the
28
Table of Contents
modified, new or replacement system with existing systems and processes, implementing associated changes in accounting
procedures and controls, and ensuring that data conversion is accurate and consistent. Any disruptions or deficiencies in existing
information systems, or disruptions, delays or deficiencies in the modification or implementation of new information systems, could
result in increased costs, the inability to track or collect revenues and the diversion of managem ent's and employees' attention and
resources, and could negatively impact the effectiveness of the companies' control environment, and/or the companies' ability to
timely file required regulatory reports.
NEE and FPL also face the risks of operational failure or capacity constraints of third parties, including, but not limited to, those who
provide power transmission and natural gas transportation services.
NEE's and FPL's retail businesses are subjec t to the risk that sensitive customer data may be compromised, which could
result in a material adverse impact to their reputation and/or have a material adverse effect on the business, financial
condition, results of operations and prospects of NEE and FPL.
NEE's and FPL's retail businesses require access to sensitive customer data in the ordinary course of business. NEE's and
FPL's retail businesses may also need to provid e sensitive customer data to vendors and servi ce providers who require access to
this information in order  to provide services, such as call center services, to the retail businesses. If a significant breach occurred,
the reputatio n of NEE and FPL could be materially adversely affected, customer confidence could be diminished, or customer
information could be subject to identity theft. NEE and FPL would be subject to costs associated with the breach and/or NEE and
FPL could be subject to fines and legal claims, any of which may have a material adverse effect on the business, financial condition,
results of operations and prospects of NEE and FPL.
NEE and FPL could recognize financial losses as a result of volatility in the market values of derivative instruments and
limited liquidity in OTC markets.
NEE and FPL execute transactions in derivative instruments on either recognized exchanges or via the OTC markets, depending on
management's assessment of the most favorable credit and market execution factors. Transactions executed in OTC markets have
the potential  for greater volatility and less liquidity than transactions on recognized exchanges. As a result, NEE and FPL may not be
able to execute desired OTC transactions due to such heightened volatility and limited liquidity .
In the absence of activel y quoted market prices and pricing information from external sources, the valuation of derivative instruments
involves management's judgment and use of estimates. As a result, changes in the underlying assumptions or use of alternative
valuation methods could affect the reported fair value of these derivative instruments and have a material adverse effect on NEE's
and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE and FPL  may be materially adversely affected by negative publicity .
From time to time, political and public sentiment may result in a significant amount of adverse press coverage and other adverse
public statem ents affecting NEE and FPL. Adverse press coverage and other adverse statements, whether or not driven by political
or public sentiment, may also result in investigations by regulators, legislators and law enfor cement officials or in legal claims.
Responding to the negative publicity and any resulting investigations and lawsuits, regardless of the ultimate outcome of the
proceeding, can divert the time and ef fort of senior management from NEE's and FPL's business.
Addressing any adverse publicity , governmental scrutiny or enforcement or other legal proceedings is time consuming and
expensive and, regardless of the factual basis for the assertions being made, can have a negati ve impact on the reputation of NEE
and FPL, on the morale and performance of their employees and on their relationships with regulators. It may also have a negative
impact on their ability to take timely advantage  of various business and market opportunities. The direct and indirect effects of
negative publicity , and the demands of responding to and addressing it, may have a material adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's
business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE's and FPL's busin ess, financial condition, results of operations and prospects may be adversely affected if FPL is
unable to maintain, negotiate or renegotiate franchise agreements on acceptable terms with municipalities and counties in
Florida.
FPL may negotiate franchise agreements with municipalities and counties in Florida to provide electric services within such
municipalities and counties, and electricity sales generated pursuant to these agreements represent a very substantial portion of
FPL's reven ues. If FPL is unable to maintain, negotiate or renegotiate such franchise agreem ents on acceptable terms, it could
contribute to lower earnings and FPL may not fully realize the anticipated benefits from significant investments and expenditures,
which could adversely af fect NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE's and FPL's business, financial conditio n, results of operations and prospects could be materially adversely affected
by work strikes or stoppages and increasing personnel costs.
Employee strikes or work stoppages could disrupt operations and lead to a loss of revenue and customers. Personnel costs may
also increase due to inflationary or competitive pressures on payroll and benefits costs and revised terms of collective bargaining
29
Table of Contents
agreements with union employees. These consequences could have a material adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's business,
financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE's ability to successfully identify , complete and integrate acquisitions is subject to significant risks, including, but not
limited to, the effect of increased competition for acquisitions resulting from the consolidation of the energy industry .
NEE is likely to encou nter significant competition for acquisition opportunities that may become available as a result of the
consolidation of the energy industry in general.  In addition, NEE may be unable to identify attractive acquisition opportunities at
favorable prices and to complete and integrate them successfully and in a timely manner .
Nuclear Generation Risks
The operation and maintenance of NEE's and FPL's nuclear generation facilities involve environmental, health and financial
risks that could result in fines or the closure of the facilities and in increased costs and capital expenditures.
NEE's and FPL's nuclear generation facilities are subject to environmental, health and financial risks, including, but not limited to,
those relating to site storage of spent nuclear fuel, the disposition of spent nuclear fuel, leakage  and emissions of tritium and other
radioactive elements in the event of a nuclear accident or otherwise, the threat of a terrorist attack or cyber incident and other
potential liabilities arising out of the ownership or operation of the facilities. NEE and FPL maintain decommissioning funds and
external insurance coverage which are intende d to reduce the financial exposure to some of these risks; however , the cost of
decommissioning nuclea r generation facilities could exceed the amount available in NEE's and FPL's decommissioning funds, and
the exposure to liability and property damages could exceed the amount of insurance coverage. If NEE or FPL is unable to recover
the additional costs incurred through insurance or, in the case of FPL, through regulatory mechanisms, their business, financial
condition, results of operations and prospects could be materially adversely af fected.
In the event of an incident at any nuclear generation facility in the U.S. or at certain nuclear generation facilities in Europe,
NEE and FPL could be assessed significant retrospective assessments and/or retrosp ective insurance premiums as a
result of their participation in a secondary financial protection system and nuclear insurance mutual companies.
Liability for accidents at nuclear power plants is governed by the Price-Anderson Act, which limits the liability of nuclear reactor
owners to the amount of insurance available from both private sources and an industry retrospective payment plan. In accordance
with this Act, NEE maintains the maximum amount of private liability insurance obtainable, and participates in a secondary financial
protection system, which provides liability insura nce coverage for an incident at any nuclear reactor in the U.S. Under the secondary
financial protection system, NEE is subject to retrospective assessments and/or retrospect ive insurance premiums, plus any
applicable taxes, for an incident at any nuclear reactor in the U.S. or at certain nuclear generation facilities in Europe, regardless of
fault or proximity to the incident. Such assessments, if levied, could materially adversely affect NEE's and FPL's business, financial
condition, results of operations and prospects.
NRC orders or new regulations related to increased security measures and any future safety requirements promulgated by
the NRC could require  NEE and FPL to incur substantial operating and capital expendi tures at their nuclear generation
facilities and/or result in reduced revenues.
The NRC has broad authority to impose licens ing and safety-related requirements for the operation and maintenance of nuclear
generation facilities, the addition of capacity at existing nuclear generation facilities and the construction of new nuclear generation
facilities, and these requirements are subject to change. In the event of non-compliance, the NRC has the authority to impose fines
and/or shut down a nuclear generation facility , depending upon the NRC's assessment of the severity of the situation, until
compliance is achieved. Any of the foregoing events could require NEE and FPL to incur increased costs and capital expenditures,
and could reduce revenues.
Any serious nuclear incident occurring at a NEE or FPL plant could result in substantial remediation costs and other expenses. A
major incident at a nuclear facility anywhere in the world could cause the NRC to limit or prohibit the operation or licensing of any
domestic nuclear generation facility . An inciden t at a nuclear facility anywhere in the world also could cause the NRC to impose
additional conditions or other requirements on the industry , or on certain types of nuclear generation units, which could increase
costs, reduce revenues and result in additional capital expenditures.
The inability to operate any of NEE's or FPL's nuclear generation units through the end of their respective operating
licenses could have a mater ial adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and
prospects.
If any of NEE's or FPL's nuclear generation facilities are not operated for any reason through the life of their respective operating
licenses, NEE or FPL may be required to increase depreciation rates, incur impairment charges and accelerate future
decommissioning expenditures, any of which could materially adversely affect their business, financial condition, results of
operations and prospects.
30
Table of Contents
NEE's and FPL's nuclear units are periodical ly removed from service to accommodate planned refueling and maintenance
outages, and for other  purposes. If planned outages last longer than anticipated or if there are unplanned outages, NEE's
and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects could be materially adversely affected.
NEE's and FPL's nuclear units are periodically removed from service to accommodate planned refueling and maintenance outages,
including, but not limited to, inspections, repairs and certain other modifications as well as to replace equipment. In the event that a
scheduled outage lasts longer than anticipated or in the event of an unplanned outage due to, for example, equipment failure, such
outages could materially adversely af fect NEE's or FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
Liquidity, Capital Requirements and Common Stock Risks
Disruptions, uncertainty or volatility in the credit and capital markets, among other factors, may negatively affect NEE's
and FPL's ability to fund their liquidity and capital needs and to meet their growth objectives, and can also materially
adversely affect the business, financial condition, liquidity , results of operations and prospects of NEE and FPL.
NEE and FPL rely on access to capital and credit markets as significant sources of liquidity for capital requirements and other
operations requirements that are not satisfied by operating cash flows. Disruptions, uncertainty or volatility in those capital and credit
markets, related to, among others, inflation, rising interest rates, geopolitical events, and the planned phase out of the London Inter-
Bank Offered Rate or the reform or replacement of other benchmark rates, could increase NEE's and FPL's cost of capital and affect
their ability to fund their liquidity and capital needs and to meet their growth objectives. If NEE or FPL is unable to access regularly
the capital and credit markets on terms that are reasonable, it may have to delay raising capital, issue shorter-term securities and
incur an unfavorable cost of capital, which, in turn, could adversely affect its ability to grow its business, could contribute to lower
earnings and reduced financial flexibility , and could have a material adverse effect on its business, financial condition, liquidity ,
results of operations and prospects.
Although NEE's competitive energy and certain  other subsidiaries have used non-recourse or limited-recourse, project-specific or
other financing in the past, market conditions and other factors could adversely affect the future availability of such financing. The
inability of NEE's subsid iaries, including, without limitation, NEECH and its subsidiaries, to access the capital and credit markets to
provide project-specific or other financing for electric generation or other facilities or acquisitions on favorable terms, whether
because of disruptions or volatility in those markets or otherwise, could necessitate additional capital raising or borrowings by NEE
and/or NEECH in the future.
The inability of subsidiar ies that have existing project-specific or other financing arrangements to meet the requirements of various
agreements relating to those financings, as well as actions by third parties or lenders, could give rise to a project-specific financing
default which, if not cured or waived, might result in the specific project, and potentially in some limited instances its parent
companies, being required to repay the asso ciated debt or other borrowings earlier than otherwise anticipated, and if such
repayment were not made, the lenders or security holders would generally have rights to forec lose against the project assets and
related collateral. Such an occurrence also could  result in NEE expending additional funds or incurring additional obligations over the
shorter term to ensure continuing compliance  with project-specific financing arrangements based upon the expectation of
improvement in the proje ct's performance or financial returns over the longer term. Any of these actions could materially adversely
affect NEE's business, financial condition, liquid ity, results of operations and prospects, as well as the availability or terms of future
financings for NEE or its subsidiaries.
NEE's, NEECH's and FPL's inability to maintain their current credit ratings may materially adversely affect NEE's and FPL's
liquidity and results of operations, limit the ability of NEE and FPL  to grow their business, and increase interest costs.
The inability  of NEE, NEECH and FPL to maintain their current credit ratings could materially adversely affect their ability to raise
capital or obtain credit on favorable terms, which, in turn, could impact NEE's and FPL's ability to grow their business and service
indebtedness and repay borrowings, and would likely increase their interest costs. In addition, certain agreements and guarantee
arrangements would require posting of additional collateral in the event of a ratings downgrade. Some of the factors that can affect
credit ratings are cash flows, liquidity , the amount of debt as a component of total capitalization, NEE's overall business mix and
political, legislative and regulatory actions. There  can be no assurance that one or more of the ratings of NEE, NEECH and FPL will
not be lowered or withdrawn entirely by a rating agency .
NEE's and FPL's liquidity may be impaired if their credit providers are unable to fund their credit commitments to the
companies or to maintain their current credit ratings.
The inability of NEE's, NEECH's and FPL's credit providers to fund their credit commitments or to maintain their current credit ratings
could requir e NEE, NEECH or FPL, among other things, to renegotiate requirements in agreements, find an alternative credit
provider with acceptable credit ratings to meet funding requirements, or post cash collateral and could have a material adverse effect
on NEE's and FPL's liquidity .
31
Table of Contents
Poor market performance and other economic factors could affect NEE's defined benefit pension plan's funded status,
which may materially adversely affect NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, liquidity , results of operations and
prospects.
NEE sponsors a qualifie d noncontributory defined benefit pension plan for substantially all employees of NEE and its subsidiaries. A
decline in the market value of the assets held in the defined benefit pension plan due to poor investment performance or other
factors may increase the funding requirements for this obligation.
NEE's defined benefit pension plan is sensitive to changes in interest rates, since as interest rates decrease, the funding liabilities
increase, potentially increasing benefits costs and funding requirements. Any increase in benefits costs or funding requirements may
have a material adverse ef fect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, liquidity , results of operations and prospects.
Poor market performance and other econom ic factors could adversely affect the asset values of NEE's and FPL's nuclear
decommissioning fund s, which may materia lly adversely affect NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, liquidity ,
results of operations and prospects.
NEE and FPL are required to maintain decommis sioning funds to satisfy their future obligations to decommission their nuclear power
plants. A decline in the market value of the assets held in the decommissioning funds due to poor investment performance or other
factors may increase the funding requirements for these obligations. Any increase in funding requirements may have a material
adverse ef fect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, liquidity , results of operations and prospects.
Certain of NEE's investments are subject to changes in market value and other risks, whic h may materially adversely affect
NEE's liquidity , financial condition and results of operations.
NEE holds certain investments where changes in the fair value affect NEE's financial results. In some cases there may be no
observable market values for these investments , requiring fair value estimates to be based on other valuation techniques. This type
of analysis requires significant judgment and the actual values realized in a sale of these investments could differ materially from
those estima ted. A sale of an investment below previously estimated value, or other decline in the fair value of an investment, could
result in losses or the write-of f of such investment, and may have a material adverse effect on NEE's liquidity , financial condition and
results of operations.
NEE may be unable to meet its ongoing and future financial obligations and to pay dividends on its common stock if its
subsidiaries are unable to pay upstream dividends or repay funds to NEE.
NEE is a holding company and, as such, has no material operations of its own. Substantially all of NEE's consolidated assets are
held by its subsidiaries . NEE's ability to meet its financial obligations, including, but not limited to, its guarantees, and to pay
dividends on its common stock is primarily depen dent on its subsidiaries' net income and cash flows, which are subject to the risks of
their respective businesses, and their ability to pay upstream dividends or to repay funds to NEE.
NEE's subs idiaries are separate legal entities and have no independent obligation to provide NEE with funds for its payment
obligations. The subsidiaries have financial obligations, including, but not limited to, payment of debt service, which they must satisfy
before they can provide  NEE with funds. In addition, in the event of a subsidiary's liquidation or reorganization, NEE's right to
participate in a distribution of assets is subject to the prior claims of the subsidiary's creditors.
The dividend-paying ability of some of the subsidiaries is limited by contractual restrictions which are contained in outstanding
financing agreements and which may be included in future financing agreements. The future enactment of laws or regulations also
may prohibit or restrict the ability of NEE's subsidiaries to pay upstream dividends or to repay funds.
NEE may be unable to meet its ongoing and future financial obligations and to pay dividends on its common stock if NEE
is required to perform under guarantees of obligations of its subsidiaries.
NEE guarantees many of the obligations of its consolidated subsidiaries, other than FPL, through guarantee agreements with
NEECH. These guarantees may require NEE to provide substantial funds to its subsidiaries or their creditors or counterparties at a
time when NEE is in need of liquidity to meet its own financial obligations. Funding such guarant ees may materially adversely affect
NEE's ability to meet its financial obligations or to pay dividends.
NEP may not be able to access sources of capital on commercially reasonable terms, which would have a material adverse
effect on its ability to consummate future acquisitions and on the value of NEE’ s limited partner interest in NEP  OpCo.
Through an indirect wholly owned subsidiary , NEE owns a limited partner interest in NEP OpCo.  NEP's inability to access capital on
commercially reasonable terms and effectively consummate future acquisitions could have a material adverse effect on NEP's ability
to grow its cash distribut ions to its common unitholders, including NEE, and on the value of NEE’ s limited partnership interest in NEP
OpCo. In addition, NEP's issuance of additional common units, securities convertible into NEP  common units or
32
Table of Contents
other securities in connection with acquisitions could cause significant common unitholder dilution and reduce cash distributions to
its common unitholders, including NEE, if the acquisitions are not suf ficiently accretive.
Disruptions, uncertainty or volatility in the credit and capital markets may exert downward pressure on the market price of
NEE's common stock.
The market price and trading volume of NEE's common stock are subject to fluctuations as a result of, among other factors, general
credit and capital market conditions and changes in market sentiment regarding the operations, business and financing strategies of
NEE and its subsidiaries . As a result, disruptions, uncertainty or volatility in the credit and capital markets may, for example, have a
material adverse ef fect on the market price of NEE's common stock.
Widespread public health crises and epidemics or pandemics may have material adverse impacts on NEE’ s and FPL's
business, financial condition, liquidity , results of operations and prospects.
NEE and FPL are subjec t to the impacts of widespread public health crises, epidemics and pandemics, including, but not limited to,
impacts on the global, national or local economy , capital and credit markets, NEE's and FPL's workforce, customers and suppliers.
There is no assurance that NEE's and FPL's businesses will be able to operate without material adverse impacts depending on the
nature of the public health crisis, epidemic or pandemic. The ultimate severity , duration and impact of public health crises, epidemics
and pandemics cannot be predicted. Additional ly, there is no assurance that vaccines, or other treatments, are or will be widely
available or effective, or that the public will be willing to participate, in an effort to contain the spread of disease. Actions taken in
response to such crises by federal, state and local government or regulatory agencies may have a material adverse impact on NEE's
and FPL's business, financial condition, liquidity , results of operations and prospects.
Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments
None
Item 2. Properties
See Item 1. Business – FPL and Item 1. Business – NEER for a description of principal properties.
Character of Ownership
Substantially all of FPL's  properties are subject to the lien of FPL's mortgage, which secures most debt securities issued by FPL.
The majority of FPL's real property is held in fee and is free from other encumbrances, subject to minor exceptions which are not of a
nature as to substantially impair the usefulness to FPL of such properties. Some of FPL's electric lines are located on parcels of land
which are not owned in fee by FPL but are covered by necessary consents of governmental  authorities or rights obtained from
owners of private proper ty. Subsidiaries within the NEER segment have ownership interests in entities that own generation facilities,
pipeline facilities and transmission assets and a number of those facilities and assets are encumbered by liens securing various
financings. Additionally , the majority of NEER's generation facilities, pipeline facilities and transmission lines are located on land
under easement, rights-of-way or leased from owners of private property or governmental entities. Se e Note 7 – FPL  and – NEER.
Item 3. Legal Proceedings
None. With regard to environmental proceedings to which a governmental authority is a party , NEE's and FPL's policy is to disclose
any such proceeding if it is reasonably expected to result in monetary sanctions of greater than or equal to $1 million.
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures
Not applicable
33
Table of Contents
PART II
Item 5.  Market for Registrants' Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity
Securities
Common Stock Data. All of FPL's common stock is owned by NEE. NEE's common stock is traded on the New York Stock
Exchange under the symbol "NEE." As of January 31, 2023, there were 14,619 holders of record of NEE's common stock. The
amount and timing of dividends payable on NEE's common stock are within the sole discretio n of NEE's Board of Directors. The
Board of Directors reviews the dividend rate at least annually (generally in February) to deter mine its appropriateness in light of
NEE's financial position and results of operations, legislative and regulatory developments affecting the electric utility industry in
general and FPL in particular , competitive conditions, change in business mix and any other factors the Board of Directors deems
relevant. In February 2023, NEE announced that it would increase its quarterly dividend on its common stock from $0.425 per share
to $0.4675 per share.
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities. Information regarding purchases made by NEE of its common stock during the three
months ended December 31, 2022 is as follows:
PeriodTotal
Number
of Shares
PurchasedAverage
Price Paid
Per ShareTotal Number of Shares
Purchased as Part of a
Publicly Announced ProgramMaximum Number of
Shares that May Yet be
Purchased Under the
Program
10/1/22 – 10/31/22 — — — 180,000,000
11/1/22 – 11/30/22 6,819$ 82.91 — 180,000,000
12/1/22 – 12/31/22 1,549$ 86.21 — 180,000,000
Total 8,368$ 83.52 —  
______________________
(a)Includes: (1) in November 2022, shares of common stock withheld from employees to pay certain withholding taxes upon the vesting of stock awards granted to
such employees under the NextEra Energy, Inc. 2021 Long Term Incentive Plan and the NextEra Energy, Inc. Amended and Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive
Plan; and (2) in December 2022, shares of common stock purchased by the trustee of a grantor trust to fund a reinvestment of dividends in connection with NEE's
obligation under a February 2006 grant under the NextEra Energy, Inc. Amended and Restated Long-Term Incentive Plan to a former executive officer of deferred
retirement share awards.
(b)In May 2017, NEE's Board of Directors authorized repurchases of up to 45 million shares of common stock (180 million shares after giving effect to the four-for-one
stock split of NEE common stock effective October 26, 2020) over an unspecified period.
Item 6.  Reserved(a) (b)
34
Table of Contents
Item 7.  Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
OVERVIEW
NEE’ s opera ting performance is driven primarily  by the operations of its two principal businesses, FPL, which serves approximately
5.8 million customer accounts in Florida and is one of the largest electric utilities in the U.S., and NEER, which together with affiliated
entities is the world's largest generator of renewable energy from the wind and sun based on 2022 MWh produced on a net
generation basis, as well as a world leader in battery storage . The table below presents net income (loss)  attribu table to NEE and
earnings (loss) per share attributable to NEE, assuming dilution, by reportable segment, FPL and NEER. Corporate and Other is
primarily comprised of the operating results of other business activities, as well as other income and expense items, including
interest expense, and eliminating entries, and may include the net effect of rounding.  See Note 16 for additional segment
information, including a discussion of a change in segment reporting. The following discussion should be read in conjunction with the
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements contained herein and all comparisons are with the corresponding items in the prior year .
Net Income (Loss) Attributable
to NEEEarnings (Loss) Per Share Attributable
to NEE,
Assuming Dilution
Years Ended December 31, Years Ended December 31,
2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
(millions)
FPL $3,701  $3,206 $ 2,890 $ 1.87 $ 1.63 $ 1.47 
NEER 285 599 531 0.14 0.30 0.27 
Corporate and Other 161 (232) (502) 0.09 (0.12) (0.26)
NEE $4,147  $3,573 $2,919 $ 2.10 $ 1.81 $ 1.48 
______________________
(a)    FPL's and Corporate and Other's results for 2021 and 2020 were retrospectively adjusted to reflect a segment change. See Note 16.
(b)    NEER’s results reflect an allocation of interest expense from NEECH based on a deemed capital structure of 70% debt and differential membership interests sold by
NextEra Energy Resources' subsidiaries.
For the five years ended December 31, 2022, NEE delivered a total shareholder return of approximately 139.3%, above the
S&P 500’s 56.9% return , the S&P 500 Utilities' 58.0% return and the Dow Jones U.S. Electricity's 56.9% return. The historical stock
performance of NEE's common stock shown in the performance graph below is not necessa rily indicative of future stock price
performance.
(a)
(b)
(a)
35
Table of Contents
Adjusted Earnings
NEE prepares its financ ial statements under GAAP. However , management uses earnings adjusted for certain items (adjusted
earnings), a non-GAAP  financial measure, internally for financial planning, analysis of performance, reporting of results to the Board
of Directors and as an input in determining performance-based compensation under NEE’ s employee incentive compensation plans.
NEE also uses adjusted  earnings when commu nicating its financial results and earnings outlook to analysts and investors. NEE’s
management believes that adjusted earnings provide a more meaningful representation of NEE's fundamental earnings power .
Although these amounts  are properly reflected  in the determination of net income under GAAP , management believes that the
amount and/or nature of such items make period to period comparisons of operations difficult and potentially confusing. Adjusted
earnings do not represent a substitute for net income, as prepared under GAAP .
The following table provides details of the after-tax adjustments to net income considered in computing NEE's adjusted earnings
discussed above.
Years Ended December 31,
2022 2021 2020
(millions)
Net losses associated with non-qualifying hedge activity $ (696)$ (1,576)$ (649)
Differential membership interests-related – NEER $ (87)$ (98)$ (87)
NEP investment gains, net – NEER $ 186 $ 27 $ (94)
Gain on disposal of a business – NEER $ — $ — $ 274 
Change in unrealized gains (losses) on equity securities held in NEER's nuclear decommissioning
funds and OTTI, net – NEER $ (324)$ 199 $ 131 
Impairment charges related to investment in Mountain Valley Pipeline – NEER $ (674)$ — $ (1,208)
______________________
(a)For 2022, 2021 and 2020, approximately $1,257 million, $1,735 million and $438 million of losses, respectively, are included in NEER's net income; the balance is
included in Corporate and Other. The change in non-qualifying hedge activity is primarily attributable to changes in forward power and natural gas prices, interest
rates and foreign currency exchange rates, as well as the reversal of previously recognized unrealized mark-to-market gains or losses as the underlying transactions
were realized.
(b)See Note 1 – Disposal of Businesses/Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests for a discussion of the sale of two solar generation facilities in Spain
(Spain projects).
(c)See Note 4 – Nonrecurring Fair Value Measurements for a discussion of the impairment charges in 2022 and 2020 related to the investment in Mountain Valley
Pipeline, LLC (Mountain Valley Pipeline).
NEE segregates into two categories unrealiz ed mark-to-market gains and losses and timing impacts related to derivative
transactions. The first category , referred to as non-qualifying hedges, represents certain energy derivative, interest rate derivative
and foreign currency transactions entered into as economic hedges, which do not meet the requirements for hedge accounting, or
for which hedge accoun ting treatment is not elected or has been discontinued. Changes in the fair value of those transactions are
marked to market and reported in the consolidated statements of income, resulting in earnings volatility because the economic offset
to certain of the position s are generally not marked to market. As a consequence, NEE's net income reflects only the movement in
one part of economically-linked transactions. For example, a gain (loss) in the non-qualifying hedge category for certain energy
derivatives is offset by decreases (increases) in the fair value of related physical asset positions  in the portfolio or contracts, which
are not marked to market under GAAP . For this reason, NEE's management views results expressed excluding the impact of the
non-qualifying hedges as a meaningful measure of current period performance. The second category , referred to as trading
activities, which is included in adjusted earnings, represents the net unrealized effect of actively traded positions entered into to take
advantage of expected market price movements and all other commodity hedging activities. At FPL, substantially all changes in the
fair value of energy derivative transactions are deferred as a regulatory asset or liability until the contracts are settled, and, upon
settlement, any gains or losses are passed through the fuel clause. See Note 3.
2022 Summary
Net income attributable to NEE for 2022 was higher than 2021 by $574 million, or $0.29 per share, assuming dilution, due to higher
results at FPL  and Corporate and Other , partly of fset by lower results at NEER.
FPL's net income increased by $495 million in 2022 primarily driven by continued investments in plant in service and other property .
NEER's results decreased in 2022 primarily driven by the impairment charges related to its investment in Mountain Valley Pipeline
and unfavor able changes in the fair value of equity securities in NEER's nuclear decommissioning funds compared to favorable
changes in 2021, partly  offset by favorable non-qualifying hedge activity compared to 2021 and higher gains on disposal of
businesses/assets – net. In 2022, NEER added  approximately 2,850 MW of new wind generating capacity and 887 MW of solar
generating capacity , repowered 239 MW of wind generating capacity and increased its backlog of contracted renewable
development projects.
Corporate and Other's results in 2022 increased primarily due to favorable non-qualifying hedge activity .(a)
(b)
(c)
36
Table of Contents
NEE and its subsidiaries  require funds to support and grow their businesses. These funds are primarily provided by cash flows from
operations, borrowings or issuances of short- and long-term debt, proceeds from differential membership investors, sales of assets
to NEP  or third parties and, from time to time, issuances of equity securities. See Liquidity and Capital Resources – Liquidity .
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Net income attributable to NEE for 2022 was $4.15 billion compared to $3.57 billion in 2021. In 2022, net income attributable to NEE
increased primarily due to higher results at FPL and Corporate and Other , partly offset by lower results at NEER. The comparison of
the results of operations for the years ended December 31, 2021  and 2020 are included in Management's Discussion in NEE's and
FPL's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2021 .
In October 2021, subsidiaries of NextEra Energy Resources completed the sale to a NEP subsidiary of their 100% ownership
interests in three wind generation facilities and one solar generation facility with a total generating capacity of 467 MW and 33.3% of
the noncontrolling ownership interests in four solar generation facilities and multiple distributed generation solar facilities
representing a total net generating capacity of 122 MW. In December 2021, subsidiaries of NextEra Energy Resources sold their
100% owne rship interest in a portfolio of seven wind generation facilities and six solar generation facilities representing a total
generating capacity of 2,520 MW and 115 MW of battery storage capacity , three of which were under construction and achieved
commercial operations in the first quarter of 2022. In September 2022, subsidiaries of NextEra Energy Resources completed the
sale to a NEP subsidiary of a 67% controlling ownership interest in a battery storage facility with storage capacity of 230 MW. In
December 2022, subsidiaries of NextEra Energy Resources sold (i) a 49% controlling ownership interest in three wind generation
facilities and one solar plus battery facility with a total generating capacity of 1,437 MW and 65 MW of battery storage capacity , two
of which facilities are currently under construction with expected in service dates in 2023, and (ii) their 100% ownership interest in
three wind generation facilities with a total generating capacity of 347 MW to a NEP subsidiary . See Note 1 – Disposal of
Businesses/Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests.
In March 2021, a wholly owned subsidiary of NEET  acquired GridLiance Holdco, LP and GridLiance GP, LLC (GridLiance), which
owns and operates three FERC-regulated transmission utilities across six states, five in the Midwest and Nevada. See Note 6 –
GridLiance.
In October 2022, a wholly owned subsidiary of NextEra Energy Resources entered into several agreements to acquire 100% of a
portfolio of renewable energy projects as well as the related service provider . See Note 6 – RNG Acquisition.
NEE's effective income tax rates for the years ended December 31, 2022  and 2021  were approx imately 15% and 11%, respectively .
The rates for both years reflect the impact of PTCs and ITCs. See Note 5. In August 2022, the IRA was enacted which significantly
expanded tax incentives for clean energy (see Item 1. Business – NEER – Clean Energy and Other Operations – Clean Energy –
Policy Incentives for Renewable Energy Projects and Note 5).
On January 1, 2021, FPL and Gulf Power Company merged, with FPL as the surviving entity . However , during 2021, FPL continued
to be regulated as two separate ratemaking entities in the former service areas of FPL and Gulf Power Company . Effective January
1, 2022, FPL became regulated as one electric ratemaking entity with new unified rates and tariffs, and also became one reportable
segment of NEE. See Item 1. Business – FPL – FPL Regulation – FPL Electric Rate Regulation – Base Rates – Base Rates
Effective January 2022 through December 2025. As a result, the previous  segments known as the FPL segment and Gulf Power are
no longer separate reportable segments.  See Note 16.
NEE, including FPL, is monitoring solar supply chain disruptions from Southeast Asian locatio ns and is taking steps intended to
mitigate potential risks to their solar project deve lopment and construction activities. To date, there has been no material impact on
NEE's or FPL's operations or financial performance as a result of these activities.
FPL: Results of Operations
FPL obtains its operating  revenues primarily from the sale of electricity to retail customers at rates established by the FPSC through
base rates and cost recovery clause mechanisms. FPL’s net income for 2022 and 2021 was $3,701 million and $3,206 million,
respectively , representin g an increase of $495 million. The increase was primarily driven by higher earnings from investments in
plant in service and other property . Such inves tments grew FPL's average rate base by approximately $5.6 billion in 2022 and
reflect, amon g other things, the addition of the 1,246 MW Dania Beach Clean Energy Center which was placed in service on May 31,
2022, solar generation additions and ongoing transmission and distribution additions.
During 2022 , FPL's service area was impacted  by Hurricane Ian and Hurricane Nicole, and FPL incurred total recoverable storm
restoration costs of approximately $1.3 billion. In January 2023, FPL filed a petition with the FPSC  requesting the recovery of eligible
storm restor ation costs over the storm reserve amount plus an amount to replenish the storm reserve through an interim surcharge.
See Note 1 – Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm Cost Recovery .
37
Table of Contents
The use of reserve amortization is permitted by the 2021 rate agreement and was also permitte d by the 2016 rate agreement. See
Item 1. Business – FPL – FPL Regulation – FPL Electric Rate Regulation – Base Rates – Base Rates Effective January 2022
through December 2025 and – Base Rates Effective January 2017 through December 2021 for additional information on these rate
agreements. In order to earn a targeted regulatory ROE, subject to limitations associated with the 2021 and 2016 rate agreements,
reserve amortization is calculated using a trailing  thirteen-month average of retail rate base and capital structure in conjunction with
the trailing twelve month s regulatory retail base net operating income, which primarily includes the retail base portion of base and
other revenues, net of O&M, depreciation and amortization, interest and tax expenses. In gene ral, the net impact of these income
statement line items must be adjusted, in part, by reserve amortization to earn the targeted regulatory ROE. In certain periods,
reserve amortization is reversed so as not to exceed the targeted regulatory ROE. The drivers of FPL's net income not reflected in
the reserve amortization  calculation typically include wholesale and transmission service revenues and expenses, cost recovery
clause revenues and expenses, AFUDC – equity and revenue and costs not recoverable from retail customers. In 2022 and 2021,
FPL recorded a one-time reserve amortization  adjustment of approximately $114 million, discussed under Depreciation and
Amortization Expense below , and reserve amor tization of $429 million, respectively . FPL's regulatory ROE for 2022 and for 2021
was approximately 11.74% and 11.60%, respectively .
In December 2021, the FPSC issued a final order approving the 2021 rate agreement which became effective in January 2022 and
will remain in effect until at least December 2025, establishes FPL's allowed regulatory ROE, and allows for retail rate base
increases in 2022 and 2023. On February 8, 2023, the Florida Supreme Court heard oral argume nt on the appeal of the FPSC's final
order regard ing the 2021 rate agreement by Floridians Against Increased Rates, Inc. and, as a group, Florida Rising, Inc.,
Environmental Confeder ation of Southwest Florid a, Inc. and League of United Latin American Citizens of Florida. See Note 1 – Rate
Regulation.
During 2022 , operating revenues increased $3,180 million primarily related to higher fuel cost recovery revenues as discussed in
cost recovery clauses below .
Retail Base
FPL’s retail base revenu es for 2022 reflect the 2021 rate agreement and for 2021 reflect the 2016 rate agreement. Retail base
revenues increased approximately $898 million during the year ended December 31, 2022 primarily related to new retail base rates
under the 2021 rate agreement. Retail revenues were also impacted by an increase of approxima tely 1.5% in the average usage per
retail customer , primarily related to favorable weather when compared to the prior year, and an increase of 1.5% in the average
number of customer accounts. See Note 1 – Rate Regulation.
Cost Recovery Clauses
Revenues from fuel and other cost recovery clauses and pass-through costs, such as franchi se fees, revenue taxes and storm-
related surch arges, are largely a pass-through of costs. Such revenues also include a return on investment allowed to be recovered
through the cost recovery clauses on certain assets, primarily related to certain solar , environmental projects, storm protection plan
investments and the unamortized balance of the regulatory asset associated with FPL's acquisition of certain generation facilities.
See Item 1. Business – FPL – FPL Regulation – FPL Electric Rate Regulation – Cost Recover y Clauses. Under-recovery or over-
recovery of cost recovery clause and other pass-through costs (deferred clause and franchise expenses and revenues) can
significantly affect NEE's and FPL's operating cash flows. The 2022 net under-recovery impact ing FPL's operating cash flows was
approximately $1,465 million, primarily related to the fuel cost recovery clause.
Fuel cost recovery revenues increased approxim ately $1,716 million in 2022 primarily as a result of higher fuel and energy prices.
The increase in operatin g revenues in 2022 also reflects higher other revenues of approximat ely $566 million primarily related to
increases in cost recovery clause revenue from storm protection plan and environmental, franchi se fees and gross receipts taxes. In
2022 and 2021, cost recovery clauses contributed approximately $261 million and $188 million, respectively , to FPL’s net income. In
January 2023, FPL filed with the FPSC to recover approximately $2.1 billion of under-recovere d fuel costs incurred in 2022. See
Note 1 – Rate Regulation.
Other Items Impacting FPL's Consolidated Statements of Income
Fuel, Purchase Power and Interchange Expense
Fuel, purchased power and interchange expense increased $1,732 million in 2022 primarily related to higher fuel and energy prices.
38
Table of Contents
Depreciation and Amortization Expense
The major components of FPL ’s depreciation and amortization expense are as follows:
Years Ended December 31,
2022 2021
(millions)
Reserve amortization recorded under the 2021 and 2016 rate agreements $ — $ (429)
One-time reserve adjustment recorded under the 2021 rate agreement (114) — 
Other depreciation and amortization recovered under base rates (excluding reserve amortization) and other 2,404 2,340 
Depreciation and amortization primarily recovered under cost recovery clauses and securitized storm-
recovery cost amortization 405 355 
Total $ 2,695 $ 2,266 
Depreciation expense increased $429 million during 2022 primarily reflecting the absence of reserve amortization recorded in 2021.
In 2022, FPL recorded a one-time reserve amortization adjustment of approximately $114 million as required under the 2021 rate
agreement, 50% of which was used to reduce the capital recovery regulatory asset balance and the other 50% to increase the storm
reserve regulatory liability . Reserve amortization , or reversal of such amortization, reflects adjustments to accrued asset removal
costs provided under the 2021 and 2016 rate agreements in order to achieve the targeted regul atory ROE. Reserve amortization is
recorded as either an increase or decrease to accrued asset removal costs which is reflected in noncurrent regulatory assets on
NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets. At December 31, 2022, $1,450 million of reserve amortization remains available
under the 2021 rate agreement.
NEER: Results of Operations
NEER owns, develops, constructs, manages and operates electric generation facilities in wholesale energy markets in the U.S. and
Canada and also includes assets and investments in other businesses with a clean energy focus, such as battery storage and
renewable fuels. NEER also provides full energy and capacity requirements services, engages in power and fuel marketing and
trading activities, owns, develops, constructs and operates rate-regulated transmission facilities and transmission lines and invests in
natural gas, natural gas liquids and oil production and pipeline infrastructure assets. NEER’ s net income less net loss attributable to
noncontrolling interests for 2022  and 2021 was $285 million and $599 million, respectively , resulting in a decrease  in 2022 of $314
million. The primary drivers, on an after-tax basis, of the change are in the following table.
Increase (Decrease)
From Prior Period
Year Ended December 31, 2022
(millions)
New investments $ 85 
Existing clean energy 45 
Gas infrastructure (32)
Customer supply and proprietary power and gas trading 241 
NEET 13 
Other, including interest expense, corporate general and administrative expenses and other investment income (106)
Change in non-qualifying hedge activity 478 
Change in unrealized gains/losses on equity securities held in nuclear decommissioning funds and OTTI, net (523)
NEP investment gains, net 159 
Impairment charges related to investment in Mountain Valley Pipeline (674)
Change in net income less net loss attributable to noncontrolling interests $ (314)
______________________
(a)    Reflects after-tax project contributions, including the net effect of deferred income taxes and other benefits associated with PTCs and ITCs for wind, solar and
storage projects, as applicable (see Note 1 – Income Taxes and – Sales of Differential Membership Interests and Note 5), but excludes allocation of interest expense
and corporate general and administrative expenses. Results from projects, pipelines and rate-regulated transmission facilities and transmission lines are included in
new investments during the first twelve months of operation or ownership. Project results, including repowered wind projects, are included in existing clean energy,
pipeline results are included in gas infrastructure and rate-regulated transmission facilities and transmission lines are included in NEET beginning with the thirteenth
month of operation or ownership.
(b)    Excludes allocation of interest expense and corporate general and administrative expenses.
(c)    See Overview – Adjusted Earnings for additional information.
(d)    See Note 4 – Nonrecurring Fair Value Measurements for a discussion of the first quarter 2022 impairment charge related to the investment in Mountain Valley
Pipeline.(a)
(a)
(a)
(b)
(a)
(c)
(c)
(c)
(c)(d)
39
Table of Contents
Customer Supply and Proprietary Power and Gas Trading
In 2022, results from customer supply and proprietary power and gas trading increased primarily due to higher margins.
Other Factors
Supplemental to the primary drivers of the changes in NEER's results discussed above, the discussion below describes changes in
certain line items set forth in NEE's consolidated statements of income as they relate to NEER.
Operating Revenues
Operating revenues for 2022 increased $667 million primarily due to:
•net increases in revenue s of approximately $382  million from the customer supply , proprietary power and gas trading, and gas
infrastructure businesses,
•revenues from new investments of $256 million, and
•higher reven ues from existing clean energy assets of $114 million primarily due to higher wind revenues as compared to the
prior year which was impacted by severe prolonged winter weather in Texas in February 2021 (February 2021 weather event),
partly of fset by ,
•the impact of non-qualifying commodity hedges due primarily to changes in energy prices ($2,670 million of losses during 2022
compared to $2,510 million of losses for 2021).
Operating Expenses – net
Operating expenses – net for 2022 increased $706 million primarily due to increases of $362 million in O&M expenses, $146 million
in depreciation expense and $138 million in fuel, purchased power and interchange expenses. The increases were primarily
associated with growth across the NEER busin esses, partly offset by lower bad debt expense associated with the February 2021
weather event (see Note 1 – Credit Losses).
Gains on Disposal of Businesses/Assets – net
In 2022, gains on disposal of businesses/assets – net primarily relate to the sale of ownership interests in wind, solar and battery
storage projects to NEP and the resolution of a contingency related to the December 2021 sale of ownership interests in wind and
solar projects. In 2021, the amount was primarily related to the sales of ownership interests in wind and solar projects to NEP and a
third party . See Note 1 – Disposal of Businesses/Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests.
Interest Expense
NEER's interest expense  for 2022 decreased $239 million primarily reflecting $323 million of favorable impacts related to changes in
the fair value of interest rate derivative instruments, partly of fset by higher interest expense primarily due to higher debt balances.
Equity in Earnings (Losses) of Equity Method Investees
NEER recognized $202 million of equity in earnings of equity method investees in 2022 compared to $666 million of equity in
earnings of equity metho d investees for the prior year. The decrease in 2022 primarily reflects an impairment charge related to the
investment in Mountain Valley Pipeline of approximately $0.8 billion recorded in the first quarter of 2022 (see Note 4 – Nonrecurring
Fair Value Measurements), partly offset by an increase in equity in earnings of NEP recorded in 2022 primarily due to changes in the
fair value of interest rate derivative instruments.
Change in Unrealized Gains (Losses) on Equity Securities Held in NEER's Nuclear Decommissioning Funds – net
In 2022, the changes in the fair value of equity securities in NEER's nuclear decommissioning funds related to unfavorable market
conditions in 2022 compared to the prior year .
Tax Credits, Benefits and Expenses
PTCs from wind and solar projects and ITCs from solar , battery storage and certain wind projects are included in NEER’ s earnings.
PTCs are recognized as wind and solar energy is generated and sold based on a per kWh rate prescribed in applicable federal and
state statutes. Reflected in income taxes in NEE's consolidated statements of income are PTCs totaling approximately $82 million
and $90 million and ITCs totaling $126 million and $237 million in 2022 and 2021, respectively . See Note 1 – Income Taxes for a
discussion of PTCs and ITCs and Note 5.
Corporate and Other: Results of Operations
Corporate and Other is primarily comprised of the operating results of other business activities, as well as corporate interest income
and expenses. Corporate and Other allocates a portion of NEECH's corporate interest expense to NextEra Energy Resources.
Interest expense is allocated based on a deem ed capital structure of 70% debt and differential membership interests sold by
NextEra Energy Resources' subsidiaries.
Corporate and Other's results increased $393 million during 2022  prima rily due to favorable after-tax impacts of approximately $402
million, as compared to the prior year, related to non-qualifying hedge activity as a result of changes in the fair value of interest rate
derivative instruments.
40
Table of Contents
LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
NEE and its subsidiaries  require funds to support and grow their businesses. These funds are used for, among other things, working
capital (see Note 1 – Rate Regulation regard ing FPL's under-recovered fuel costs in 2022 and Note 1 – Storm Funds, Storm
Reserves and Storm Cost Recovery ), capital expenditures (see Note 15 – Commitments), investments in or acquisitions of assets
and businesses (see Note 6), payment of maturing debt and related derivative obligations (see Note 13 and Note 3) and, from time
to time, redemption or repurchase of outstandin g debt or equity securities. It is anticipated that these requirements will be satisfied
through a combination of cash flows from opera tions, short- and long-term borrowings, the issuance of short- and long-term debt
and, from time to time, equity securities, proceeds from differential membership investors and sales of assets to NEP or third parties
(see Note 1 – Disposal of Businesses/ Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests) , consistent with NEE’ s and FPL’s
objective of maintaining,  on a long-term basis, a capital structure that will support a strong investment grade credit rating. NEE, FPL
and NEECH rely on access to credit and capital markets as significant sources of liquidity for capital requirements and other
operations that are not satisfied by operating cash flows. The inability of NEE, FPL and NEECH to maintain their current credit
ratings could  affect their ability to raise short- and long-term capital, their cost of capital and the execution of their respective
financing strategies, and could require the posting of additional collateral under certain agreements.
In October 2015, NEE authorized a program to purchase, from time to time, up to $150 million of common units representing limited
partner interests in NEP. Under the program, purchases may be made in amounts, at prices  and at such times as NEE or its
subsidiaries deem appropriate, all subject to market conditions and other considerations. The purchases may be made in the open
market or in privately negotiated transactions. Any purchases will be made in such quantities, at such prices, in such manner and on
such terms and conditio ns as determined by NEE or its subsidiaries in their discretion, based on factors such as market and
business conditions, applicable legal requirements and other factors. The common unit purchas e program does not require NEE to
acquire any specific number of common units and may be modified or terminated by NEE at any time. The purpose of the program is
not to cause NEP’ s common units to be delisted from the New York Stock Exchange or to cause the common units to be
deregistered with the SEC. As of December 31, 2022, the dollar value of units that may yet be purchased by NEE under this
program was $114 million. At December 31, 2022, NEE owned a noncontrolling general partner interest in NEP and beneficially
owned approximately 54.4% of NEP’ s voting power .
41
Table of Contents
Cash Flows
NEE's sources and uses of cash for 2022, 2021 and 2020 were as follows:
Years Ended December 31,
2022 2021 2020
(millions)
Sources of cash:
Cash flows from operating activities $ 8,262 $ 7,553 $ 7,983 
Issuances of long-term debt, including premiums and discounts 13,856 16,683 12,404 
Proceeds from differential membership investors 4,158 2,779 3,522 
Sale of independent power and other investments of NEER 1,564 2,761 1,012 
Issuances of common stock/equity units – net 1,460 14 — 
Net increase in commercial paper and other short-term debt 957 — — 
Payments from related parties under a cash sweep and credit support agreement – net 240 47 — 
Proceeds from sale of noncontrolling interests — 65 501 
Other sources – net 89 40 83 
Total sources of cash 30,586 29,942 25,505 
Uses of cash:
Capital expenditures, independent power and other investments and nuclear fuel purchases (19,283) (16,077) (14,610)
Retirements of long-term debt (4,525) (9,594) (6,103)
Net decrease in commercial paper and other short-term debt — (426) (907)
Payments to related parties under a cash sweep and credit support agreement – net — — (2)
Issuances of common stock/equity units – net — — (92)
Dividends (3,352) (3,024) (2,743)
Other uses – net (1,294) (1,052) (590)
Total uses of cash (28,454) (30,173) (25,047)
Effects of currency translation on cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash (7) 1 (20)
Net increase (decrease) in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash $ 2,125 $ (230)$ 438 
For significant financing activity that occurred in February 2023, see Note 13.
NEE's prima ry capital requirements are for expanding and enhancing FPL's electric system and generation facilities to continue to
provide reliable service to meet customer electricity demands and for funding NEER's investme nts in independent power and other
projects. See Note 15 – Commitments for estimated capital expenditures in 2023 through 2027.
The following table provides a summary of capital investments for 2022 , 2021  and 2020 .
Years Ended December 31,
2022 2021 2020
(millions)
FPL:
Generation:
New $ 2,079 $ 1,046 $ 1,681 
Existing 1,804 1,531 1,266 
Transmission and distribution 4,553 4,495 3,536 
Nuclear fuel 118 159 203 
General and other 581 878 737 
Other, primarily change in accrued property additions and exclusion of AFUDC – equity 50 (539) 256 
Total 9,185 7,570 7,679 
NEER:
Wind 3,481 3,777 3,359 
Solar (includes solar plus battery storage projects) 2,869 2,011 1,920 
Other clean energy 827 332 168 
Nuclear, including nuclear fuel 214 241 125 
Natural gas pipelines 236 229 269 
Other gas infrastructure 1,215 669 572 
Rate-regulated transmission (2021 includes the acquisition of Gridliance, see Note 6 – Gridliance) 431 980 360 
Other 372 124 120 
Total 9,645 8,363 6,893 
Corporate and Other 453 144 38 
Total capital expenditures, independent power and other investments and nuclear fuel purchases $ 19,283 $ 16,077 $ 14,610 
42
Table of Contents
Liquidity
At Decembe r 31, 2022, NEE's total net available  liquidity was approximately $12.5 billion. The table below provides the components
of FPL's and NEECH's net available liquidity at December 31, 2022.
Maturity Date
FPL NEECH Total FPL NEECH
(millions)
Syndicated revolving credit facilities $3,798 $6,257 $10,055 2023 – 2027 2023 – 2027
Issued letters of credit (3) (1,035) (1,038)
3,795 5,222 9,017 
Bilateral revolving credit facilities 680 2,850 3,530 2023 – 2025 2023 – 2024
Borrowings — — — 
680 2,850 3,530 
Letter of credit facilities — 3,350 3,350 2023 – 2025
Issued letters of credit — (2,665) (2,665)
— 685 685 
Bilateral revolving credit and letter of credit facilities — 1,000 1,000 2023
Borrowings — — — 
Issued letters of credit — — — 
— 1,000 1,000 
Subtotal 4,475 9,757 14,232 
Cash and cash equivalents 25 1,575 1,600 
Commercial paper and other short-term borrowings outstanding (1,909) (1,168) (3,077)
Amounts due to related parties under the CSCS agreement (see Note 8) — (298) (298)
Net available liquidity $2,591 $9,866 $12,457 
______________________
(a)    Provide for the funding of loans up to the amount of the credit facility and the issuance of letters of credit up to $2,525 million ($650 million for FPL and $1,875 million
for NEECH). The entire amount of the credit facilities is available for general corporate purposes and to provide additional liquidity in the event of a loss to the
companies’ or their subsidiaries’ operating facilities (including, in the case of FPL, a transmission and distribution property loss). FPL’s syndicated revolving credit
facilities are also available to support the purchase of $1,334 million of pollution control, solid waste disposal and industrial development revenue bonds in the event
they are tendered by individual bondholders and not remarketed prior to maturity as well as the repayment of approximately $1,327 million of floating rate notes in
the event an individual noteholder requires repayment at specified dates prior to maturity. Approximately $3,130 million of FPL's and $3,844 million of NEECH's
syndicated revolving credit facilities expire in 2027, respectively.
(b)    In February 2023, FPL and NEECH updated the capacity and extended the maturity date for a portion of their syndicated credit facilities resulting in total capacity
under their syndicated credit facilities of $3,420 million and $10,739 million, respectively, with maturity dates ranging from 2025 – 2028 and 2024 – 2028,
respectively.
(c)    Only available for the funding of loans. In February 2023, NEECH reduced its capacity under bilateral revolving credit facilities to $900 million.
(d)    Only available for the issuance of letters of credit.
(e)    Provide for the funding of loans and issuance of letters of credit up to an aggregate total of the amount of each credit facility.
Approximately 75 banks, located globally , participate in FPL’s and NEECH’ s revolving credit facilities, with no one bank providing
more than 5% of the combined revolving  credit facilities. Pursuan t to a 1998 guarantee agreement, NEE guarant ees the payment of
NEECH’ s debt obligations under its revolving credit facilities. In order for FPL or NEECH to borrow or to have letters of credit issued
under the terms of their respective revolving credit facilities and, also for NEECH, its letter of credit facilities, FPL, in the case of FPL,
and NEE, in the case of NEECH, are required, among other things, to maintain a ratio of funded debt to total capitalization that does
not exceed a stated ratio. The FPL and NEECH revolving credit facilities also contain default and related acceleration provisions
relating to, among other things, failure of FPL and NEE, as the case may be, to maintain the respective ratio of funded debt to total
capitalization at or below the specified ratio. At December 31, 2022, each of NEE and FPL  was in compliance with its required ratio.
Capital Support
Guarantees, Letters of Credit, Surety Bonds and Indemnifications (Guarantee Arrangements)
Certain subsidiaries of NEE issue guarantees and obtain letters of credit and surety bonds, as well as provide indemnities, to
facilitate commercial transactions with third parties and financings. Substantially all of the guarantee arrangements are on behalf of
NEE’ s conso lidated subsidiaries, as discussed in more detail below . See Note 8 regarding guarantees of obligations on behalf of
NEP subsidiaries. NEE is not required to recognize liabilities associated with guarantee arrangements issued on behalf of its
consolidated subsidiarie s unless it becomes probable that they will be required to perform. At December 31, 2022, NEE believes that
there is no material exposure related to these guarantee arrangements.(a)(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
43
Table of Contents
NEE subsid iaries issue guarantees related to equity contribution agreements and engineer ing, procurement and construction
agreements, associated with the development, construction and financing of certain power generation facilities and a natural gas
pipeline project under construction, as well as a related natural gas transportation agreement. Commitments associated with these
activities are included and/or disclosed in the contracts table in Note 15.
In addition, at December  31, 2022, NEE subsidiaries had approximately $5.5 billion in guarantee s related to obligations under PPAs,
nuclear-related activities, payment obligations related to PTCs, support for NEER's retail electricity provider activities, as well as
other types of contractual obligations (see Note 4 – Contingent Consideration and Note 15 – Commitments).
In some instances, subsidiaries of NEE elect to issue guarantees instead of posting other forms  of collateral required under certain
financing arrangements, as well as for other project-level cash management activities. At December 31, 2022, these guarantees
totaled approximately $636 million and support, among other things, cash management activities, including those related to debt
service and operations and maintenance service agreements, as well as other specific project financing requirements.
Subsidiaries of NEE also issue guarantees to support customer supply and proprietary power and gas trading activities, including the
buying and selling of wholesale energy commodities. At December 31, 2022, the estimated mark-to-market exposure (the total
amount that these subsidiaries of NEE could be required to fund based on energy commodity market prices at December 31, 2022)
plus contract settlement net payables, net of collateral posted for obligations under these guarantees totaled approximately $3.4
billion.
At Decembe r 31, 2022, subsidiaries of NEE also had approximately $5.4 billion of standby letters of credit and approximately $1.1
billion of surety bonds to support certain of the commercial activities discussed above. FPL's and NEECH's credit facilities are
available to support substantially all of the standby letters of credit.
In addition, as part of contract negotiations in the normal course of business, certain subsidiaries of NEE have agreed and in the
future may agree to make payments to compens ate or indemnify other parties, including those associated with asset divestitures, for
possible unfavorable financial consequences resulting from specified events. The specified events may include, but are not limited
to, an advers e judgment  in a lawsuit, or the imposition of additional taxes due to a change in tax law or interpretations of the tax law.
NEE is unable to estim ate the maximum potential amount of future payments by its subsidiar ies under some of these contracts
because events that would obligate them to make payments have not yet occurred or, if any such event has occurred, they have not
been notified of its occurrence.
NEECH, a 100% owned subsidiary of NEE, provides funding for, and holds ownership interes ts in, NEE's operating subsidiaries
other than FPL. NEE has fully and unconditionally guaranteed certain payment obligations of NEECH, including most of its debt and
all of its debentures registered pursuant to the Securities Act of 1933 and commercial paper  issuances, as well as most of its
payment guarantees and indemnifications, and NEECH has guaranteed certain debt and other obligations of subsidiaries within the
NEER segment. Certain guarantee arrangements described above contain requirements for NEECH and FPL to maintain a specified
credit rating. For a discussion of credit rating downgrade triggers, see Credit Ratings below .
NEE fully and unconditio nally guarantees NEECH debentures pursuant to a guarantee agreeme nt, dated as of June 1, 1999 (1999
guarantee) and NEECH junior subordinated debentures pursuant to an indenture, dated as of September 1, 2006 (2006 guarantee).
The 1999 guarantee is an unsecured obligation of NEE and ranks equally and ratably with all other unsecured and unsubordinated
indebtedness of NEE. The 2006 guarantee is unsecured and subordinate and junior in right of payment to NEE senior indebtedness
(as defined therein). No payment on those junio r subordinated debentures may be made under the 2006 guarantee until all NEE
senior indebtedness has been paid in full in certain circumstances. NEE’ s and NEECH’ s ability to meet their financial obligations are
primarily dependent on their subsidiaries’  net income, cash flows and their ability to pay upstre am dividends or to repay funds to
NEE and NEECH. The dividend-paying ability of some of the subsidiaries is limited by contractual restrictions which are contained in
outstanding financing agreements.
44
Table of Contents
Summarized financial information of NEE and NEECH is as follows:
Year Ended December 31, 2022
Issuer/Guarantor
CombinedNEECH
ConsolidatedNEE
Consolidated
(millions)
Operating revenues $ (16)$ 3,848 $ 20,956 
Operating income (loss) $ (339)$ (978)$ 4,081 
Net income (loss) $ 150 $ (453)$ 3,246 
Net income (loss) attributable to NEE/NEECH $ 150 $ 448 $ 4,147 
December 31, 2022
Issuer/Guarantor
CombinedNEECH
ConsolidatedNEE
Consolidated
(millions)
Total current assets $ 376 $ 8,087 $ 13,490 
Total noncurrent assets $ 2,861 $ 64,766 $ 145,445 
Total current liabilities $ 5,922 $ 18,840 $ 26,695 
Total noncurrent liabilities $ 29,223 $ 44,724 $ 82,804 
Redeemable noncontrolling interests $ — $ 1,110 $ 1,110 
Noncontrolling interests $ — $ 9,097 $ 9,097 
______________________
(a)    Excludes intercompany transactions, and investments in, and equity in earnings of, subsidiaries.
(b)    Information has been prepared on the same basis of accounting as NEE's consolidated financial statements.
Shelf Registration
In March 2021, NEE, NEECH and FPL filed a shelf registration statement with the SEC for an unspecified amount of securities,
which became effective upon filing. The amount of securities issuable by the companies is established from time to time by their
respective boards of directors. Securities that may be issued under the registration statement include, depending on the registrant,
senior debt securities, subordinated debt securities, junior subordinated debentures, first mortgage bonds, common stock, preferred
stock, depositary shares, stock purchase contracts, stock purchase units, warrants and guarantees related to certain of those
securities.(a) (b) (b)
(a) (b) (b)
45
Table of Contents
Credit Ratings
NEE’ s liquid ity, ability to access credit and capital markets, cost of borrowings and collateral posting requirements under certain
agreements is dependent on its and its subsidiaries credit ratings. At February 17, 2023, Moody’ s Investors Service, Inc. (Moody’ s),
S&P Global Ratings (S&P) and Fitch Ratings, Inc. (Fitch) had assigned the following credit ratings to NEE, FPL  and NEECH:
Moody's S&P Fitch
NEE:
Corporate credit rating Baa1 A- A-
FPL:
Corporate credit rating A1 A A
First mortgage bonds Aa2 A+ AA-
Senior unsecured notes A1 A A+
Pollution control, solid waste disposal and industrial development revenue bonds VMIG-1/P-1 A-1 F1
Commercial paper P-1 A-1 F1
NEECH:
Corporate credit rating Baa1 A- A-
Debentures Baa1 BBB+ A-
Junior subordinated debentures Baa2 BBB BBB
Commercial paper P-2 A-2 F2
_________________________
(a)    A security rating is not a recommendation to buy, sell or hold securities and should be evaluated independently of any other rating. The rating is subject to revision or
withdrawal at any time by the assigning rating organization.
(b)    The outlook indicated by each of Moody's, S&P and Fitch is stable.
(c)    Short-term ratings are presented as substantially all bonds outstanding are currently paying a short-term interest rate. At FPL's election, a portion or all of the bonds
may be adjusted to a long-term interest rate.
NEE and its subsidiaries have no credit rating downgrade triggers that would accelerate the maturity dates of outstanding debt. A
change in ratings is not an event of default under  applicable debt instruments, and while there are conditions to drawing on the credit
facilities noted above, the maintenance of a specific minimum credit rating is not a condition to drawing on these credit facilities.
Commitment fees and interest rates on loans under these credit facilities’  agreements are tied to credit ratings. A ratings downgrade
also could reduce the accessibility and increase the cost of commercial paper and other short-te rm debt issuances and borrowings
and addition al or replacement credit facilities. In addition, a ratings downgrade could result in, among other things, the requirement
that NEE subsidiaries post collateral under certain agreements and guarantee arrangements, including, but not limited to, those
related to fuel procurement, power sales and purchases, nuclear decommissioning funding,  debt-related reserves and trading
activities. FPL ’s and NEECH’ s credit facilities are available to support these potential requirements.
Covenants
NEE's chart er does not limit the dividends that may be paid on its common stock. As a practical matter , the ability of NEE to pay
dividends on its common stock is dependent upon, among other things, dividends paid to it by its subsidiaries. For example, FPL
pays dividends to NEE in a manner consistent  with FPL's long-term targeted capital structure. However , the mortgage securing
FPL's first mortgage bonds contains provisions which, under certain conditions, restrict the payment of dividends to NEE and the
issuance of additional first mortgage bonds. Additionally , in some circumstances, the mortgage restricts the amount of retained
earnings that FPL can use to pay cash dividends on its common stock. The restricted amount may change based on factors set out
in the mortg age. Other than this restriction on the payment of common stock dividends, the mortgage does not restrict FPL's use of
retained earnings. At December 31, 2022, no retained earnings were restricted by these provisions of the mortgage and, in light of
FPL's curren t financial condition and level of earnings, management does not expect that planned financing activities or dividends
would be af fected by these limitations.
FPL may issue first mortgage bonds under its mortgage subject to its meeting an adjusted  net earnings test set forth in the
mortgage, which generally  requires adjusted net earnings to be at least twice the annual interest requirements on, or at least 10% of
the aggregate principal amount of, FPL’s first mortgage bonds including those to be issued and any other non-junior FPL
indebtedness. At December 31, 2022, coverage for the 12 months ended December 31, 2022 would have been approximately 9.4
times the annual interest requirements and approximately 3.9 times the aggregate principal requirements. New first mortgage bonds
are also limited to an amount equal to the sum of 60% of unfunded property additions after adjustments to offset property
retirements, the amount of retired first mortgage  bonds or qualified lien bonds and the amount of cash on deposit with the mortgage
trustee. At December 31, 2022, FPL could have issued in excess of $33.6 billion of additional first mortgage bonds based on the
unfunded property additions and retired first mortgage bonds. At December 31, 2022, no cash  was deposited with the mortgage
trustee for these purposes.(a) (a) (a)
(b)
(b)
(c)
(b)
46
Table of Contents
In September 2006, NEE and NEECH executed a Replacement Capital Covenant (as amended, September 2006 RCC) in
connection with NEECH 's offering of $350 million principal amount of Series B Enhanced Junior Subordinated Debentures due 2066
(Series B junior subordinated debentures). The September 2006 RCC is for the benefit of perso ns that buy, hold or sell a specified
series of long-term indebtedness (covered debt) of NEECH (other than the Series B junior subordinated debentures) or, in certain
cases, of NEE. NEECH 's 3.50% Debentures, Series due April 1, 2029 have been designated as the covered debt under the
September 2006 RCC. The September 2006 RCC provides that NEECH may redeem, and NEE or NEECH may purchase, any
Series B junior subordina ted debentures on or before October 1, 2036, only to the extent that the redemption or purchase price does
not exceed a specified amount of proceeds from the sale of qualifying securities, subject to certain limitations described in the
September 2006 RCC. Qualifying securities are securities that have equity-like characteristics that are the same as, or more equity-
like than, the Series B junior subordinated deben tures at the time of redemption or purchase, which are sold within 365 days prior to
the date of the redemption or repurchase of the Series B junior subordinated debentures.
In June 2007, NEE and NEECH executed a Replacement Capital Covenant (as amended, June 2007 RCC) in connection with
NEECH's offering of $400 million principal amount of its Series C Junior Subordinated Debentures due 2067 (Series C junior
subordinated debentures ). The June 2007 RCC is for the benefit of persons that buy, hold or sell a specified series of covered debt
of NEECH (other than the Series C junior subordinated debentures) or, in certain cases, of NEE. NEECH's 3.50% Debentures,
Series due April 1, 2029  have been designated as the covered debt under the June 2007 RCC. The June 2007 RCC provides that
NEECH may redeem or purchase, or satisfy , discharge or defease (collectively , defease), and NEE and any majority-owned
subsidiary of NEE or NEECH may purchase, any Series C junior subordinated debentures on or before June 15, 2037, only to the
extent that the principal amount defeased or the applicable redemption or purchase price does not exceed a specified amount raised
from the issuance, during the 365 days prior to the date of that redemption, purchase or defeasance, of qualifying securities that
have equity-like characteristics that are the same as, or more equity-like than, the applicable characteristics of the Series C junior
subordinated debenture s at the time of redemp tion, purchase or defeasance, subject to certain limitations described in the June
2007 RCC.
New Accounting Rules and Interpretations
Reference Rate Reform  – In March 2020, the Financial Accounting Standards Board issued an accounting standards update which
provides certain options to apply accounting guidance on contract modifications and hedge accounting as companies transition from
the London Inter-Bank Offered Rate and other interbank offered rates to alternative reference rates. See Note 1 – Reference Rate
Reform.
CRITICAL ACCOUNTING POLICIES AND ESTIMATES
NEE’ s signif icant accounting policies are described in Note 1 to the consolidated financial statements, which were prepared under
GAAP . Critical accounting policies are those that NEE believes are both most important to the portrayal of its financial condition and
results of operations, and require complex, subjective judgments, often as a result of the need to make estimates and assumptions
about the effect of matters that are inherently uncertain. Judgments and uncertainties affecting the application of those policies may
result in materially dif ferent amounts being reported under dif ferent conditions or using dif ferent assumptions.
NEE considers the following policies to be the most critical in understanding the judgments that are involved in preparing its
consolidated financial statements:
Accounting for Derivatives and Hedging Activities
NEE uses derivative instruments (primarily swaps, options, futures and forwards) to manage the physical and financial risks inherent
in the purchase and sale of fuel and electricity , as well as interest rate and foreign currency exchange rate risk associated primarily
with outstanding and expected future debt issuances and borrowings. In addition, NEE, through NEER, uses derivatives to optimize
the value of its power generation and gas infras tructure assets and engages in power and fuel marketing and trading activities to
take advantage of expected future favorable price movements.
Nature of Accounting Estimates
Accounting pronouncem ents require the use of fair value accounting if certain conditions are met, which may require significant
judgment to measure the fair value of assets and liabilities. This applies not only to traditional financial derivative instruments, but to
any contrac t having the accounting characteristics of a derivative. As a result, significant judgment must be used in applying
derivatives accounting guidance to contracts. In the event changes in interpretation occur , it is possible that contracts that currently
are excluded from deriva tives accounting rules would have to be recorded on the balance sheet at fair value, with changes in the fair
value recorded in the statement of income.
47
Table of Contents
Assumptions and Accounting Approach
Derivative instruments, when required to be marked to market, are recorded on the balance sheet at fair value using a combination
of market and income approaches. Fair values for some of the longer-term contracts where liquid markets are not available are
derived through the use of industry-standard valuation techniques, such as internally developed models which estimate the fair value
of a contract by calculat ing the present value of the difference between the contract price and the forward prices. Forward prices
represent the price at which a buyer or seller could contract today to purchase or sell a commodity at a future date. The near-term
forward market for electricity is generally liquid and therefore the prices in the early years of the forward curves reflect observable
market quotes. However , in the later years, the market is much less liquid and forward price curves must be developed using factors
including the forward prices for the commodities used as fuel to generate electricity , the expected system heat rate (which measures
the efficiency of power  plants in converting fuel to electricity) in the region where the purchase or sale takes place, and a
fundamental forecast of expected spot prices based on modeled supply and demand in the region. NEE estimates the fair value of
interest rate and foreign currency derivatives using an income approach based on a discounted cash flows valuation technique
utilizing  the net amou nt of estimated future cash inflows and outflows related to the derivative agreements. The assumptions in these
models are critical since any changes therein could have a significant impact on the fair value of the derivative.
At FPL, substantially all changes in the fair value  of energy derivative transactions are deferred as a regulatory asset or liability until
the contracts are settled, and, upon settlement, any gains or losses are passed through the  fuel clause . See Note 3.
In NEE’ s non-rate regul ated operations, predominantly NextEra Energy Resources, essentially all changes in the derivatives’  fair
value for power purchas es and sales, fuel sales and trading activities are recognized on a net basis in operating revenues and the
equity meth od investee s’ related activity is recognized in equity in earnings of equity metho d investees in NEE’ s consolidated
statements of income.
For interest rate and foreign currency derivative instruments, all changes in the derivatives' fair value are recognized in interest
expense and the equity method investees' related activity is recognized in equity in earnings of equity method investees in NEE's
consolidated statements  of income. NEE estimates the fair value of these derivatives using an income approach based on a
discounted cash flows valuation technique utilizing observable inputs.
Certain deriv ative transa ctions at NEER are entered into as economic hedges but the transaction s do not meet the requirements for
hedge accou nting, hedg e accounting treatment is not elected or hedge accounting has been discontinued. Changes in the fair value
of those transactions are marked to market and reported in the consolidated statements of income, resulting in earnings volatility .
These chan ges in fair value are reflected in the non-qualifying hedge category in computin g adjusted earnings and could be
significant to NEER’ s results because the economic offset to the positions are not marked to market. As a consequence, NEE's net
income reflects only the movement in one part of economically-linked transactions. For example, a gain (loss) in the non-qualifying
hedge category for certa in energy derivatives is offset by decreases (increases) in the fair value of related physical asset positions in
the portfolio or contracts, which are not marked to market under GAAP . For this reason, NEE’ s management views results expressed
excluding the unrealized mark-to-market impact of the non-qualifying hedges as a mean ingful measure of current period
performance. For additional information regardin g derivative instruments, see Note 3, Overview and Energy Marketing and Trading
and Market Risk Sensitivity .
Accounting for Pension Benefits
NEE sponsors a qualified noncontributory define d benefit pension plan for substantially all employees of NEE and its subsidiaries.
Management believes that, based on actuarial assumptions and the well-funded status of the pension plan, NEE will not be required
to make any cash contributions to the qualified pension plan in the near future. The qualified pension plan has a fully funded trust
dedicated to providing benefits under the plan. NEE allocates net periodic income associated with the pension plan to its
subsidiaries annually using specific criteria.
Nature of Accounting Estimates
For the pension plan, the benefit obligation is the actuarial present value, as of the December 31 measurement date, of all benefits
attributed by the pension benefit formula to employee service rendered to that date. The amount of benefit to be paid depends on a
number of future events incorporated into the pension benefit formula, including an estimate of the average remaining life of
employees/survivors as well as the average years of service rendered. The projected benefit obligation is measured based on
assumptions concerning  future interest rates and future employee compensation levels. NEE derives pension income from actuarial
calculations based on the plan’ s provisions and various management assumptions including discount rate, rate of increase in
compensation levels and expected long-term rate of return on plan assets.
Assumptions and Accounting Approach
Accounting guidance requires recognition of the funded status of the pension plan in the balance sheet, with changes in the funded
status recognized in other comprehensive income within shareholders’  equity in the year in which the changes occur .
48
Table of Contents
Since NEE is the plan sponsor , and its subsid iaries do not have separate rights to the plan assets or direct obligations to their
employees, this accounting guidance is reflected at NEE and not allocated to the subsi diaries. The portion of previously
unrecognized actuarial gains and losses and prior service costs or credits that are estimated to be allocable to FPL as net periodic
(income) cost in future periods and that otherwise would be recorded in accumulated other comprehensive income are classified as
regulatory assets and liabilities at NEE in accordance with regulatory treatment.
Net periodic pension income is calculated using a number of actuarial assumptions. Those assumptions for the years ended
December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020 include:
 2022 2021 2020
Discount rate 2.87 % 2.53 % 3.22 %
Salary increase 4.90 % 4.40 % 4.40 %
Expected long-term rate of return, net of investment management fees 7.35 % 7.35 % 7.35 %
Weighted-average interest crediting rate 3.79 % 3.82 % 3.83 %
In developing these assumptions, NEE evaluated input, including other qualitative and quantitative factors, from its actuaries and
consultants, as well as information available in the marketplace. Discount rates are established using the full yield curve approach.
In addition, for the expec ted long-term rate of return on pension plan assets, NEE considered different models, capital market return
assumptions and historical returns for a portfoli o with an equity/bond asset mix similar to its pension fund, as well as its pension
fund's histor ical compou nded returns. NEE belie ves that 7.35% has been a reasonable long-te rm rate of return, net of investment
management fees, on its pension plan assets. NEE will continue to evaluate all of its actuarial assumptions, including its expected
rate of return, at least annually , and will adjust them as appropriate.
NEE utilizes in its determination of pension income a market-related valuation of plan assets. This market-related valuation reduces
year-to-year volatility and recognizes investmen t gains or losses over a five-year period following the year in which they occur .
Investment gains or losses for this purpose are the difference between the expected return calculated using the market-related value
of plan assets and the actual return realized on those plan assets. Since the market-related value of plan assets recognizes gains or
losses over a five-year period, the future value of plan assets will be affected as previously defer red gains or losses are recognized.
Such gains and losses together with other differences between actual results and the estimates used in the actuarial valuations are
deferred and recognized in determining pensio n income only to the extent they exceed 10% of the greater of projected benefit
obligations or the market-related value of plan assets.
The followin g table illustrates the effect on net periodic pension income of changing the critical actuarial assumptions discussed
above, while holding all other assumptions constant:
Increase (Decrease) in 2022
Net Periodic Pension Income
Change in
Assumption NEE FPL
(millions)
Expected long-term rate of return 0.5% $ 25 $ 17 
Discount rate 0.5% $ (4)$ (3)
Salary increase 0.5% $ (3)$ (2)
NEE also utilizes actuari al assumptions about mortality to help estimate obligations of the pension plan. NEE has adopted the latest
revised mortality tables and mortality improvement scales released by the Society of Actuaries, which did not have a material impact
on the pension plan's obligation.
See Note 12.
Carrying Value of Long-Lived Assets
NEE evaluates long-lived assets for impairment when events or changes in circumstances indica te that the carrying amount may not
be recoverable.
Nature of Accounting Estimates
The amount of future net cash flows, the timing of the cash flows and the determination of an appropriate interest rate all involve
estimates and judgment s about future events. In particular , the aggregate amount of cash flows  determines whether an impairment
exists, and the timing of the cash flows is critical in determining fair value. Because each assessment is based on the facts and
circumstances associated with each long-lived asset, the ef fects of changes in assumptions cannot be generalized.
49
Table of Contents
Assumptions and Accounting Approach
An impairme nt loss is required to be recognized if the carrying value of the asset exceeds the undiscounted future net cash flows
associated with that asset. The impairment loss to be recognized is the amount by which the carrying value of the long-lived asset
exceeds the asset’ s fair value. In most instances, the fair value is determined by discounting estimated future cash flows using an
appropriate interest rate.
Carrying Value of Equity Method Investments
NEE evaluates its equity  method investments for impairment when events or changes in circums tances indicate that the fair value of
the investment is less than the carrying value an d the investment may be other-than-temporarily impaired.
Nature of Accounting Estimates
Indicators of a potential impairment include, but are not limited to, a series of operating losses of an investee, the absence of an
ability to recover the carrying amount of the investment, the inability of the investee to sustain an earnings capacity and a current fair
value of an investment that may be less than its carrying value. If indicators of impairment exist,  an estimate of the investment’ s fair
value will be calculated . Approaches for estim ating fair value include, among others, an income approach using a probability-
weighted discounted cash flows model and a market approach using an earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and
amortization (EBITDA) multiple model. The probability assigned to each scenario as well as the cash flows and EBITDA  multiple
identified are critical in determining fair value.
Assumptions and Accounting Approach
An impairment loss is required to be recognized if the impairment is deemed to be other than temporary . Assessment of whether an
investment is other-than-temporarily impaired involves, among other factors, consideration of the length of time that the fair value is
below the carrying value, current expected performance relative to the expected performance when the investment was initially
made, performance relative to peers, industry performance relative to the economy , credit rating, regulatory actions and legal and
permitting challenges. If management is unable to reasonably assert that an impairment is temp orary or believes that there will not
be full recovery of the carrying value of its investment, then the impairment is considered to be other than temporary . Investments
that are other-than-temporarily impaired are written down to their estimated fair value and cannot subsequently be written back up
for increases in estimated fair value. Impairment losses are recorded in equity in earnings (losses) of equity method investees in
NEE’ s consolidated statements of income. See Note 4 – Nonrecurring Fair V alue Measurements.
Decommissioning and Dismantlement
NEE accoun ts for asset retirement obligations and conditional asset retirement obligations (collectively , AROs) under accounting
guidance that requires a liability for the fair value of an ARO to be recognized in the period in which it is incurred if it can be
reasonably estimated, with the offsetting associ ated asset retirement costs capitalized as part of the carrying amount of the long-
lived assets. NEE's AROs  relate primarily to decommissioning obligations of FPL's and NEER's nuclear units and to obligations for
the dismantlement of certain of NEER's wind and solar facilities.
Nature of Accounting Estimates
The calculation of the future cost of retiring long-lived assets, including nuclear decommissioning and plant dismantlement costs,
involves estimating the amount and timing of future expenditures and making judgments concer ning whether or not such costs are
considered a legal obligation. Estimating the amount and timing of future expenditures includes, among other things, making
projections of when assets will be retired and ultimately decommissioned and how costs will escalate with inflation. In addition, NEE
also makes interest rate and rate of return projections on its investments in determining recommended funding requirements for
nuclear deco mmissioning costs. Periodically , NEE is required to update these estimates and projections which can affect the annual
expense amounts recognized, the liabilities recorded and the annual funding requirements for nuclear decommissioning costs. For
example, an increase of 0.25% in the assumed escalation rates for nuclear decommissioning costs would increase NEE’ s AROs at
December 31, 2022 by approximately  $284 million.
Assumptions and Accounting Approach
FPL – For ratemaking purpos es, FPL accrues and funds for nuclear plant decommissioning costs over the expected service life of
each unit based on studies that are approved by the FPSC. The most recent studies, filed in 2020, reflect, among other things, the
expiration dates of the operating licenses for FPL’s nuclear units at the time of the studies. FPL’s portion of the future cost of
decommissioning its four nuclear units, includin g spent fuel storage above what is expected to be refunded by the DOE under a
spent fuel settlement agreement, is estimated to be approximately $9.6 billion, or $2.5 billion expressed in 2022 dollars. The ultimate
costs of decommissionin g reflect the applications  submitted to the NRC for the extension of Turkey Point Units Nos. 3 and 4 and St.
Lucie Units Nos. 1 and 2 licenses for an additional 20 years.
50
Table of Contents
FPL accrues  the cost of dismantling its other generation plants over the expected service life of each unit based on studies filed with
the FPSC. Unlike nuclear decommissioning, dismantlement costs are not funded. The most recent studies became effective
January 1, 2022. At December 31, 2022, FPL’s portion of the ultimate cost to dismantle its other generation units is approximately
$2.4 billion, or $1.2 billion expressed in 2022 dollars. The majority of the dismantlement costs are not reported as AROs. FPL
accrues for interim removal costs over the life of the related assets based on depreciation studies approved by the FPSC. Any
differences between the amount of the ARO and the amount recorded  for ratemaking purposes are reported as a regulatory asset or
liability in accordance with regulatory accounting.
The components of FPL’s decommissioning of nuclear plants, dismantlement of plants and other accrued asset removal costs are as
follows:
Nuclear
DecommissioningOther Generation Plant
DismantlementInterim Removal
Costs and Other Total
December 31, December 31, December 31, December 31,
2022 2021 2022 2021 2022 2021 2022 2021
(millions)
AROs $ 1,807 $ 1,736 $ 362 $ 364 $ 7 $ 7 $ 2,176 $2,107 
Less capitalized ARO asset net of accumulated
depreciation 61 63 40 56 1 1 102 120 
Accrued asset removal costs 406 447 179 198 (494) (156) 91 489 
Asset retirement obligation regulatory expense
difference 3,515 4,399 (212) (218) (18) (9) 3,285 4,172 
Accrued decommissioning, dismantlement and other
accrued asset removal costs $ 5,667 $ 6,519 $ 289 $ 288 $ (506) $ (159) $ 5,450 $6,648 
______________________
(a)    See Note 11.
(b)    Included in noncurrent regulatory liabilities on NEE’s and FPL’s consolidated balance sheets, except for $532 million and $263 million which are related to interim
removal costs and are included in noncurrent regulatory assets as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. See Note 1 – Rate Regulation.
(c)    Included in noncurrent regulatory liabilities on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets, except for $38 million and $118 million which are related to other
generation plant dismantlement and are included in noncurrent regulatory assets as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively.
(d)    Represents total amount accrued for ratemaking purposes.
NEER – NEER records liabilities for the present value of its expected nuclear plant decommissioning costs which are determined
using variou s internal and external data and applying a probability percentage to a variety of scenarios regarding the life of the plant
and timing of decommissioning. The liabilities are being accreted using the interest method through the date decommissioning
activities are expected to be complete. At December 31, 2022 and 2021 , the AROs for decommissioning of NEER’ s nuclear plants
approximated $604 million and $599 million, respectively . NEER’ s portion of the ultimate cost of decommissioning its nuclear plants,
including costs associated with spent fuel storag e above what is expected to be refunded by the DOE under a spent fuel settlement
agreement, is estimated to be approximatel y $9.5 billion, or $2.0 billion  expressed in 2022 dollars.
See Note 1 – Asset Retirement Obligations and – Decommiss ioning of Nuclear Plants, Dismantlement of Plants and Other Accrued
Asset Removal Costs and Note 11.
Regulatory Accounting
Certain of NEE's busines ses are subject to rate regulation which results in the recording of regulatory assets and liabilities. See Note
1 – Rate Regulation for details regarding NEE’ s regulatory assets and liabilities.
Nature of Accounting Estimates
Regulatory assets and liabilities represent probable future revenues that will be recovered from or refunded to customers through the
ratemaking process. Regulatory assets and liabilities are included in rate base or otherwise earn (pay) a return on investment during
the recovery period.
Assumptions and Accounting Approach
Accounting guidance allows regulators to create assets and impose liabilities that would not be recorded by non-rate regulated
entities. If NEE's rate-regulated entities, primaril y FPL, were no longer subject to cost-based rate regulation, the existing regulatory
assets and liabilities would be written off unless regulators specify an alternative means of recovery or refund. In addition, the
regulators, including the FPSC for FPL, have the authority to disallow recovery of costs that they consider excessive or imprudently
incurred. Such costs may include, among others, fuel and O&M expenses, the cost of replacing power lost when generation facilities
are unavaila ble, storm restoration costs and costs associated with the construction or acquisition of new facilities. The continued
applicability of regulatory accounting is assessed at each reporting period.(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
51
Table of Contents
ENERGY MARKETING AND TRADING AND MARKET RISK SENSITIVITY
NEE and FPL are exposed to risks associated with adverse changes in commodity prices, interest rates and equity prices. Financial
instruments and positions affecting the financial statements of NEE and FPL described below are held primarily for purposes other
than trading . Market risk is measured as the potential loss in fair value resulting from hypotheti cal reasonably possible changes in
commodity prices, interest rates or equity prices over the next year. Management has established risk management policies to
monitor and manage such market risks, as well as credit risks.
Commodity Price Risk
NEE and FPL use derivative instruments (primarily swaps, options, futures and forwards) to manage the physical and financial risks
inherent in the purchase and sale of fuel and electricity . In addition, NEE, through NEER, uses derivatives to optimize the value of its
power generation and gas infrastructure assets and engages in power and fuel marketing and trading activities to take advantage of
expected future favorable price movements. See Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates – Accounting  for Derivatives and
Hedging Activities and Note 3.
During 2021 and 2022, the changes in the fair value of NEE’ s consolidated subsidiaries’  energy contract derivative instruments were
as follows:
Hedges on Owned Assets
TradingNon-
QualifyingFPL Cost
Recovery
Clauses NEE Total
(millions)
Fair value of contracts outstanding at December 31, 2020 $ 706 $ 996 $ — $ 1,702 
Reclassification to realized at settlement of contracts 179 293 (7) 465 
Value of contracts acquired 80 9 — 89 
Net option premium purchases (issuances) 23 11 — 34 
Changes in fair value excluding reclassification to realized (10) (2,701) 8 (2,703)
Fair value of contracts outstanding at December 31, 2021 978 (1,392) 1 (413)
Reclassification to realized at settlement of contracts (355) 1,094  (197) 542 
Value of contracts acquired 16 54 — 70 
Net option premium purchases (issuances) 146 12 — 158 
Changes in fair value excluding reclassification to realized 392 (3,689) 212 (3,085)
Fair value of contracts outstanding at December 31, 2022 1,177  (3,921) 16 (2,728)
Net margin cash collateral paid (received) 980 
Total mark-to-market energy contract net assets (liabilities) at December 31, 2022 $ 1,177  $ (3,921) $ 16 $ (1,748)
NEE’ s total mark-to-ma rket energy contract net assets (liabilities) at December 31, 2022 shown above are included on the
consolidated balance sheets as follows:
December 31,
2022
(millions)
Current derivative assets $ 1,413 
Noncurrent derivative assets 1,582 
Current derivative liabilities (2,014)
Noncurrent derivative liabilities (2,729)
NEE's total mark-to-market energy contract net liabilities $ (1,748)
52
Table of Contents
The sources of fair value estimates and maturity of energy contract derivative instruments at December 31, 2022 were as follows:
Maturity
2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 Thereafter Total
(millions)
Trading:
Quoted prices in active markets for identical assets $(463)$(435)$(342)$(163)$(109)$ 38 $(1,474)
Significant other observable inputs 885 769 583 360 248 236 3,081 
Significant unobservable inputs (154) (132) (34) (23) (21) (66) (430)
Total 268 202 207 174 118 208 1,177 
Owned Assets – Non-Qualifying:       
Quoted prices in active markets for identical assets (57) (74) (86) (61) (25) (36) (339)
Significant other observable inputs (897) (712) (482) (350) (273) (435) (3,149)
Significant unobservable inputs 97 (18) (11) (10) (12) (479) (433)
Total (857) (804) (579) (421) (310) (950) (3,921)
Owned Assets – FPL Cost Recovery Clauses:       
Quoted prices in active markets for identical assets — — — — — — — 
Significant other observable inputs 2 — 2 2 1 — 7 
Significant unobservable inputs 7 2 — — — — 9 
Total 9 2 2 2 1 — 16 
Total sources of fair value $(580)$(600)$(370)$(245)$(191)$ (742)$(2,728)
With respect to commodities, NEE’ s Exposure Management Committee (EMC), which is comprised of certain members of senior
management, and NEE's chief executive officer are responsible for the overall approval of marke t risk management policies and the
delegation of approval and authorization levels. The EMC and NEE's chief executive officer receive periodic updates on market
positions and related exposures, credit exposures and overall risk management activities.
NEE uses a value-at-risk (VaR) model to measu re commodity price market risk in its trading and mark-to-market portfolios. The VaR
is the estim ated loss of market value based on a one-day holding period at a 95% confiden ce level using historical simulation
methodology . The V aR figures are as follows:
TradingNon-Qualifying Hedges
and Hedges in FPL  Cost Recovery
Clauses Total
FPL NEER NEE FPL NEER NEE FPL NEER NEE
(millions)
December 31, 2021 $ — $ 17 $ 17 $ 1 $ 148 $ 148 $ 1 $ 149 $ 149 
December 31, 2022 $ — $ 41 $ 41 $ 3 $ 148 $ 145 $ 3 $ 125 $ 120 
Average for the year ended December 31,
2022 $ — $ 26 $ 26 $ 9 $ 268 $ 269 $ 9 $ 248 $ 249 
______________________
(a)    The VaR figures for the trading portfolio include positions that are marked to market. Taking into consideration offsetting unmarked non-derivative positions, such as
physical inventory, the trading VaR figures were approximately $18 million and $9 million at December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively.
(b)    Non-qualifying hedges are employed to reduce the market risk exposure to physical assets or contracts which are not marked to market. The VaR figures for the non-
qualifying hedges and hedges in FPL cost recovery clauses category do not represent the economic exposure to commodity price movements.
Interest Rate Risk
NEE's and FPL's financ ial results are exposed to risk resulting from changes in interest rates as a result of their respective
outstanding and expected future issua nces of debt, investments in spec ial use funds and other investments. NEE and FPL manage
their respec tive interest rate exposure by monitoring current interest rates, entering into interest rate contracts and using a
combination of fixed rate and variable rate debt. Interest rate contracts are used to mitigate and adjust interest rate exposure when
deemed appropriate based upon market conditions or when required by financing agreements.(a) (b)
53
Table of Contents
The following are estimates of the fair value of NEE's and FPL's financial instruments that are exposed to interest rate risk:
 December 31, 2022  December 31, 2021
 Carrying
AmountEstimated
Fair Value  Carrying
AmountEstimated
Fair Value
 (millions)
NEE:      
Fixed income securities:      
Special use funds $ 2,061 $ 2,061 $ 2,505 $ 2,505 
Other investments, primarily debt securities $ 756 $ 756 $ 311 $ 311 
Long-term debt, including current portion $ 61,889 $ 57,892 $ 52,745 $ 57,290 
Interest rate contracts – net unrealized gains (losses) $ 392 $ 392 $ (633)$ (633)
FPL:      
Fixed income securities:
Special use funds $ 1,572 $ 1,572 $ 1,934 $ 1,934 
Other investments – debt securities $ 114 $ 114 $ — $ — 
Long-term debt, including current portion $ 21,002 $ 19,364 $ 18,510 $ 21,379 
______________________
(a)    See Notes 3 and 4.
The special use funds of NEE and FPL consist of restricted funds set aside to cover the cost of storm damage for FPL and for the
decommissioning of NEE's and FPL's nuclear power plants. See Note 1 – Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm Cost Recovery .
A portion of these funds is invested in fixed income debt securities primarily carried at estimated fair value. At FPL, changes in fair
value, includ ing any credit losses, result in a corresponding adjustment to the related regulatory asset or liability accounts based on
current regulatory treatm ent. The changes in fair value for NEE's non-rate regulated operations result in a corresponding adjustment
to other comprehensive income, except for credit losses and unrealized losses on available for sale securities intended or required
to be sold prior to recovery of the amortized cost basis, which are reported in current period earnings. Because the funds set aside
by FPL for storm damage could be needed at any time, the related investments are generally more liquid and, therefore, are less
sensitive to changes in interest rates. The nuclear decommissioning funds, in contrast, are generally invested in longer-term
securities.
At Decembe r 31, 2022, NEE had interest rate contracts with a notional amount of approximately $19.7 billion to manage exposure to
the variability of cash flows primarily associated with expected future and outstanding debt issuances at NEECH and NEER. See
Note 3.
Based upon a hypothetical 10% decrease in interest rates, the fair value of NEE’ s net liabilities would increase by approxim ately
$2,041 million ($777 million f or FPL) at December 31, 2022.
Equity Price Risk
NEE and FPL are exposed to risk resulting from changes in prices for equity securit ies. For example, NEE’ s nuclear
decommissioning reserv e funds include marketable equity securities carried at their market value of approximately $4,437 million
and $5,511 million ($2,905 million and $3,552 million for FPL) at December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively . NEE's and FPL’s
investment strategy for equity securities in their nuclear decommissioning reserve funds emphasi zes marketable securities which are
broadly diversified. At December 31, 2022, a hypothetical 10% decrease in the prices quoted on stock exchanges would result in an
approximately $427 million ($280 million for FPL) reduction in fair value. For FPL, a corresponding adjustment would be made to the
related regulatory asset or liability accounts based on current regulatory treatment, and for NEE’ s non-rate regulated operations, a
corresponding amount would be recorded in change in unrealized gains (losses) on equity securities held in NEER's nuclear
decommissioning funds – net in NEE's consolidated statements of income.
Credit Risk
NEE and its subsidiaries, including FPL, are also exposed to credit risk through their energy mark eting and trading operations. Credit
risk is the risk that a financial loss will be incurred if a counterparty to a transaction does not fulfill its financial obligation. NEE
manages counterparty credit risk for its subsid iaries with energy marketing and trading operations through established policies,
including counterparty credit limits, and in some cases credit enhancements, such as cash prepayments, letters of credit, cash and
other collateral and guarantees.(a) (a)
54
Table of Contents
Credit risk is also mana ged through the use of master netting agreements. NEE’ s credit depar tment monitors current and forward
credit exposure to count erparties and their affiliates, both on an individual and an aggregate basis. For all derivative and contractual
transactions, NEE’ s energy marketing and trading operations, which include FPL's energy marketing and trading division, are
exposed to losses in the event of nonperformance by counterparties to these transactions. Some relevant considerations when
assessing NEE’ s energy marketing and trading operations’  credit risk exposure include the following:
•Operations are primarily concentrated in the energy industry .
•Trade recei vables and other financial instrum ents are predominately with energy , utility and financial services related
companies, as well as municipalities, cooperatives and other trading companies in the U.S.
•Overall credit risk is managed through established credit policies and is overseen by the EMC.
•Prospective and existing customers are reviewed for creditworthiness based upon established standards, with customers not
meeting minimum standards providing various credit enhancements or secured payment terms, such as letters of credit or the
posting of margin cash collateral.
•Master nettin g agreements are used to offset cash and noncash gains and losses arising from derivative instruments with the
same counterparty . NEE’ s policy is to have master netting agreements in place with significant counterparties.
Based on NEE’ s policies and risk exposures related to credit, NEE and FPL do not anticipate a material adverse effect on their
financial statements as a result of counterparty nonperformance. At December 31, 2022, NEE's credit risk exposure associated with
its energy marketing and trading counterparties , taking into account collateral and contractual netting rights, totaled approximately
$3.6 billion ($95 million  for FPL), of which approximately 84% (100% for FPL) was with companies that have  investment grade credit
ratings. See Notes 1 – Credit Losses and 3.
Item 7A.  Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk
See Management’ s Discussion – Energy Marketing and Trading and Market Risk Sensitivity .
55
Table of Contents
Item 8.  Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
MANAGEMENT'S REPORT ON INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
NextEra Energy, Inc.'s (NEE) and Florida Power & Light Company's (FPL) management are responsible for establishing and maintaining
adequate internal control over financial reporting as defined in the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f). The
consolidated financial statements, which in part are based on informed judgments and estimates made by management, have been
prepared in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles applied on a consistent basis.
To aid in carrying out this responsibility, we, along with all other members of management, maintain a system of internal accounting control
which is established after weighing the cost of such controls against the benefits derived. In the opinion of management, the overall system
of internal accounting control provides reasonable assurance that the assets of NEE and FPL and their subsidiaries are safeguarded and
that transactions are executed in accordance with management's authorization and are properly recorded for the preparation of financial
statements. In addition, management believes the overall system of internal accounting control provides reasonable assurance that material
errors or irregularities would be prevented or detected on a timely basis by employees in the normal course of their duties. Any system of
internal accounting control, no matter how well designed, has inherent limitations, including the possibility that controls can be circumvented
or overridden and misstatements due to error or fraud may occur and not be detected. Also, because of changes in conditions, internal
control effectiveness may vary over time. Accordingly, even an effective system of internal control will provide only reasonable assurance
with respect to financial statement preparation and reporting.
The system of internal accounting control is supported by written policies and guidelines, the selection and training of qualified employees,
an organizational structure that provides an appropriate division of responsibility and a program of internal auditing. NEE's written policies
include a Code of Business Conduct & Ethics that states management's policy on conflicts of interest and ethical conduct. Compliance with
the Code of Business Conduct & Ethics is confirmed annually by key personnel.
The Board of Directors pursues its oversight responsibility for financial reporting and accounting through its Audit Committee. This
Committee, which is comprised entirely of independent directors, meets regularly with management, the internal auditors and the
independent auditors to make inquiries as to the manner in which the responsibilities of each are being discharged. The independent
auditors and the internal audit staff have free access to the Committee without management present to discuss auditing, internal accounting
control and financial reporting matters.
Management assessed the effectiveness of NEE's and FPL's internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2022, using the
criteria set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission in the Internal Control – Integrated Framework
(2013). Based on this assessment, management believes that NEE's and FPL's internal control over financial reporting was effective as of
December 31, 2022.
NEE's and FPL's independent registered public accounting firm, Deloitte & Touche LLP, is engaged to express an opinion on NEE's and
FPL's consolidated financial statements and an opinion on NEE's and FPL's internal control over financial reporting. Their reports are based
on procedures believed by them to provide a reasonable basis to support such opinions. These reports appear on the following pages.
JOHN W. KETCHUM TERRELL KIRK CREWS II
John W. Ketchum
Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer of NEE and
Chairman of FPLTerrell Kirk Crews II
Executive Vice President, Finance and Chief Financial Officer
of NEE and FPL
JAMES M. MAY
James M. May
Vice President, Controller and Chief Accounting Officer
of NEE
ARMANDO PIMENTEL, JR. KEITH FERGUSON
Armando Pimentel, Jr.
President and Chief Executive Officer of FPLKeith Ferguson
Controller of FPL
56
Table of Contents
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the shareholders and the Board of Directors of
NextEra Energy , Inc. and Florida Power & Light Company
Opinion on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the internal control over financial reporting of NextEra Energy , Inc. and subsi diaries (NEE) and Florida Power &
Light Company and subsidiaries (FPL) as of December 31, 2022, based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated
Framework  (2013)  issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO). In our opinion, NEE
and FPL maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2022, based on
criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013) issued by COSO.
We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(PCAOB), the consolidated financial statements  as of and for the year ended December 31, 2022 of NEE and FPL and our report
dated February 17, 2023, expressed unqualified opinions on those financial statements.
Basis for Opinion
NEE's and FPL’s management are responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting and for their
assessments of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included in the accompanying Management's Report on
Internal Control Over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express opinions on NEE’ s and FPL’s internal control over financial
reporting based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with
respect to NEE and FPL in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the
Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audit s in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audits to obtain reasona ble assurance about whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material
respects. Our audits included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a
material weakness exists, testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed
risk, and performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audits provide a
reasonable basis for our opinions.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company's internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonabl e assurance regarding the reliability
of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles. A company's internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain to
the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of
the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are
being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable
assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company's assets that
could have a material ef fect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also, projections
of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may beco me inadequate because of changes
in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
DELOITTE & TOUCHE LLP
Boca Raton, Florida
February 17, 2023
57
Table of Contents
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the shareholders and the Board of Directors of
    NextEra Energy , Inc. and Florida Power & Light Company
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of NextEra Energy , Inc. and subsidiaries (NEE) and the related
separate consolidated balance sheets of Florida Power & Light Company and subsidiaries (FPL) as of December 31, 2022 and
2021, and NEE's and FPL's related consolidated statements of income and cash flows, NEE's consolidated statements of
comprehensive income and equity , and FPL’s consolidated statements of common shareholder ’s equity , for each of the three years
in the period  ended December 31, 2022, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "financial statements"). In our opinion,
the financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the consolidated financial position of NEE and the consolidated
financial position of FPL as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, and the results of their operations and their cash flows for each of the
three years in the period ended December 31, 2022, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States
of America.
We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(PCAOB), NEE’s and FPL’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2022, based on criteria established in
Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013)  issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission
and our report dated February 17, 2023, expressed unqualified opinions on NEE’ s and FPL ’s internal control over financial reporting.
Basis for Opinion
These finan cial stateme nts are the responsibili ty of NEE’ s and FPL’s management. Our responsibility is to express opinions on
NEE’ s and FPL’s financ ial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are
required to be independe nt with respect to NEE and FPL in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules
and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audit s in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audits to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to
error or fraud. Our audit s included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements,
whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test
basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the
accounting principles used and significant estim ates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the
financial statements. W e believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinions.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters  communicated below are matters arising from the current-period audit  of the financial statements of NEE
and FPL that were communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (1) relate to accounts or
disclosures that are material to the financial statements and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex
judgments. The commun ication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the financial statements, taken as a
whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matters below , providing separate opinions on the critical audit matters or
on the accounts or disclosures to which they relate.
NEE – Operating Revenue – Unrealized Losses – Refer to Note 3 to the financial statements
Critical Audit Matter Description
NEE enters into comple x energy derivatives and transacts in certain markets that are thinly traded, which may result in subjective
estimates of fair value that include unobservable inputs. Changes in the derivatives’  fair value for power purchases and sales, fuel
sales and trading activiti es are primarily recogni zed on a net basis in operating revenues. For the year ended December 31, 2022,
unrealized losses associated with Level 3 transactions of $1,162  million are included in operating revenues in the consolidated
statement of income of NEE.
Given mana gement uses  complex proprietary models and unobservable inputs to estimate the fair value of Level 3 derivative assets
and liabilities , performing audit procedures to evaluate the appropriateness of these models and inputs required a high degree of
auditor judgment and an increased extent of effort, including the need to involve our firm specialists who possess significant
quantitative and modeling expertise.
How the Critical Audit Matter W as Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to operating revenue – unrealized losses included the following, among others:
•We tested the effectiveness of controls relating to commodity valuation models, their related Level 3 unobservable inputs,
and market data validation.
58
Table of Contents
•We selected  a sample of transactions, obtained an understanding of the business rationale of transactions, and read the
underlying contractual agreements.
•We used personnel in our firm who specialize in energy transacting to independently value Level 3 transactions. For certain
fair value models, we used our firm specialists to directly test the underlying assumptions of the unobservable inputs used
by management.
•We evaluate d NEE’ s disclosures related to the proprietary models and unobservable inputs to estimate the fair value of
Level 3 derivative assets and liabilities, including the balances recorded and significant assumptions.
FPL – Impact of Rate Regulation on the Financial Statements – Refer to Note 1 to the financial statements
Critical Audit Matter Description
FPL is subject to rate regulation by the Florida Public Service Commission (the “FPSC”), which has jurisdiction with respect to the
rates of electric utility companies. Management  has determined it meets the requirements under accounting principles generally
accepted in the United States of America to prepare its financial statements applying the specialized rules to account for the effects
of cost-based rate regulation. Accounting for the economics of rate regulation impacts multiple financial statement line items and
disclosures, such as property , plant, and equipment; regulatory assets and liabilities; operating  revenues; fuel expense, operation
and maintenance expense; and depreciation expense.
Rates are determined and approved in regulatory proceedings based on an analysis of FPL’s costs to provide utility service and a
return on, and recovery of, FPL’s investment in the assets required to deliver utility service. Acco unting guidance for FPL’s regulated
operations provides that rate-regulated entities report assets and liabilities consistent with the recovery of those incurred costs in
rates, if it is probable that such rates will be charged and collected. The FPSC has the authority  to disallow recovery of costs that it
considers excessive or imprudently incurred. Future FPSC decisions could impact the accountin g for regulated operations, including
decisions about the amount of recoverable costs and any refunds that may be required. As a result of this cost-based regulation,
FPL follows the account ing guidance that allows  regulators to create assets and impose liabilities, based on the probability of future
cash flows, that would not be recorded by non-rate regulated entities. Regulatory assets and liabilities represent probable future
revenues that will be recovered from or refunded to customers through the ratemaking process.
We identified the impact  of rate regulation as a critical audit matter due to the requirement to have auditors with deep knowledge of
and significant experience with accounting for rate regulation and the rate setting process due to its inherent complexities.
How the Critical Audit Matter W as Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the impact of rate regulation included the following, among others:
•We tested the effectiven ess of management’ s controls over the evaluation of the likelihood of (1) the recovery in future
rates of costs incurred as property , plant, and equipment and deferred as regulatory assets, and (2) a refund or a future
reduction in rates that should be reported as regulatory liabilities. We also tested the effectiveness of management’ s
controls over the initial recognition of amounts as property , plant, and equipment and regulato ry assets or liabilities; the
depreciation and amortization of such amounts in accordance with FPSC orders; and the monitoring and evaluation of
regulatory developments that may affect the likelihood of recovering costs recognized as property , plant and equipment and
regulatory assets in future rates or of a refund or future reduction in rates that should be recognized as a regulatory liability .
•We assessed the likelihood of (1) recovery of recorded regulatory assets and (2) obligations requiring future reductions in
rates by obtaining, reading and evaluating relevant regulatory orders issued by the FPSC to FPL, (including the December
2, 2021 order adopting the stipulation of settlement for FPL's 2021 rate agreement, which beca me effective on January 1,
2022) and considering regulatory precedents established by the FPSC. We also evaluated such regulatory orders and other
publicly available filings made by FPL and compared them to management’ s recorded regulatory asset and liability
balances for completeness.
•We evaluated FPL's disclosure related to the impacts of rate regulation, including the balances recorded and regulatory
developments.
DELOITTE & TOUCHE LLP
Boca Raton, Florida
February 17, 2023
We have served as NEE’ s and FPL ’s auditor since 1950.
59
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME
(millions, except per share amounts)
 Years Ended December 31,
2022 2021 2020
OPERA TING REVENUES $20,956  $17,069  $17,997  
OPERA TING EXPENSES    
Fuel, purchased power and interchange 6,389  4,527  3,539  
Other operations and maintenance 4,428  3,981  3,934  
Depreciation and amortization 4,503  3,924  4,052  
Taxes other than income taxes and other – net 2,077  1,801  1,709  
Total operating expenses – net 17,397  14,233  13,234  
GAINS ON DISPOSAL  OF BUSINESSES/ASSETS – NET 522 77 353 
OPERA TING INCOME 4,081  2,913  5,116  
OTHER INCOME (DEDUCTIONS)    
Interest expense (585) (1,270 ) (1,950 )
Equity in earnings (losses) of equity method investees 203 666 (1,351 )
Allowance for equity funds used during construction 112 142 93 
Gains on disposal of investments and other property – net 80 70 50 
Change in unrealized gains (losses) on equity securities held in NEER's nuclear
decommissioning funds – net (461) 267 163 
Other net periodic benefit income 202 257 200 
Other – net 200 130 92 
Total other income (deductions) – net (249) 262 (2,703 )
INCOME BEFORE INCOME TAXES 3,832  3,175  2,413  
INCOME TAXES 586 348 44 
NET INCOME 3,246  2,827  2,369  
NET LOSS ATTRIBUT ABLE TO NONCONTROLLING INTERESTS 901 746 550 
NET INCOME ATTRIBUT ABLE TO NEE $ 4,147  $ 3,573  $ 2,919  
Earnings per share attributable to NEE:    
Basic $ 2.10 $ 1.82 $ 1.49 
Assuming dilution $ 2.10 $ 1.81 $ 1.48 
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
60
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
(millions)
Years Ended December 31,
2022 2021 2020
NET INCOME $ 3,246  $ 2,827  $ 2,369  
OTHER COMPREHENSIVE INCOME (LOSS), NET  OF TAX
Reclassification of unrealized losses on cash flow hedges from accumulated other
comprehensive income (loss) to net income (net of $ 2 tax benefit, $ 2 tax benefit
and $ 4 tax benefit, respectively) 6 6 12 
Net unrealized gains (losses) on available for sale securities:  
Net unrealized gains (losses) on securities still held (net of $ 29 tax benefit, $ 4 tax
benefit and $ 4 tax expense, respectively) (84) (11) 12 
Reclassification from accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) to net
income (net of $ 3 tax benefit, $ 2 tax expense and $ 1 tax expense, respectively) 10 (4) (3)
Defined benefit pension and other benefits plans:
Net unrealized gain (loss) and unrecognized prior service benefit (cost) (net of $ 41
tax benefit, $ 30 tax expense and $ 11 tax expense, respectively) (133) 95 37 
Reclassification from accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) to net
income (net of $ 2 tax benefit, $ 1 tax benefit and $ 1 tax benefit, respectively) 7 5 2 
Net unrealized gains (losses) on foreign currency translation (44) (1) 13 
Other comprehensive income related to equity method investees (net of $ 0 tax
expense, $ 1 tax expense and $ 1 tax expense, respectively) 1 1 1 
Total other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax (237) 91 74 
IMPACT OF DISPOSAL  OF A BUSINESS (NET  OF $ 19 TAX BENEFIT) — — 10 
COMPREHENSIVE INCOME 3,009  2,918  2,453  
COMPREHENSIVE LOSS ATTRIBUT ABLE TO NONCONTROLLING INTERESTS 920 747 543 
COMPREHENSIVE INCOME ATTRIBUT ABLE TO NEE $ 3,929  $ 3,665  $ 2,996  
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
61
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
(millions, except par value)
December 31,
2022 2021
ASSETS
Current assets:   
Cash and cash equivalents $ 1,601 $ 639 
Customer receivables, net of allowances of $54 and $35, respectively 4,349 3,378 
Other receivables 744 730 
Materials, supplies and fuel inventory 1,934 1,561 
Regulatory assets 2,165 1,125 
Derivatives 1,590 689 
Other 1,107 1,166 
Total current assets 13,490 9,288 
Other assets:   
Property, plant and equipment – net ($22,927 and $20,521 related to VIEs, respectively) 111,059 99,348 
Special use funds 7,496 8,922 
Investment in equity method investees 6,582 6,159 
Prepaid benefit costs 1,832 2,243 
Regulatory assets 5,992 4,578 
Derivatives 1,935 1,135 
Goodwill 4,854 4,844 
Other 5,695 4,395 
Total other assets 145,445 131,624 
TOTAL ASSETS $ 158,935 $ 140,912 
LIABILITIES, REDEEMABLE NONCONTROLLING INTERESTS AND EQUITY
Current liabilities:   
Commercial paper $ 1,709 $ 1,382 
Other short-term debt 1,368 700 
Current portion of long-term debt ($61 and $58 related to VIEs, respectively) 6,633 1,785 
Accounts payable ($1,250 and $752 related to VIEs, respectively) 8,312 6,935 
Customer deposits 560 485 
Accrued interest and taxes 719 525 
Derivatives 2,102 1,263 
Accrued construction-related expenditures 1,760 1,378 
Regulatory liabilities 350 289 
Other 3,182 2,695 
Total current liabilities 26,695 17,437 
Other liabilities and deferred credits:   
Long-term debt ($1,108 and $1,125 related to VIEs, respectively) 55,256 50,960 
Asset retirement obligations 3,245 3,082 
Deferred income taxes 9,072 8,310 
Regulatory liabilities 9,626 11,273 
Derivatives 2,909 1,713 
Other 2,696 2,468 
Total other liabilities and deferred credits 82,804 77,806 
TOTAL LIABILITIES 109,499 95,243 
COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
REDEEMABLE NONCONTROLLING INTERESTS – VIEs 1,110 245 
EQUITY   
Common stock ($0.01 par value, authorized shares – 3,200; outstanding shares – 1,987 and 1,963, respectively) 20 20 
Additional paid-in capital 12,720 11,271 
Retained earnings 26,707 25,911 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (218) — 
Total common shareholders' equity 39,229 37,202 
Noncontrolling interests ($9,092 and $8,217 related to VIEs, respectively) 9,097 8,222 
TOTAL EQUITY 48,326 45,424 
TOTAL LIABILITIES, REDEEMABLE NONCONTROLLING INTERESTS AND EQUITY $ 158,935 $ 140,912 
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
62
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
(millions)
Years Ended December 31,
2022 2021 2020
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES    
Net income $ 3,246 $ 2,827 $ 2,369 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by (used in) operating activities:
Depreciation and amortization 4,503 3,924 4,052 
Nuclear fuel and other amortization 287 290 263 
Unrealized losses on marked to market derivative contracts – net 1,378 2,005 533 
Unrealized losses (gains) on equity securities held in NEER's nuclear decommissioning funds –
net 461 (267) (163)
Foreign currency transaction losses (gains) (104) (94) 45 
Deferred income taxes 534 436 (78)
Cost recovery clauses and franchise fees (1,465) (599) (121)
Equity in losses (earnings) of equity method investees (203) (666) 1,351 
Distributions of earnings from equity method investees 541 526 456 
Gains on disposal of businesses, assets and investments – net (602) (146) (403)
Recoverable storm-related costs (811) (138) (69)
Other – net 85 (59) 352 
Changes in operating assets and liabilities:    
Current assets (1,340) (1,267) (364)
Noncurrent assets (89) (324) (234)
Current liabilities 1,702 1,053 (6)
Noncurrent liabilities 139 52 — 
Net cash provided by operating activities 8,262 7,553 7,983 
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES    
Capital expenditures of FPL (9,067) (7,408) (7,489)
Independent power and other investments of NEER (9,541) (8,247) (6,851)
Nuclear fuel purchases (223) (275) (245)
Other capital expenditures (452) (147) (25)
Sale of independent power and other investments of NEER 1,564 2,761 1,012 
Proceeds from sale or maturity of securities in special use funds and other investments 3,857 4,995 3,916 
Purchases of securities in special use funds and other investments (4,586) (5,310) (4,100)
Other – net 89 40 83 
Net cash used in investing activities (18,359) (13,591) (13,699)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES    
Issuances of long-term debt, including premiums and discounts 13,856 16,683 12,404 
Retirements of long-term debt (4,525) (9,594) (6,103)
Proceeds from differential membership investors 4,158 2,779 3,522 
Net change in commercial paper 327 (169) (965)
Proceeds from other short-term debt 1,755 — 2,158 
Repayments of other short-term debt (1,125) (257) (2,100)
Payments from (to) related parties under a cash sweep and credit support agreement – net 240 47 (2)
Issuances of common stock/equity units – net 1,460 14 (92)
Proceeds from sale of noncontrolling interests — 65 501 
Dividends on common stock (3,352) (3,024) (2,743)
Other – net (565) (737) (406)
Net cash provided by financing activities 12,229 5,807 6,174 
Effects of currency translation on cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash (7) 1 (20)
Net increase (decrease) in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash 2,125 (230) 438 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at beginning of year 1,316 1,546 1,108 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at end of year $ 3,441 $ 1,316 $ 1,546 
SUPPLEMENTAL DISCLOSURES OF CASH FLOW INFORMATION    
Cash paid for interest (net of amount capitalized) $ 1,375 $ 1,323 $ 1,432 
Cash paid (received) for income taxes – net $ (32)$ (69)$ 235 
SUPPLEMENTAL SCHEDULE OF NONCASH INVESTING AND FINANCING ACTIVITIES    
Accrued property additions $ 6,005 $ 4,995 $ 4,445 
Decrease in property, plant and equipment – net and contract liabilities (2022 activity, see Note 1) $ 668 $ 155 $ — 
Right-of-use asset in exchange for finance lease liability $ 204 $ 120 $ 90 
Increase in property, plant and equipment related to an acquisition $ — $ — $ 68 
Decrease in joint venture investments related to an acquisition $ — $ — $ 145 
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
63
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF EQUITY
(millions)
Common Stock
Additional
Paid-In
CapitalAccumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss)Retained
EarningsTotal
Common
Shareholders'
EquityNon-
controlling
InterestsTotal
EquityRedeemable
Non-
controlling
Interests SharesAggregate
Par Value
Balances, December 31, 2019 1,956 $ 20 $11,955 $ (169)$25,199 $ 37,005 $ 4,355 $41,360 $ 487 
Net income (loss) — — — — 2,919 2,919 (546) (4)
Issuances of common
stock/equity units – net — — (92) — — (92) —  — 
Share-based payment activity 4 — 153 — — 153 —  — 
Dividends on common stock — — — — (2,743) (2,743) —  — 
Other comprehensive income — — — 67 — 67 7 — 
Impact of disposal of business — — — 10 — 10 — — 
Adoption of accounting
standards update — — — — (11) (11) — — 
Premium on equity units — — (587) — — (587) — — 
Other differential membership
interest activity — — (36) — — (36) 3,809 (483)
Sale of noncontrolling interests — — (169) — — (169) 689 — 
Other — — (2) — (1) (3) 102 — 
Balances, December 31, 2020 1,960 20 11,222 (92) 25,363 36,513 8,416 $44,929 — 
Net income (loss) — — — — 3,573 3,573 (748) 2 
Share-based payment activity 3 — 132 — — 132 — — 
Dividends on common stock — — — — (3,024) (3,024) — — 
Other comprehensive income
(loss) — — — 92 — 92 (1) — 
Other differential membership
interests activity — — (26) — — (26) 363 243 
Other — — (57) — (1) (58) 192 — 
Balances, December 31, 2021 1,963 20 11,271 — 25,911 37,202 8,222 $45,424 245 
Net income (loss) — — — — 4,147 4,147 (909) 8 
Issuances of common
stock/equity units – net 22 — 1,446 — — 1,446 —  — 
Share-based payment activity 2 — 171 — — 171 —  — 
Dividends on common stock — — — — (3,352) (3,352) —  — 
Other comprehensive loss — — — (218) — (218) (19) — 
Premium on equity units — — (127) — — (127) — — 
Other differential membership
interests activity — — (39) — — (39) 3,131 859 
Disposal of subsidiaries with
noncontrolling interests — — — — — — (1,494) — 
Other — — (2) — 1 (1) 166 (2)
Balances, December 31, 2022 1,987 $ 20 $12,720 $ (218)$26,707 $ 39,229 $ 9,097 $48,326 $ 1,110 
_________________________
(a)Dividends per share were $1.70, $1.54 and $1.40 for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
(b)See Note 1 – Measurement of Credit Losses on Financial Instruments.
(c)See Note 1 – Disposal of Businesses/Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests.
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.(a)
(b)
(a)
(c)
(a)
(c)
64
Table of Contents
FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME
(millions)
 Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
OPERA TING REVENUES $ 17,282  $ 14,102  $ 13,060  
OPERA TING EXPENSES
Fuel, purchased power and interchange 5,688  3,956  3,060  
Other operations and maintenance 1,857  1,831  1,890  
Depreciation and amortization 2,695  2,266  2,526  
Taxes other than income taxes and other – net 1,748  1,533  1,464  
Total operating expenses – net 11,988  9,586  8,940  
OPERA TING INCOME 5,294  4,516  4,120  
OTHER INCOME (DEDUCTIONS)
Interest expense (768) (615) (641)
Allowance for equity funds used during construction 105 132 87 
Other – net 17 11 2 
Total other deductions – net (646) (472) (552)
INCOME BEFORE INCOME TAXES 4,648  4,044  3,568  
INCOME TAXES 947 838 678 
NET INCOME $ 3,701  $ 3,206  $ 2,890  
______________________
(a)FPL's comprehensive income is the same as reported net income.(a)
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
65
Table of Contents
FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
(millions, except share amount)
 December 31,
2022 2021
ASSETS
Current assets:   
Cash and cash equivalents $ 25 $ 55 
Customer receivables, net of allowances of $ 7 and $ 11, respectively 1,739  1,297  
Other receivables 332 350 
Materials, supplies and fuel inventory 1,159  963 
Regulatory assets 2,155  1,111  
Other 143 142 
Total current assets 5,553  3,918  
Other assets:   
Electric utility plant and other property – net 64,693  58,227  
Special use funds 5,221  6,158  
Prepaid benefit costs 1,732  1,657  
Regulatory assets 5,484  4,343  
Goodwill 2,989  2,989  
Other 887 775 
Total other assets 81,006  74,149  
TOTAL ASSETS $ 86,559  $ 78,067  
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY
Current liabilities:
Commercial paper $ 1,709  $ 1,382  
Other short-term debt 200 200 
Current portion of long-term debt 1,547  536 
Accounts payable 1,377  1,318  
Customer deposits 543 478 
Accrued interest and taxes 362 322 
Accrued construction-related expenditures 559 601 
Regulatory liabilities 349 278 
Other 1,197  643 
Total current liabilities 7,843  5,758  
Other liabilities and deferred credits:   
Long-term debt 19,455  17,974  
Asset retirement obligations 2,108  2,049  
Deferred income taxes 8,376  7,137  
Regulatory liabilities 9,458  11,053  
Other 399 502 
Total other liabilities and deferred credits 39,796  38,715  
TOTAL LIABILITIES 47,639  44,473  
COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
EQUITY   
Common stock ( no par value, 1,000  shares authorized, issued and outstanding) 1,373  1,373  
Additional paid-in capital 23,561  19,936  
Retained earnings 13,986  12,285  
TOTAL EQUITY 38,920  33,594  
TOTAL LIABILITIES AND EQUITY $ 86,559  $ 78,067  
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
66
Table of Contents
FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
(millions)
Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES    
Net income $ 3,701 $ 3,206 $ 2,890 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by (used in) operating activities:  
Depreciation and amortization 2,695 2,266 2,526 
Nuclear fuel and other amortization 177 174 167 
Deferred income taxes 942 752 629 
Cost recovery clauses and franchise fees (1,465) (599) (121)
Recoverable storm-related costs (811) (138) (69)
Other – net 16 (157) 35 
Changes in operating assets and liabilities:
Current assets (534) (49) (164)
Noncurrent assets (73) (114) (77)
Current liabilities 175 20 31 
Noncurrent liabilities 71 (3) (31)
Net cash provided by operating activities 4,894 5,358 5,816 
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES    
Capital expenditures (9,067) (7,411) (7,476)
Nuclear fuel purchases (118) (159) (203)
Proceeds from sale or maturity of securities in special use funds 2,437 3,308 2,488 
Purchases of securities in special use funds (2,607) (3,394) (2,567)
Other – net (3) 15 65 
Net cash used in investing activities (9,358) (7,641) (7,693)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES    
Issuances of long-term debt, including premiums and discounts 2,942 2,588 3,003 
Retirements of long-term debt (441) (1,304) (1,603)
Net change in commercial paper 327 (169) (123)
Capital contributions from NEE 3,625 1,700 2,750 
Dividends to NEE (2,000) (540) (2,210)
Other – net (39) (44) (44)
Net cash provided by financing activities 4,414 2,231 1,773 
Net decrease in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash (50) (52) (104)
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at beginning of year 108 160 264 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at end of year $ 58 $ 108 $ 160 
SUPPLEMENTAL DISCLOSURES OF CASH FLOW INFORMATION    
Cash paid for interest (net of amount capitalized) $ 707 $ 586 $ 620 
Cash paid (received) for income taxes – net $ 22 $ (1)$ 105 
SUPPLEMENTAL SCHEDULE OF NONCASH INVESTING AND FINANCING ACTIVITIES  
Accrued property additions $ 1,024 $ 1,107 $ 698 
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
67
Table of Contents
FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMMON SHAREHOLDER'S EQUITY
(millions)
Common
StockAdditional
Paid-In CapitalRetained
EarningsCommon
Shareholder's
Equity
Balances, December 31, 2019 $ 1,373  $ 15,485  $ 8,939  $ 25,797  
Net income — — 2,890   
Capital contributions from NEE — 2,750  — 
Dividends to NEE — — (2,210 )  
Other — 1 —  
Balances, December 31, 2020 1,373  18,236  9,619  $ 29,228  
Net income — — 3,206   
Capital contributions from NEE — 1,700  — 
Dividends to NEE — — (540)  
Balances, December 31, 2021 1,373  19,936  12,285  $ 33,594  
Net income — — 3,701   
Capital contributions from NEE — 3,625  —  
Dividends to NEE — — (2,000 )  
Balances, December 31, 2022 $ 1,373  $ 23,561  $ 13,986  $ 38,920  
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
68
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
1. Summary of Significant Accounting and Reporting Policies
Basis of Presentation  – The operations of NextEra Energy , Inc. (NEE) are conducted primarily through Florida Power & Light
Company (FPL), a wholly owned subsidiary , and NextEra Energy Resources, LLC (NextEra Energy Resources) and NextEra Energy
Transmission, LLC (NEET) (collectively , NEER ), wholly owned indirect subsidiaries that are combined for segment reporting
purposes. On January 1, 2021, FPL and Gulf Power Company merged, with FPL as the surviving entity . However during 2021, FPL
continued to be regulate d as two separate ratemaking entities in the former service areas of FPL and Gulf Power . Effective January
1, 2022, FPL became regulated as one electric ratemaking entity with new unified rates and tariffs, and also became one reportable
segment of NEE (see Rate Regulation – Base Rates Effective January 2022 through December 2025 below). As a result, the
previous segments known as the FPL  segment and Gulf Power are no longer separate reportable segments.  See Note 16.
FPL's principal business is a rate-regulated electric utility which supplies electric service to approximately  5.8 million customer
accounts throughout most of the east and lower west coasts of Florida and eight  counties throughout northwest Florida. NEER
invests in independent power projects through both controlled and consolidated entities and noncontrolling owner ship interests in
joint ventures. NEER participates in natural gas, natural gas liquids and oil production primarily through operating and non-operating
ownership interests and in pipeline infrastructure through either wholly owned subsidiaries or noncontrolling or joint venture interests.
NEER also invests in rate-regulated transmission facilities and transmission lines that connect its electric generation facilities to the
electric grid through controlled and consolidated entities.
The consolidated financial statements of NEE and FPL include the accounts of their respective controlled subsidiaries. They also
include NEE's and FPL's share of the undivided interest in certain assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses. Amounts representing
NEE's interest in entities  it does not control, but over which it exercises significant influence, are included in investment in equity
method investees; the earnings/losses of these entities is included in equity in earnings (losses) of equity method investees.
Intercompany balances  and transactions have been eliminated in consolidation. Certain amounts included in prior years'
consolidated financial statements have been reclassified to conform to the current year's presentation. The preparation of financial
statements requires the use of estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets, liabilities, revenues and
expenses and the disclosure of c ontingent assets and liabilities. Actual results could dif fer from those estimates.
NextEra Energy Partners, LP (NEP) was formed  in 2014 to acquire, manage and own contracted clean energy projects with stable
long-term cash flows through a limited partner interest in NextEra Energy Operating Partners, LP (NEP  OpCo). NEP owns or has an
ownership interest in a portfolio of wind, solar and solar plus battery storage projects and long-term contracted natural gas pipelines.
NEE owns a noncontro lling interest in NEP, accounts for its ownership interest in NEP as an equity method investment with its
earnings/losses from NEP as equity in earnings  (losses) of equity method investees and accounts for NextEra Energy Resources'
project sales  to NEP as third-party sales in its consolidated financial statements. NEER operates essentially all of the energy
projects owned by NEP and provides services to NEP under various related party operations and maintenance, administrative and
management services agreements.
Operating Revenues – FPL and NEER generate substantially all of NEE’s operating revenues, which primarily include revenues from
contracts with customers as further discussed in Note 2, as well as, at NEER, derivative and lease transactions. FPL's operating
revenues include amounts resulting from base rates, cost recovery clauses (see Rate Regulation below), franchise fees, gross
receipts taxes and surcharges related to storms (see Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm Cost Recovery below). Franchise
fees and gross receipts taxes are imposed on FPL; however , the Florida Public Service Commission (FPSC) allows FPL to include in
the amounts charged to customers the amount of the gross receipts tax for all customers and the franchise fee for those customers
located in the jurisdiction  that imposes the amount. Accordingly , FPL's franchise fees and gross receipts taxes are reported gross in
operating revenues and taxes other than income taxes and other in NEE's and FPL's consolidated statements of income and were
approximately $1,035  million, $852 million and $800 million in 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively . FPL also collects municipal utility
taxes which  are reported gross in customer receivables and accounts payable on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets.
Certain NEER commodi ty contracts for the purchase and sale of power that meet the definition of a derivative are recorded at fair
value with subsequent changes in fair value recognized as revenue. See Energy Trading below and Note 3.
69
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Rate Regula tion – FPL, the most significant of NEE's rate-regula ted subsidiaries, is subject to rate regulation by the FPSC and the
Federal Energy Regulat ory Commission (FERC). Its rates are designed to recover the cost of providing service to its customers
including a reasonable rate of return on inves ted capital. As a result of this cost-based regulation, FPL follows the accounting
guidance that allows regulators to create asset s and impose liabilities that would not be recorded by non-rate regulated entities.
Regulatory assets and liabilities represent probable future revenues that will be recovered from or refunded to customers through the
ratemaking process.
NEE's and FPL's regulatory assets and liabilities are as follows:
NEE FPL
December 31, December 31,
2022 2021 2022 2021
(millions)
Regulatory assets:
Current:
Early retirement of generation facilities and transmission assets $ 145 $ 140 $ 145 $ 140 
Acquisition of purchased power agreements 141 141 141 141 
Deferred clause and franchise expenses 919 698 919 698 
Storm restoration costs 911 92 911 92 
Other 49 54 39 40 
Total $ 2,165 $ 1,125 $ 2,155 $ 1,111 
Noncurrent:     
Early retirement of generation facilities and transmission assets $ 2,026 $ 2,233 $ 2,026 $ 2,233 
Acquisition of purchased power agreements 191 332 191 332 
Deferred clause expenses 1,227 17 1,227 17 
Storm restoration costs 326 150 326 150 
Accrued asset removal costs 532 263 532 263 
Other 1,690 1,583 1,182 1,348 
Total $ 5,992 $ 4,578 $ 5,484 $ 4,343 
Regulatory liabilities:     
Current:
Deferred clause revenues $ 339 $ 274 $ 339 $ 274 
Other 11 15 10 4 
Total $ 350 $ 289 $ 349 $ 278 
Noncurrent:     
Asset retirement obligation regulatory expense difference $ 3,323 $ 4,290 $ 3,323 $ 4,290 
Accrued asset removal costs 658 782 623 752 
Deferred taxes 4,233 4,561 4,129 4,457 
Other 1,412 1,640 1,383 1,554 
Total $ 9,626 $11,273 $ 9,458 $11,053 
______________________
(a)The majority of these regulatory assets are being amortized over 20 years.
(b)The majority of these regulatory assets are being amortized over approximately 9 years.
(c)The majority of these regulatory assets are expected to be amortized over 21 months beginning April 2023. See below regarding the 2022 fuel under-recovery.
(d)The majority of these regulatory assets are expected to be amortized over 12 months beginning April 2023. See Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm Cost
Recovery below.
(e)See Electric Plant, Depreciation and Amortization below.
Cost recovery clauses, which are designed to permit full recovery of certain costs and provide a return on certain assets allowed to
be recovered through various clauses, include substantially all fuel, purchased power and interchange expense, costs associated
with an FPSC-approved transmission and distribution storm protection plan, certain costs associated with the acquisition and
retirement of several electric generation facilities, certain construction-related costs for certain of FPL's solar generation facilities,
and conservation and certain environmental-related costs.  Revenues from cost recovery clauses are recorded when billed; FPL
achieves matching of costs and related revenues by deferring the net under-recovery or over-recovery . Any under-recovered costs
or over-recovered revenues are collected from or returned to customers in subsequent periods. In January 2023, FPL filed a petition
with the FPSC requestin g recovery of its 2022 fuel under-recovery of approximately $2.1 billion (included in curre nt deferred clause
and franchise expenses and noncurrent deferr ed clause expenses above) over 21 months beginning April 2023. As a result of
natural gas prices currently being lower than originally projected for 2023, FPL(a)
(b)
(c) (c)
(d) (d)
(a)
(b)
(c) (c)
(d) (d)
(e)
(e)
70
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
also requested a $1.0 billion mid-course correction to reduce the 2023 levelized fuel charges to customers that would go into effect
beginning April 2023. An FPSC decision is expected in March 2023.
If FPL were no longer subject to cost-based rate regulation, the existing regulatory assets and liabilities would be written off unless
regulators specify an alternative means of recovery or refund. In addition, the FPSC has the authority to disallow recovery of costs
that it considers excessive or imprudently incurred. The continued applicability of regulatory accounting is assessed at each
reporting period. Regulatory assets and liabilities are discussed within various subsections below . 
Base Rates  Effective January 2022 through December 2025 – In December 2021, the FPSC  issued a final order approving a
stipulation and settlement between FPL  and several intervenors in FPL's base rate proceeding (2021 rate agreement).
Key elements of the 2021 rate agreement, which is effective from January 2022 through at least December 2025, include, among
other things, the following:
•New retail base rates and charges were establis hed for the combined utility system (including the former Gulf Power Company
service area) resulting in the following increases in annualized retail base revenues:
◦$692 million beginning January 1, 2022, and
◦$560 million beginning January 1, 2023.
•In addition, FPL is eligibl e to receive, subject to conditions specified in the 2021 rate agreement, base rate increases associated
with the addition of up to 894 mega watts (MW) annually of new solar gene ration (through a Solar Base Rate Adjustment
(SoBRA) mechanism) in each of 2024 and 2025,  and may carry forward any unused MW in 2024  to 2025. FPL has agreed to an
installed cost cap of $1,250  per kilowat t and will be required to demonstrate that these proposed solar facilities are cost
effective.
•FPL's authorized regulatory return on common equity (ROE) was 10.60 %, with a range of 9.70% to 11.70 %. However , in the
event the average 30-year U.S. Treasury rate was 2.49% or greater over a consecutive six-month  period, FPL was authorized to
increase the regulatory ROE to 10.80 % with a range of 9.80% to 11.80 %. During August 2022, this provision was triggered and
effective September 1, 2022, FPL's authorized regulatory ROE and ROE range were increased. The revised authorized
regulatory ROE will have only a minimal impact to base rates. If FPL's earned regulatory ROE falls below 9.80%, FPL may seek
retail base rate relief. If the earned regulatory ROE rises above 11.80 %, any party with standing may seek a review of FPL's
retail base rates.
•Subject to certain condit ions, FPL may amortize , over the term of the 2021 rate agreement, up to $1.45 billion of depreciation
reserve surplus, provided that in any year of the 2021 rate agreement FPL must amortize at least enough reserve amount to
maintain its minimum authorized regulatory ROE  and also may not amortize any reserve amount that would result in an earned
regulatory ROE in excess of its maximum authorized regulatory ROE.
•FPL is authorized to expand SolarT ogether™, a voluntary community solar program that gives FPL electric customers an
opportunity to participate  directly in the expansion of solar energy where participants pay a fixed monthly subscription charge
and receive credits on their related monthly customer bill, by constructing an additional 1,788  MW of solar  generation from 2022
through 2025, such that the total capacity of SolarT ogether™ would be 3,278  MW.
•Future storm  restoration costs would be recoverable on an interim basis beginning 60 days from the filing of a cost recovery
petition, but capped at an amount that produces a surcharge of no more than $4 for every 1,000  kilowatt-hour (kWh) of usage
on residential bills during  the first 12 months of cost recovery . Any additional costs would be eligible for recovery in subsequent
years. If storm restoration costs exceed $800 million in any given calendar year, FPL may request an increase to the $4
surcharge. See Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm Cost Recovery below .
•If federal or state perma nent corporate income tax changes become effective during the term of the 2021 rate agreement, FPL
will prospectively adjust base rates after a review by the FPSC. As a result of the enactment of the Inflation Reduction Act (IRA)
(see Note 5), FPL's customers are expected to save approximately $400 million over the remain ing term of the 2021 rate
agreement which includes a $ 36 million one-time refund made in January 2023.
On February  8, 2023, the Florida Supreme Court heard oral argument on the appeal of the FPSC's final order regarding the 2021
rate agreem ent by Floridians Against Increased Rates, Inc. and, as a group, Florida Rising, Inc., Environmental Confederation of
Southwest Florida, Inc. and League of United Latin American Citizens of Florida (collectively , the appellants). The appellants argue
that the FPSC lacked authority to approve certain aspects of FPL's 2021 rate agreement, that the final order fails to address certain
contested issues and that certain of the FPSC's findings in its final order were not adequately analyzed or supported by evidence
and have requested that the final order be reversed or remanded. FPL believes that the FPSC’ s decision should not be reversed or
remanded by the Florida  Supreme Court, because, among other things, the FPSC acted within  its statutory authority in approving
the 2021 rate agreemen t and the FPSC’ s public-interest findings are supported by competent, substantial evidence in the record. A
ruling by the Florida Supreme Court is pending.
Base Rates Effective January 2017 through December 2021 – From January 2017 to Decembe r 2021, FPL operated under a base
rate agreement (2016 rate agreement) that provided for, among other things, a regulatory ROE of 10.55 %, with a range of 9.60% to
11.60 % and, subject to certain conditions, the right to reduce depreciation expense up to $1.25 billion (reserve), provided that in any
year of the 2016 rate agreement FPL was required to amortize enough reserve to maintain an earned regulatory ROE within the
range of 9.60% to 11.60 %.
Electric Plant, Depreciat ion and Amortization  – The cost of additions to units of property of FPL and NEER is added to electric plant
in service and other property . In accordance with regulatory accounting, the cost of FPL's units of utility property retired,
71
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
less estimated net salvage value, is charged to accumulated depreciation. Maintenance and repairs of property as well as
replacements and renewals of items determin ed to be less than units of utility property are charged to other operations and
maintenance (O&M) expenses. The American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, as amended, provided for an option to elect
a cash grant (convertible investment tax credits (ITCs)) for certain renewable energy property (renewable property). Convertible
ITCs are recorded as a reduction in property , plant and equipment on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets and are
amortized as a reduction  to depreciation and amortization expense over the estimated life of the related property . At December 31,
2022 and 2021, convertible ITCs, net of amortization, were approximately $693 million ($111 million at FPL) and $755 million ($116
million at FPL).
Depreciation of FPL's electric property is provided on a straight-line basis, primarily over its average remaining useful life. FPL
includes in depreciation  expense a provision for electric generation plant dismantlement, interim asset removal costs, accretion
related to asset retirement obligations (see Decommissioning of Nuclear Plants, Dismantlement of Plants and Other Accrued Asset
Removal Costs below) and storm recovery amortization. For substantially all of FPL's property , depreciation studies are performed
periodically and filed with the FPSC which result in updated depreciation rates. As part of the 2021 rate agreement, the FPSC
approved new unified depreciation rates which became effective January 1, 2022. Reserve amortization is recorded as either an
increase or decrease to accrued asset removal costs which is reflected in noncurrent regulatory assets on NEE's and FPL's
consolidated balance sheets. FPL files a twelve- month forecast with the FPSC each year which contains a regulatory ROE intended
to be earned  based on the best information FPL has at that time assuming normal weather . This forecast establishes a targeted
regulatory ROE. In order to earn the targeted regulatory ROE in each reporting period subject to the conditions of the effective rate
agreement, reserve amortization is calculated using a trailing thirteen-month average of retail rate base and capital structure in
conjunction with the trailing twelve months regulatory retail base net operating income, which  primarily includes the retail base
portion of base and other revenues, net of O&M, depreciation and amortization, interest and tax expenses. In general, the net impact
of these income statement line items is adjusted , in part, by reserve amortization or its reversal to earn the targeted regulatory ROE.
See Rate Regulation – Base Rates Ef fective January 2022 through December 2025 above.
NEER's electric plant in service and other property less salvage value, if any, are depreciated primarily using the straight-line method
over their estimated useful lives. NEER reviews the estimated useful lives of its fixed assets on an ongoing basis. NEER's oil and
gas product ion assets are accounted for under the successful efforts method. Depletion expe nses for the acquisition of reserve
rights and development costs are recognized using the unit of production method.
Nuclear Fuel – FPL and NEER have several contracts for the supply of uranium and the conversion, enrichm ent and fabrication of
nuclear fuel. See Note 15 – Contracts. FPL's and NEER's nuclear fuel costs are charged to fuel expense on a unit of production
method.
Construction Activity  – Allowance for funds used during construction (AFUDC) is a noncash item which represents the allowed cost
of capital, including an ROE, used to finance construction projects. FPL records the portion of AFUDC attributable to borrowed funds
as a reducti on of interest expense and the remainder as other income. FPSC rules limit the recording of AFUDC to projects that
have an estimated cost in excess of 0.5% prior to 2021 and 0.4% beginning in 2021 of a utility's plant in service balance and require
more than one year to complete. FPSC rules allow construction projects below the applicable  threshold as a component of rate
base.
FPL's construction work in progress includes construction materials, progress payments on major equipment contracts, engineering
costs, AFUDC and other costs directly associated with the construction of various projects. Upon completion of the projects, these
costs are transferred to electric utility plant in service and other property . Capitalized costs assoc iated with construction activities are
charged to O&M expenses when recoverability is no longer probable.
NEER capitalizes project development costs once it is probable that such costs will be realized through the ultimate construction of
the related asset or sale of development rights. At December 31, 2022 and 2021, NEER's capitalized development costs totaled
approximately $1,027  million and $831 million, respectively , which are included in noncurrent other assets on NEE's consolidated
balance sheets. These costs include land rights and other third-party costs directly associated with the development of a new
project. Upon commencement of construction, these costs either are transferred to construction work in progress or remain in other
assets, depending upon the nature of the cost. Capitalized development costs are charged to O&M expenses when it is probable
that these costs will not be realized.
NEER's construction work in progress includes construction materials, progress payments on major equipment contracts, third-party
engineering costs, capitalized interest and other costs directly associated with the construction and development of various projects.
Interest expense allocated from NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc. (NEECH) to NEER is based on a deemed capital structure of
70% debt and differential membership interests sold by NextEra Energy Resources' subsidiaries. Upon commencement of project
operation, costs associated with construction work in progress are transferred to electric plant in service and other property .
Asset Retirement Obligations  – NEE and FPL each account for asset retirement obligations and conditional asset retirement
obligations (collectively , AROs) under accounting guidance that requires a liability for the fair value of an ARO to be recognized in
72
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
the period in which it is incurred if it can be reasonably estimated, with the offsetting associated asset retirement costs capitalized as
part of the carrying amount of the long-lived assets. NEE's AROs relate primarily to decomm issioning obligations of FPL's and
NEER's nuclear units and to obligations for the dismantlement of certain of NEER's wind and solar facilities. See Decommissioning
of Nuclear Plants, Dismantlement of Plants and Other Accrued Asset Removal Costs below and Note 11.
For NEE's rate-regulated operations, including FPL, the asset retirement cost is allocated to a regulatory liability or regulatory asset
using a systematic and rational method over the asset's estimated useful life. Changes in the ARO resulting from the passage of
time are recognized as an increase in the carrying amount of the ARO and a decrease in the regulatory liability or regulatory asset.
Changes resulting from revisions to the timing or amount of the original estimate of cash flows are recognized as an increase or a
decrease in the ARO and asset retirement cost, or regulatory liability when asset retirement cost is depleted.
For NEE's non-rate regulated operations, the asset retirement cost is allocated to expense using a systematic and rational method
over the asset's estimated useful life. Changes in the ARO resulting from the passage of time are recognized as an increase in the
carrying amount of the liability and as accretion expense, which is included in depreciation and amortization expense in NEE's
consolidated statements of income. Changes resulting from revisions to the timing or amount of the original estimate of cash flows
are recognized as an increase or a decrease in the asset retirement cost, or income when asset retirement cost is depleted.
Decommissioning of Nuclear Plants, Dismantlement of Plants and Other Accrued Asset Removal Costs  – For ratemaking purposes,
FPL accrues for the cost of end of life retirement and disposal of its nuclear and other generatio n plants over the expected service
life of each unit based on nuclear decommission ing and other generation dismantlement studies  periodically filed with the FPSC. In
addition, FPL accrues for interim removal costs over the life of the related assets based on depreciation studies approved by the
FPSC. As approved by the FPSC, FPL previously suspended its annual decommissioning accrual. Any differences between expense
recognized for financial reporting purposes and the amount recovered through rates are reporte d as a regulatory asset or liability in
accordance with regulatory accounting. See Rate Regulation, Electric Plant, Depreciation and Amortization, and Asset Retirement
Obligations above and Note 11.
Nuclear decommissionin g studies are performed at least every five years and are filed with the FPSC for approval. FPL filed updated
nuclear decommissioning studies with the FPSC in December 2020. These studies reflect, among other things, the expiration dates
of the operating licenses  for FPL's nuclear units at the time of the studies. The 2020 studies provide for the dismantlement of Turkey
Point Units Nos. 3 and 4 following the end of plant operation with decommissioning activitie s commencing in 2052 and 2053,
respectively , however , in 2022, the U.S. Nuclear  Regulatory Commission (NRC) amended Turkey Point Units Nos. 3 and 4 license
renewals by removing the 20 additional years of operation reflected in the studies. FPL filed a site-specific environmental impact
statement with the NRC related to the previously approved 20-year renewal application for both Turkey Point operating licenses.
Approval of the additional 20 years of operations is pending. The studies filed in 2020 also provide for St. Lucie Unit No. 1 to be
mothballed beginning in 2036 with decommissi oning activities to be integrated with the disma ntlement of St. Lucie Unit No. 2 in
2043. These  studies also assume that FPL will be storing spent fuel on site pending removal to a United States (U.S.) government
facility . FPL's portion of the ultimate costs of decommissioning its four nucle ar units, including costs associated with spent fuel
storage above what is expected to be refunded by the U.S. Department of Energy (DOE) under a spent fuel settlement agreement,
is estimated  to be approximately $9.6 billion, or $2.5 billion expressed in 2022 dollars. The ultimate costs of decommissioning reflect
the applications submitted to the NRC for the extension of Turkey Point Units Nos. 3 and 4 and St. Lucie Units Nos. 1 and 2 licenses
for an additional 20 years.
Restricted funds for the payment of future expenditures to decommission FPL's nuclear units are included in nuclear
decommissioning reserve funds, which are included in special use funds on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets.
Marketable securities held in the decommissioni ng funds are primarily carried at fair value. See Note 4. Fund earnings, consisting of
dividends, interest and realized gains and losses, net of taxes, are reinvested in the funds. Fund earnings, as well as any changes in
unrealized gains and losses and estimated credit losses on debt securities, are not recognized in income and are reflected as a
corresponding offset in the related regulatory asset or liability accounts. FPL does not currently make contributions to the
decommissioning funds, other than the reinvestment of fund earnings. During 2022, 2021 and 2020 fund earnings on
decommissioning funds were approximately $58 million, $173 million and $132 million, respectively . The tax effects of amounts not
yet recognized for tax purposes are included in deferred income taxes.
Other generation plant dismantlement studies are performed periodically and are submitted to the FPSC for approval. Previously
approved studies were effective from January 1, 2017 through December 2021 and resulted in an annual expense of $26 million
which is recorded in depreciation and amortizat ion expense in NEE's and FPL's consolidated statements of income. As part of the
2021 rate agreement, the FPSC approved a new annual expense of $48 millio n based on FPL's updated dismantlement studies
which became effective January 1, 2022. At December 31, 2022, FPL's portion of the ultimate cost to dismantle its other generation
units is approximately $ 2.4 billion, or $ 1.2 billion expressed in 2022 dollars.
NEER's AROs primarily include nuclear decommissioning liabilities for Seabrook Station (Seabrook), Duane Arnold Energy Center
(Duane Arnold) and Point Beach Nuclear Power Plant (Point Beach) and dismantlement liabilities  for its wind and solar facilities. The
liabilities are being accreted using the interest method through the date decommissioning or dismantlement
73
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
activities are expected to be complete. See Note 11. At December 31, 2022 and 2021, NEER's ARO was approximately $1.2 billion
and $1.1 billion, respectively , and was primarily determined using various internal and external data and applying a probability
percentage to a variety of scenarios regarding the life of the plant and timing of decommissioning or dismantlement. NEER's portion
of the ultima te cost of decommissioning its nuclear plants, including costs associated with spent fuel storage above what is expected
to be refunded by the DOE under a spent fuel settlement agreement, is estimated to be appro ximately $9.5 billion, or $2.0 billion
expressed in 2022 dollars. The ultimate cost to dismantle NEER's wind and solar facilities is estimated to be approximately $2.5
billion.
Seabrook files a comprehensive nuclear decom missioning study with the New Hampshire Nuclear Decommissioning Financing
Committee (NDFC) every four years ; the most recent study was filed in 2019. Seabrook's decommissioning funding plan is also
subject to annual review  by the NDFC. Currently , there are no ongoing decommissioning funding requirements for Seabrook, Duane
Arnold and Point Beach,  however , the NRC, and in the case of Seabrook, the NDFC, has the authority to require additional funding
in the future. NEER's portion of Seabrook's, Duane Arnold's and Point Beach's restricted  funds for the payment of future
expenditures to decommission these plants is included in nuclear decommissioning reserve funds, which are included in special use
funds on NEE's consolidated balance sheets. Marketable securities held in the decommissioning funds are primarily carried at fair
value. See Note 4. Market adjustments for debt securities result in a corresponding adjustme nt to other comprehensive income
(OCI), except for estimat ed credit losses and unrealized losses on debt securities intended or required to be sold prior to recovery of
the amortized cost basis , which are recognized in other – net in NEE's consolidated statements  of income. Market adjustments for
equity securities are recorded in change in unrealized gains (losses) on equity securities held in NEER's nuclear decommissioning
funds – net in NEE's consolidated statements of income. Fund earnings, consisting of dividen ds, interest and realized gains and
losses are recognized in income and are reinves ted in the funds. The tax effects of amounts not yet recognized for tax purposes are
included in deferred income taxes.
Major Maintenance Costs  – FPL expenses costs associated with planned maintenance for its non-nuclear electric generation plants
as incurred. FPL recognizes costs associated with planned major nuclear maintenance in accordance with regulatory treatment. FPL
defers nucle ar maintena nce costs for each nuclear unit’s planned outage to a regulatory asset as the costs are incurred. FPL
amortizes the costs to O&M expense using the straight-line method over the period from the end of the current outage to the next
planned outage where the respective work scope is performed. 
NEER uses the deferral method to account for certain planned major maintenance costs. NEER's major maintenance costs for its
nuclear generation units and combustion turbines are capitalized (included in noncurrent other assets on NEE's consolidated
balance sheets) and amortized to O&M expense using the straight-line method over the period from the end of the current outage to
the next planned outage where the respective work scope is performed.
Cash Equivalents  – Cash equivalents consist of short-term, highly liquid investments with original maturities of three months or less.
Restricted Cash  – At December 31, 2022 and 2021, NEE had approximately $1,840  million ($33 million for FPL) and $677 million
($53 million for FPL), respectively , of restricted cash , which is included in current other assets on NEE's and FPL's consolidated
balance sheets. Restricted cash is primarily related to debt service payments and margin cash collateral requirements at NEER and
bond proceeds held for construction at FPL. In addition, where offsetting positions exist, restricted cash related to margin cash
collateral of $7 million is netted against derivative assets and $1,541  million is netted against derivative liabilities at December 31,
2022 and $121 million is netted against derivative assets and $172 million is netted against derivative liabilities at December 31,
2021. See Note 3.
Measurement of Credit Losses on Financial Instruments  – Effective January 1, 2020, NEE and FPL adopted an accounting
standards update that provides for a new metho dology , the current expected credit loss (CECL) model, to account for credit losses
for certain financial assets measured at amortized cost. On January 1, 2020, NEE recorded a reduction to retained earnings of
approximately $11 million representing the cumulative effect of adopting the new standards update, which prima rily related to the
impact of applying the CECL  model to NEER's receivables. The impact of adopting the new standards update was not material to
FPL.
Allowance for Doubtful Accounts and Bad Debt  – FPL maintains an accumulated provision for uncollectible customer accounts
receivable that is estima ted using a percentage,  derived from historical revenue and write-of f trends, of the previous four months of
revenue, and includes estimates of credit and other losses based on both current events and forecasts. NEER regularly reviews
collectibility of its receiva bles and establishes a provision for losses estimated as a percentage of accounts receivable based on the
historical bad debt write-of f trends for its retail electricity provider operations, as well as includes estimates for credit and other
losses based on both current events and forecasts. When necessary , NEER uses the specifi c identification method for all other
receivables.
74
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Credit Losses – NEE's credit department monitors current and forward credit exposure to counterparties and their affiliates.
Prospective and existing customers are reviewe d for creditworthiness based on established standards and credit quality indicators.
Credit quality indicators and standards that are closely monitored include credit ratings, certain financial ratios and delinquency
trends which are based off the latest available information. Customers not meeting minimum standards provide various credit
enhancements or secured payment terms, such  as letters of credit, the posting of margin cash  collateral or use of master netting
arrangements.
For the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, NEE recorded approximately $113 million, $146 million and $94 million of
bad debt expense, including credit losses, respectively , which are included in O&M expenses in NEE’ s consolidated statements of
income. The amounts recorded in 2021 primarily relate to credit losses at NEER driven by the operational and energy market
impacts of severe prolo nged winter weather in Texas in February 2021 (February 2021 weat her event). The estimate for credit
losses related to the impacts of the February 2021 weather event was developed based on NEE’ s assessment of the ultimate
collectability of these receivables. At December 31, 2021, approximately $127 million of allowances were included in noncurrent
other assets on NEE's consolidated balance sheet related to the February 2021 weather event. During 2022, the net receivable was
settled.
Inventory  – FPL values materials, supplies and fuel inventory using a weighted-average cost method. NEER's materials, supplies
and fuel inventories, which include emissions allowances and renewable energy credits, are carried at the lower of weighted-
average cost and net realizable value, unless evidence indicates that the weighted-average cost will be recovered with a normal
profit upon sale in the ordinary course of business.
Energy Trading – NEE provides full energy and capacity requir ements services primarily to distribution utilities,  which include load-
following services and various ancillary services, in certain markets and engages in power and fuel marketing and trading activities
to optimize the value of electricity and fuel contra cts, generation facilities and gas infrastructure assets, as well as to take advantage
of projected favorable commodity price movements. Trading contracts that meet the definition of a derivative are accounted for at fair
value and realized gains  and losses from all trading contracts, including those where physical delivery is required, are recorded net
for all periods presented. See Note 3.
Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm Cost Recovery  – The storm funds provide coverage toward FPL's storm damage costs.
Marketable securities held in the storm funds are carried at fair value. See Note 4. Fund earnin gs, consisting of dividends, interest
and realized gains and losses, net of taxes, are reinvested in the funds. Fund earnings, as well as any changes in unrealized gains
and losses, are not recognized in income and are reflected as a corresponding adjustment to the storm reserve. The tax effects of
amounts not yet recogn ized for tax purposes are included in deferred income taxes. The storm  funds are included in special use
funds and the storm reserves in noncurrent regulatory liabilities, or in the case of a deficit, in regulatory assets on NEE's and FPL's
consolidated balance sheets.
During 2022, FPL’s service area was impacted by Hurricane Ian in September and Hurricane Nicole in November which resulted in
total recoverable storm restoration costs of approximately $1.3 billion. Prior to Hurricane Ian, FPL’s storm reserve had a balance of
approximately $220 million. At December 31, 2022, the recoverable storm restoration costs associated with Hurricane Ian and
Hurricane Nicole exceeded the balance of the storm reserve by approximately $1.1 billion. This deficit has been recorded by FPL as
current and noncurrent regulatory assets on NEE’s and FPL’s December 31, 2022 consolidated balance sheets. In January 2023,
FPL filed a petition with the FPSC requesting the recovery of eligible storm restoration costs over the reserve amount, plus
approximately $220 million to replenish the reserve, through an interim surcharge that would apply for a 12-month  period beginning
April 1, 2023. While a 12-month recovery period would reduce the potential bill impacts in the event of 2023 storm activity , the FPSC
may approve a longer recovery period. The amount collected will be subject to refund based on an FPSC prudence review . In
addition, FPL also provided information that incorporates the remaining unrecovered pre-2022 northwest Florida service area storm
restoration costs (see below for a discussion of such costs), estimated to be approximately $136 million at April 1, 2023, into the
interim surcharge discussed above. The unpaid portion of the storm restoration costs at December 31, 2022, of approximately
$618 million, including estimated capital costs, is included in other current liabilities on NEE’ s and FPL ’s consolidated balance sheet.
During 2021 and 2020, FPL’s service area was impacted by hurricanes and tropical storms, which resulted in the recording of
incremental storm restoration costs. FPL determined that it would not seek recovery of certain of such costs associated with the
2016 rate agreement through a storm surcharge from customers and instead recorded approximately $28 million and $183 million in
2021 and 2020, respectively , as storm restoration costs in NEE's and FPL’s consolidated statements of income (included in O&M
expenses). FPL  used available reserve amortization to of fset all such storm restoration costs that were expensed.
Restoration costs associated with multiple storms since 2018 that impacted FPL's customers in the former Gulf Power Company
service area are being collected from FPL's northwest Florida customers through a storm damage surcharge through late 2024 and
are recorded as regulatory assets. As of December 31, 2022, the balance was $155 million, of which $101 million and $54 million
are included in current regulatory assets and noncurrent regulatory assets, respectively , on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance
sheets. As of December 31, 2021, the balance was $ 242 million, of which $ 92 million and $ 150 million are
75
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
included in current regulatory assets and nonc urrent regulatory assets, respectively , on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance
sheets.
Impairment of Long-Lived Assets  – NEE evaluates long-lived assets for impairment when events or changes in circumstances
indicate that the carrying amount may not be recoverable. The impairment loss to be recognized is the amount by which the carrying
value of the long-lived asset exceeds the asset's  fair value. In most instances, the fair value is determined by discounting estimated
future cash flows using an appropriate interest rate.
Impairment of Equity Method Investments  – NEE evaluates its equity method investments for impairment when events or changes in
circumstances indicate that the fair value of the investment is less than the carrying value and the investment may be other-than-
temporarily impaired. An impairment loss is required to be recognized if the impairment is deemed to be other than temporary .
Investments that are other-than-temporarily impaired are written down to their estimated fair value and cannot subsequently be
written back up for increases in estimated fair value. Impairment losses are recorded in equity in earnings (losses) of equity method
investees in NEE’ s consolidated statements of income. See Note 4 – Nonrecurring Fair V alue Measurements.
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets  – NEE's goodwill and other intangible assets are as follows:
Weighted-
Average
Useful LivesDecember 31,
2022 2021
(years) (millions)
Goodwill (by reporting unit):
FPL segment, primarily rate-regulated utilities (see Note 6 – Merger of FPL and Gulf
Power Company) $ 2,989 $ 2,989 
NEER segment:
Rate-regulated assets, primarily transmission (see Note 6 – GridLiance) 1,218 1,206 
Gas infrastructure 487 487 
Customer supply and trading 95 95 
Clean energy assets 54 56 
Corporate and Other 11 11 
Total goodwill $ 4,854 $ 4,844 
Other intangible assets not subject to amortization, primarily land easements $ 136 $ 136 
Other intangible assets subject to amortization:
Purchased power agreements 16 $ 549 $ 507 
Other, primarily transportation contracts and customer lists 24 173 187 
Total 722 694 
Accumulated amortization (99) (88)
Total other intangible assets subject to amortization – net $ 623 $ 606 
NEE's, including FPL's, goodwill relates to various acquisitions which were accounted for using the acquisition method of
accounting. Other intangible assets are primarily included in noncurrent other assets on NEE's consolidated balance sheets. NEE's
other intangible assets subject to amortization are amortized, primarily on a straight-line basis , over their estimated useful lives.
Amortization expense was approximately $18 million, $25 million and $27 million for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and
2020, respectively , and is expected to be appro ximately $20 million, $22 million, $20 million, $22 million and $20 million for 2023,
2024, 2025, 2026 and 2027, respectively .
Goodwill and other intangible assets not subject to amortization are assessed for impairment at least annually by applying a fair
value-based analysis. Other intangible assets subject to amortization are periodically reviewe d when impairment indicators are
present to assess recoverability from future operations using undiscounted future cash flows.
Pension Plan – NEE records the service cost component of net periodic benefit income to O&M expense and the non-service cost
component to other net periodic benefit income in NEE's consolidated statements of income. NEE allocates net periodic pension
income to its subsidiaries based on the pens ionable earnings of the subsidiaries' employe es. Accounting guidance requires
recognition of the funded status of the pension  plan in the balance sheet, with changes in the funded status recognized in other
comprehensive income within shareholders' equity in the year in which the changes occur . Since NEE is the plan sponsor , and its
subsidiaries do not have separate rights to the plan assets or direct obligations to their empl oyees, this accounting guidance is
reflected at NEE and not allocated to the subsidiaries. The portion of previously unrecognized actuarial gains and losses and prior
service costs or credits that are estimated to be allocable to FPL as net periodic (income) cost in future periods and that otherwise
would be recorded in accumulated other comprehensive income (AOCI) are classified as regulatory assets and liabilities at NEE in
accordance with regulatory treatment.
76
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Stock-Based Compensation  – NEE accounts for stock-based payment transactions based on grant-date fair value. Compensation
costs for awards with graded vesting are recognized on a straight-line basis over the requisite service period for the entire award.
Forfeitures of stock-based awards are recognized as they occur . See Note 14 – Stock-Based Compensation.
Retirement of Long-T erm Debt  – For NEE's rate-regulated subsidiaries, including FPL, gains and losses that result from differences
in reacquisition cost and the net book value of long-term debt which is retired are deferred as a regulatory asset or liability and
amortized to interest expense ratably over the remaining life of the original issue, which is consistent with their treatment in the
ratemaking process. NEE's non-rate regulated subsidiaries recognize such dif ferences in interest expense at the time of retirement.
Reference Rate Reform  – In March 2020, the Financial Accounting Standards Board issued an accounting standards update which
provides certain options to apply accounting guidance on contract modifications and hedge accounting as companies transition from
the London Inter-Bank Offered Rate (LIBOR) and other interbank offered rates to alternative reference rates. NEE’ s and FPL’s
contracts that reference LIBOR or other interbank offered rates mainly relate to debt and derivative instruments. The standards
update was effective upon issuance but can be applied prospectively through December 31, 2024. During the fourth quarter of 2021,
NEE began utilizing options provided by the standards update with regard to modifications  to debt and debt-related hedging
instruments. NEE will continue to evaluate reference rate modifications to debt and derivative instruments through December 31,
2024 and continue to apply the standards update if eligible. Although the full impact is unkno wn, to date there has not been a
material impact to NEE or FPL.
Income Taxes  – Deferred income taxes are recognized on all significant temporary differences between the financial statement and
tax bases of assets and liabilities, and are presented as noncurrent on NEE's and FPL's consolid ated balance sheets. In connection
with the tax sharing agreement between NEE and certain of its subsidiaries, the income tax provision at each applicable subsidiary
reflects the use of the "separate return method," except that tax benefits that could not be used on a separate return basis, but are
used on the consolidated tax return, are recor ded by the applicable subsidiary that generated the tax benefits. Any remaining
consolidated income tax benefits or expenses are recorded at the corporate level. Included in other regulatory assets and other
regulatory liabilities on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets is the revenue equivalent of the difference in deferred income
taxes computed under accounting rules, as compared to regulatory accounting rules. The net regulatory liability totaled $3,504
million ($3,449  million for FPL) and $3,780  million ($3,723  million for FPL) at December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively , and is
being amortized in accor dance with the regulatory treatment over the estimated lives of the asset s or liabilities for which the deferred
tax amount was initially recognized.
Production tax credits (PTCs) are recognized as wind and solar energy is generated and sold based on a per kWh rate prescribed in
applicable federal and state statutes and are recorded as a reduction of current income taxes payable, unless limited by tax law in
which instance they are recorded as deferred tax assets. NEER recognizes ITCs as a reductio n to income tax expense when the
related energy property is placed into service. FPL recognizes ITCs as a reduction to income tax expense over the depreciable life of
the related energy prope rty. At December 31, 2022 and 2021, FPL’s accumulated deferred ITCs were approximately $1,031  million
and $1,054  million, respectively , and are included in noncurrent regulatory liabilities on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance
sheets.
A valuation allowance is recorded to reduce the carrying amounts of deferred tax assets when  it is more likely than not that such
assets will not be realized. NEE recognizes interest income (expense) related to unrecognize d tax benefits (liabilities) in interest
income and interest expense, respectively , net of the amount deferred at FPL. At FPL, the offset to accrued interest receivable
(payable) on income taxes is classified as a regulatory liability (regulatory asset) which will be amortized to income (expense) over a
five-year  period  upon  settlement in accordance with regulatory treatment. All tax positions taken by NEE in its income tax returns
that are recognized in the financial statements must satisfy a more-likely-than-not threshold. NEE and its subsidiaries file income tax
returns in the U.S. federal jurisdiction and vario us states, the most significant of which is Florida, and certain foreign jurisdictions.
Federal tax liabilities, with the exception of certa in refund claims, are effectively settled for all years prior to 2017. State and foreign
tax liabilities, which have varied statutes of limitations regarding additional assessments, are generally effectively settled for years
prior to 2017. At December 31, 2022, NEE had unrecognized tax benefits of approximately $119 million that, if recognized, could
impact the annual effective income tax rate. The amounts of unrecognized tax benefits and related interest accruals may change
within the next 12 months; however , NEE and FPL do not expect these changes to have a significant impact on NEE’ s or FPL’s
financial statements. See Note 5.
Sales of Differential Membership Interests  – Certain subsidiaries of NextEra Energy Resources sold Class B membership interests
in entities that have ownership interests in wind generation, solar generation and battery storage facilities, with generating/storage
capacity in operation or under construction totaling approximately 12,413  MW, 2,360  MW and 714 MW, respectively , at
December 31, 2022 , to third-par ty investors. NEE retains a control ling interest in the entities and therefore presents the Class B
member interests as noncontrolling interests. Noncontrolling interests represents the portion of net assets in consolidated entities
that are not owned by NEE and are reported as a component of equity in NEE’ s consolida ted balance sheet. The third-party
investors are allocated earnings, tax attributes and cash flows in accordance with the respective limited liability company
agreements. Those economics are allocated primarily to the third-party investors until they receive a targeted
77
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
return (the flip date) and thereafter to NEE. NEE has the right to call the third-party interests at specified amounts if and when the flip
date occurs. NEE has determined the allocation of economics between the controlling party and third-party investor should not follow
the respective ownership percentages for each wind generation, solar generation and battery storage project but rather the
hypothetical liquidation of book value (HLBV) method based on the governing provisions in each  respective limited liability company
agreement. Under the HLBV method, the amounts of income and loss attributable to the nonco ntrolling interest reflects changes in
the amount the owners would hypothetically receive at each balance sheet date under the respective liquidation provisions,
assuming the net assets of these entities were liquidated at the recorded amounts, after taking into account any capital transactions,
such as contributions and distributions, between the entities and the owners. At the point in time that the third-party investor , in
hypothetical liquidation, would achieve its targeted return, NEE attributes the additional hypothetical proceeds to the Class B
membership interests based on the call price. A loss attributable to noncontrolling interests on NEE’ s consolidated statements of
income represents earnings attributable to NEE.
Redeemable Noncontro lling Interests  – Certain subsidiaries of NextEra Energy Resources sold Class B membership interests in
entities that have owne rship interests in wind generation, as well as solar and solar plus battery storage facilities to third-party
investors. As specified in the respective limited liability company agreements, if, subject to certain contingencies, certain events
occur , includ ing, among  others, those that would delay completion or cancel any of the underlying projects, an investor has the
option to require NEER to return all or part of its investment. As these potential redemptions were outside of NEER’ s control, these
balances were classified as redeemable noncontrolling interests on NEE's consolidated balance sheets as of December 31, 2022
and 2021. During 2022 , the contingencies associated with the December 31, 2021 balance  were resolved and reclassified to
noncontrolling interests. The contingencies associated with the December 31, 2022 balance are expected to be resolved in 2023.
Variable Interest Entities (VIEs)  – An entity is considered to be a VIE when its total equity investment at risk is not sufficient to permit
the entity to finance its activities without addit ional subordinated financial support, or its equity investors, as a group, lack the
characteristics of having a controlling financial interest. A reporting company is required to consolidate a VIE as its primary
beneficiary when it has both the power to direct the activities of the VIE that most significantly impact the VIE's economic
performance, and the obligation to absorb losses or the right to receive benefits from the VIE that could potentially be significant to
the VIE. NEE and FPL evaluate whether an entity is a VIE whenever reconsideration events as defined by the accounting guidance
occur . See Note 9.
Leases  – NEE and FPL determine if an arrangement is a lease at inception. NEE and FPL recognize a right-of-use (ROU) asset and
a lease liability for operating and finance leases by recognizing and measuring leases at the commencement date based on the
present value of lease payments over the lease term. For sales-type leases, the book value of the leased asset is removed from the
balance sheet and a net investment in sales-type lease is recognized based on fixed payments under the contract and the residual
value of the asset being leased. NEE and FPL have elected not to apply the recognition requirements to short-term leases and not to
separate nonlease components from associated lease components for all classes of underlying assets except for purchased power
agreements. ROU assets are includ ed in noncurrent other asset s, lease liabilities are included in current and noncurrent other
liabilities and net investments in sales-type leases are included in current and noncurrent other assets on NEE’ s and FPL's
consolidated balance sheets. Operating lease expense is included in fuel, purchased power and interchange or O&M expenses,
interest and amortization expenses associated with finance leases are included in interest expense and depreciation and
amortization expense, respectively , and rental income associated with operating leases and interest income associated with sales-
type leases are included in operating revenues in NEE’ s and FPL ’s consolidated statements of income. See Note 10.
Disposal of Businesses/Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests – In December 2022, subsidiaries of NextEra Energy
Resources sold (i) a 49% controlling ownership interest in three  wind genera tion facilitie s and one solar plus battery facility  located in
geographically diverse locations throughout the U.S. with a total generating capacity of 1,437  MW and 65 MW of battery storage
capacity , two of which facilities are currently unde r construction with expected in service dates in 2023, and (ii) their 100% ownership
interest in three  wind generation facilities located in the Midwest region of the U.S. with a total generating capa city of 347 MW to a
NEP subsidi ary for cash proceeds of approximat ely $805 million, plus working capital and other adjustme nts of $8 million (subject to
post-closing adjustments). NEER will continue to consolidate the projects currently under construction for accounting purposes. A
NextEra Energy Resour ces affiliate will continue  to operate the facilities included in the sale. In connection with the sale, a gain of
approximately $301 million ($230 million after tax) was recorded in NEE's consolidated statements of income for the year ende d
December 31, 2022 and is included in the gains on disposal of businesses/assets – net. In connection with the facilities currently
under const ruction, approximately $251 million of cash received was recorded as contract liabilities, which is included in current
other liabilities on NEE's consolidated balance sheet at December 31, 2022. The contract liabilitie s relate to sale proceeds from NEP
of approximately $150 million and differential membership interests of approximately $101 million. The contract liabilities associated
with the sale proceeds and the differential membership interests are subject to the two facilities under construction achieving
commercial operations by specified dates in 2023. The contract liabilities will be reversed and the sale recognized for accounting
purposes if the continge ncies are resolved in 2023. Otherwise, NextEra Energy Resources may be required to return proceeds
related to differential membership interests and/or repurchase the facilities for up to $251 million. In addition, NextEra Energy
Resources is responsible to pay for all construction costs related to the portfolio. At December 31, 2022, approximately $810 million
is included in accounts payable on
78
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
NEE's conso lidated balance sheet and represe nts amounts owed by NextEra Energy Resources to NEP to reimburse NEP for
construction costs.
In September 2022, subsidiaries of NextEra Energy Resources completed the sale to a NEP subsidiary of a 67% controlling
ownership interest in a battery storage facility in California with storage capacity of 230 MW, for cash proceeds of approximately
$191 million, plus working capital and other adjustments of $2 million. A NextEra Energy Resources affiliate will continue to operate
the facility included in the sale. In connection with the sale, a gain of approximately $87 million ($66 million after tax) was recorded in
NEE's consolidated statements of income for the year ended December 31, 2022 and is included in gains on disposal of
businesses/assets – net.
In Decembe r 2021, subsidiaries of NextEra Energy Resources sold their 100% ownership  interest, comprised of a 50% controlling
ownership interest to a NEP subsidiary and a 50% noncontrolling ownership interest to a third party, in a portfolio of seven  wind
generation facilities and six solar generation facilities in geographically diverse locations throughout the U.S. representing a total
generating capacity of 2,520  MW and 115 MW of battery storage capacity , three of which facilities were under construction. Total
cash proceeds for these two separate transactions totaled approximately $1.7 billion. NEER continued to consolidate the three
projects under construc tion for accounting purposes through the first quarter of 2022. A NextEra Energy Resources affiliate will
continue to operate the facilities included in the sales. In connection with the sales, a loss of approximately $53 million ($33 million
after tax) was recorded in NEE’ s consolidated statements of income for the year ended December 31, 2021 and is included in gains
on disposal of businesses/assets – net. In connection with the three facilities that were under construction, approximately
$668 million of cash received was recorded as contra ct liabilities, which is included in current other liabilities on NEE’ s consolidated
balance sheet at Decem ber 31, 2021. The contract liabilities related to sale proceeds from NEP and the third party of approximately
$349 millio n and differential membership interests of approximately $319 millio n, of which $117 millio n was contingent  on the
enactment of a solar PTC by a specified date in 2022. In 2022, the three facilities achieved commercial operations and
approximately $551 million of contract liabilities were reversed and the sale of those facilities was recognized for accounting
purposes. In addition, the IRA was enacted estab lishing a solar PTC (see Note 5) which resolved the outstanding contingencies and
$117 million of contract liabilities were reversed and a gain was recorded in NEE's consolidated statements of income for the year
ended Dece mber 31, 2022 which is included in gains on disposal of businesses/assets – net. In addition, NextEra Energy Resources
was responsible to pay for all construction costs related to the portfolio. At December 31, 2021, approximately $970 millio n was
included in accounts payable on NEE's consolidated balance sheet and represented amounts owed by NextEra Energy Resources
to NEP  to reimburse NEP  for construction costs.
In 2021, subsidiaries of NextEra Energy Resources completed the sale to a NEP subsidiary of their 100% ownership interests in
three  wind generation facilitie s and one solar generation facility  located in the West and Midwest regions of the U.S. with a total
generating capacity of 467 MW and 33.3% of the noncontrolling ownership interests in four solar generation facilities and multiple
distributed generation solar facilities located in geographically diverse locations throughout the U.S. representing a total net
ownership interest in plant capacity (net generating capacity) of 122 MW for cash proceeds of approximately $563 million, plus
working capital and other adjustments of $22 millio n. A NextEra Energy Resources affiliate will continue to operate the facilities
included in the sale. In connection with the sale, a gain of approximately $94 million ($69 million after tax) was recorded in NEE's
consolidated statements of income for the year ended December 31, 2021, which is included in gains on disposal of
businesses/assets, and noncontrolling interests of approximately $125 million and additional paid-in capital of approximately
$60 million ($ 43 million after tax) were recorded on NEE's consolidated balance sheet at December 31, 2021.
In 2020, a subsidiary of NextEra Energy Resources sold a 90% noncontrolling ownership interest, comprised of a 50% ownership
interest to a third party and a 40% ownership interest to a NEP subsidiary , in a portfolio of three  wind generation facilitie s and four
solar genera tion facilities in geographically diverse locations throughout the U.S. representing a total net generating capacity of 900
MW. In addition, a subs idiary of NextEra Energ y Resources also sold its 100% ownership  interest in a 100 MW solar generation
facility and a 30 MW battery storage facility (solar-plus-storage facility) that was under construction in Arizona to a NEP subsidiary .
Total cash proceeds for these two separate transactions totaled approximately $656 million. NEER continued to consolidate the
projects until the sale was recognized for accounting purposes, see Note 9 – NEER. A NextEra Energy Resources affiliate will
continue to operate the facilities included in the sale. In connection  with the 90% sale, noncontrolling interests of approximately
$689 millio n and a reduction to additional paid-in capital of approximately $188 millio n ($165 millio n after tax) were recorded on
NEE's consolidated balance sheet. In connectio n with the solar-plus-storage facility transaction,  approximately $155 million of cash
received was recorded as a contract liability , and upon the solar-plus-storage facility achieving commercial operations in 2021, the
contract liability was reversed and the sale was recognized for accounting purposes.
In 2020, a subsidiary of NextEra Energy Resources completed the sale of its ownership interest in two solar gener ation facilities
located in Spain with a total generating capacity of 99.8 MW, which  resulted in net cash proceeds of approximately €111 million
(approximately $121 million). In connection with the sale, a gain of approximately $270 million (pretax and after tax) was recorded in
NEE's consolidated statements of income for the year ended December 31, 2020 and is included in gains on disposal of
businesses/assets – net.
79
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
2. Revenue from Contracts with Customers
Revenue is recognized when control of the promised goods or services is transferred to custom ers at an amount that reflects the
consideration to which the entity expects to be entitled in exchange for those goods and services . The promised goods or services in
the majority of NEE’ s contracts with customers is, at FPL, for the delivery of electricity based on tariff rates approved by the FPSC
and, at NEER, for the delivery of energy commodities and the availability of electric capacity and electric transmission.
FPL and NEER generate substantially all of NEE’ s operating revenues, which primarily include revenues from contracts with
customers, as well as derivative (see Note 3) and lease transactions at NEER. For the vast majority of contracts with customers,
NEE believes that the obligation to deliver energy, capacity or transmission is satisfied over time as the customer simultaneously
receives and consumes benefits as NEE performs. In 2022, 2021 and 2020, NEE’ s revenue from contracts with customers was
approximately $23.0 billion ($17.2 billion at FPL), $18.8 billion ($14.1 billion at FPL) and $17.0 billion ($13.0 billion at FPL),
respectively . NEE's and FPL's receivables are primarily associated with revenues earned from contracts with customers, as well as
derivative and lease transactions at NEER, and consist of both billed and unbilled amounts , which are recorded in customer
receivables and other receivables on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets. Receivabl es represent unconditional rights to
consideration and reflect the differences in timing of revenue recognition and cash collections . For substantially all of NEE's and
FPL's receivables, regardless of the type of revenue transaction from which the receivable originated, customer and counterparty
credit risk is managed in the same manner and the terms and conditions of payment are similar . During 2021, NEER did not
recognize approximately $180 million of revenue related to reimbursable expenses from a counterparty that were deemed not
probable of collection. These reimbursable expenses arose from the impacts of the February 2021 weather event. These
determinations were made based on assessments of the counterparty's creditworthiness and NEER's ability to collect.
FPL – FPL’s revenues are derived primarily from tariff-based sales that result from providing electricity to retail customers in Florida
with no defined contractual term. Electricity sales to retail customers account for approximately 90% of FPL’s 2022 opera ting
revenues, the majority of which are to residential customers. FPL’s retail customers receive a bill monthly based on the amount of
monthly kWh usage with payment due monthly . For these types of sales, FPL recognizes revenue as electricity is delivered and
billed to customers, as well as an estimate for electricity delivered and not yet billed. The billed and unbilled amounts represent the
value of electricity delivered to the customer . At December 31, 2022 and 2021, FPL's unbilled revenues amounted to approximately
$661 million and $583 million, respectively , and are included in custo mer receivables on NEE’ s and FPL’s consolidated balance
sheets. Certain contracts with customers conta in a fixed price which primarily relate to certain power purchase agreements with
maturity dates through 2041. As of December 31, 2022, FPL expects to record approximately  $390 million of revenues related to the
fixed capaci ty price components of such contracts over the remaining terms of the related contracts as the capacity is provided.
These contracts also contain a variable price component for energy usage which FPL recognizes as revenue as the energy is
delivered based on rates stipulated in the respective contracts.
NEER  – NEER’ s revenue from contracts with custome rs is derived primarily from the sale of energy commodities, electric capacity
and electric transmission . For these types of sales, NEER recognizes revenue as energy comm odities are delivered and as electric
capacity and electric transmission are made available, consistent with the amounts billed to customers based on rates stipulated in
the respective contracts as well as an accrual for amounts earned but not yet billed. The amounts billed and accrued represent the
value of energy or transmission delivered and/or the capacity of energy or transmission available to the customer . Revenues yet to
be earned under these contracts, which have maturity dates ranging from 2023 to 2053, will vary based on the volume of energy or
transmission delivered and/or available. NEER’ s customers typically receive bills monthly with payment due within 30 days. Certain
contracts with customers contain a fixed price which primarily relate to electric capacity sales through 2036, certain power purchase
agreements with maturity dates through  2034 and capacity sales associated with natural gas transportation through 2062. At
December 31, 2022, NEER expects to record approximately $1.2 billion of revenues related to the fixed price components of such
contracts over the remaining terms of the related contracts as the capacity is provided. The power purchase agreements also
contain a variable price component for energy usage which NEER recognizes as revenue as the energy is delivered based on rates
stipulated in the respective contracts.
3. Derivative Instruments
NEE and FPL use derivative instruments (primarily swaps, options, futures and forwards) to manage the physical and financial risks
inherent in the purchase and sale of fuel and electricity , as well as interest rate and foreign currency exchange rate risk associated
primarily with outstanding and expected future  debt issuances and borrowings, and to optimize the value of NEER's power
generation and gas infrastructure assets. NEE and FPL  do not utilize hedge accounting for their cash flow and fair value hedges.
With respect to commodities related to NEE's competitive energy business, NEER employs risk management procedures to conduct
its activities related to optimizing the value of its power generation and gas infrastructure assets, providing full energy and capacity
requirements services primarily to distribution utilities, and engaging in power and fuel marketing and trading activities to take
advantage of expected future favorable price movements and changes in the expected volatility of prices in the energy markets.
These risk management activities involve the use of derivative instruments executed within prescribed limits to
80
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
manage the risk associa ted with fluctuating commodity prices. Transactions in derivative instruments are executed on recognized
exchanges or via the over-the-counter (OTC) markets, depending on the most favorable credit terms and market execution factors.
For NEER's power generation and gas infrastructure assets, derivative instruments are used to hedge all or a portion of the
expected output of these assets. These hedges are designed to reduce the effect of adverse changes in the wholesale forward
commodity markets associated with NEER's power generation and gas infrastructure assets. With regard to full energy and capacity
requirements services, NEER is required to vary the quantity of energy and related services based on the load demands of the
customers served. For this type of transaction, derivative instruments are used to hedge the antic ipated electricity quantities required
to serve these custome rs and reduce the effect of unfavorable changes in the forward energy  markets. Additionally , NEER takes
positions in energy markets based on differences between actual forward market levels and management's view of fundamental
market cond itions, including supply/demand imbalances, changes in traditional flows of energy , changes in short- and long-term
weather patterns and anticipated regulatory and legislative outcomes. NEER uses derivative instruments to realize value from these
market dislocations, subject to strict risk management limits around market, operational and credit exposure.
Derivative instruments, when required to be marked to market, are recorded on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets as
either an asset or liability measured at fair value. At FPL, substantially all changes in the derivatives' fair value are deferred as a
regulatory asset or liability until the contracts are settled, and, upon settlement, any gains or losses are passed through the fuel and
purchased power cost recovery clause (fuel clause). For NEE's non-rate regulated operations, predominantly NEER, essentially all
changes in the derivatives' fair value for power purchases and sales, fuel sales and trading activities are recognized on a net basis in
operating revenues and the equity method investees' related activity is recognized in equity in earnings of equity method investees
in NEE's consolidated statements of income. Settlement gains and losses are included within the line items in the consolidated
statements of income to which they relate. Transactions for which physical delivery is deemed not to have occurred are presented on
a net basis in the consol idated statements of income. For commodity derivatives, NEE believes that, where offsetting positions exist
at the same location for the same time, the transactions are considered to have been netted and therefore physical delivery has
been deemed not to have occurred for financial reporting purposes. Settlements related to deriva tive instruments are substantially all
recognized in net cash provided by operating activities in NEE's and FPL's consolidated statements of cash flows.
For interest rate and foreign currency derivative instruments, all changes in the derivatives' fair value, as well as the transaction gain
or loss on foreign deno minated debt, are recognized in interest expense and the equity method investees' related activity is
recognized in equity in earnings (losses) of equit y method investees in NEE's consolidated statements of income.  In addition, for the
year ended December 31, 2020, NEE reclassified from AOCI approximately $26 million ($6 million after tax), of which $23 million
was reclass ified to gains on disposal of busin esses/assets – net (see Note 1 – Disposal of Businesses/Assets and Sale of
Noncontrolling Ownership Interests) with the balance to interest expense, because it became probable that related future
transactions being hedged would not occur . At December 31, 2022, NEE's AOCI included amounts related to discontinued interest
rate cash flow hedges with expiration dates through March 2035 and foreign currency cash flow hedges with expiration dates
through September 2030. Approximately $2 millio n of net losses included in AOCI at December 31, 2022 are expected to be
reclassified into earnings within the next 12 months as the principal and/or interest payments are made. Such amounts assume no
change in scheduled principal payments.
Fair Value Measuremen ts of Derivative Instruments  – The fair value of assets and liabilities are determined using either unadjusted
quoted price s in active markets (Level 1) or pricing inputs that are observable (Level 2) whenever that information is available and
using unobs ervable inputs (Level 3) to estimate fair value only when relevant observable inputs are not available. NEE and FPL use
several different valuation techniques to measur e the fair value of assets and liabilities, relying primarily on the market approach of
using prices and other market information for identical and/or comparable assets and liabilities for those assets and liabilities that are
measured at fair value on a recurring basis. NEE's and FPL's assessment of the significance of any particular input to the fair value
measurement requires judgment and may affect placement within the fair value hierarchy levels. Non-performance risk, including the
consideration of a credit valuation adjustment, is also considered in the determination of fair value for all assets and liabilities
measured at fair value.
NEE and FPL measure the fair value of commodity contracts using a combination of market and income approaches utilizing prices
observed on commoditie s exchanges and in the OTC markets, or through the use of industry-sta ndard valuation techniques, such as
option modeling or discounted cash flows techniques, incorporating both observable and unobservable valuation inputs. The
resulting measurements  are the best estimate of fair value as represented by the transfer of the asset or liability through an orderly
transaction in the marketplace at the measurement date.
Most exchange-traded derivative assets and liabilities are valued directly using unadjusted quoted prices. For exchange-traded
derivative assets and liabilities where the principal market is deemed to be inactive based on average daily volumes and open
interest, the measureme nt is established using settlement prices from the exchanges, and there fore considered to be valued using
other observable inputs.
81
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
NEE, throug h its subsidiaries, including FPL, also enters into OTC commodity contract derivatives. The majority of these contracts
are transacted at liquid trading points, and the prices for these contracts are verified using quoted prices in active markets from
exchanges, brokers or pricing services for similar contracts.
NEE, through NEER, also enters into full requir ements contracts, which, in most cases, meet the definition of derivatives and are
measured at fair value. These contracts typically have one or more inputs that are not observable and are significant to the valuation
of the contract. In addition, certain exchange and non-exchange traded derivative options at NEE have one or more significant inputs
that are not observable, and are valued using industry-standard option models.
In all cases where NEE and FPL use significant unobservable inputs for the valuation of a commodity contract, consideration is given
to the assumptions that market participants would use in valuing the asset or liability . The primary input to the valuation models for
commodity contracts is the forward commodity curve for the respective instruments. Other inputs include, but are not limited to,
assumptions about market liquidity , volatility , correlation and contract duration as more fully described below in Significant
Unobservable Inputs Used in Recurring Fair Value Measurements. In instances where the reference markets are deemed to be
inactive or do not have transactions for a similar contract, the derivative assets and liabilities may be valued using significant other
observable inputs and potentially significant unobservable inputs. In such instances, the valuation for these contracts is established
using techni ques including extrapolation from or interpolation between actively traded contracts, or estimated basis adjustments from
liquid trading points. NEE and FPL regularly evaluate and validate the inputs used to determine fair value by a number of methods,
consisting of various market price verification procedures, including the use of pricing services and multiple broker quotes to support
the market price of the various commodities. In all cases where there are assumptions and models used to generate inputs for
valuing deriv ative asset s and liabilities, the review and verification of the assumptions, mode ls and changes to the models are
undertaken by individuals that are independent of those responsible for estimating fair value.
NEE uses interest rate contracts and foreign currency contracts to mitigate and adjust interest rate and foreign currency exchange
exposure related primarily to certain outstandin g and expected future debt issuances and borrowings when deemed appropriate
based on market conditions or when required by financing agreements. NEE estimates the fair value of these derivatives using an
income approach based on a discounted cash flows valuation technique utilizing the net amount of estimated future cash inflows and
outflows related to the agreements .
The tables below present NEE's and FPL's gross derivative positions at December 31, 2022 and 2021, as required by disclosure
rules. Howe ver, the majority of the underlying contracts are subject to master netting agreements and generally would not be
contractually settled on a gross basis. Therefore, the tables below also present the derivative positions on a net basis, which reflect
the offsetting of positions of certain transactions within the portfolio, the contractual ability to settle contracts under master netting
arrangements and the netting of margin cash collateral, as well as the location of the net derivative position on the consolidated
balance sheets.
82
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
December 31, 2022
Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Netting Total
(millions)
Assets:
NEE:
Commodity contracts $ 5,372 $ 7,559 $ 2,094 $ (12,030)$ 2,995 
Interest rate contracts $ — $ 583 $ — $ (49) 534 
Foreign currency contracts $ — $ — $ — $ (4) (4)
Total derivative assets $ 3,525 
FPL – commodity contracts $ — $ 11 $ 25 $ (7)$ 29 
Liabilities:
NEE:
Commodity contracts $ 7,185 $ 7,620 $ 2,948 $ (13,010)$ 4,743 
Interest rate contracts $ — $ 191 $ — $ (49) 142 
Foreign currency contracts $ — $ 130 $ — $ (4) 126 
Total derivative liabilities $ 5,011 
FPL – commodity contracts $ — $ 4 $ 16 $ (7)$ 13 
Net fair value by NEE balance sheet line item:
Current derivative assets $ 1,590 
Noncurrent derivative assets 1,935 
Total derivative assets $ 3,525 
Current derivative liabilities $ 2,102 
Noncurrent derivative liabilities 2,909 
Total derivative liabilities $ 5,011 
Net fair value by FPL balance sheet line item:
Current other assets $ 19 
Noncurrent other assets 10 
Total derivative assets $ 29 
Current other liabilities $ 12 
Noncurrent other liabilities 1 
Total derivative liabilities $ 13 
______________________
(a)Includes the effect of the contractual ability to settle contracts under master netting arrangements and the netting of margin cash collateral payments and receipts.
NEE and FPL also have contract settlement receivable and payable balances that are subject to the master netting arrangements but are not offset within the
consolidated balance sheets and are recorded in customer receivables – net and accounts payable, respectively.
(b)Reflects the netting of approximately $299 million in margin cash collateral received from counterparties.
(c)Reflects the netting of approximately $262 million in margin cash collateral received from counterparties.
(d)Reflects the netting of approximately $328 million in margin cash collateral paid to counterparties.
(e)Reflects the netting of approximately $1,213 million in margin cash collateral paid to counterparties.(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
83
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
December 31, 2021
Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Netting Total
(millions)
Assets:
NEE:
Commodity contracts $ 1,896 $ 5,082 $ 1,401 $ (6,622)$ 1,757 
Interest rate contracts $ — $ 106 $ — $ (30) 76 
Foreign currency contracts $ — $ 8 $ — $ (17) (9)
Total derivative assets $ 1,824 
FPL – commodity contracts $ — $ 3 $ 13 $ (3)$ 13 
Liabilities:
NEE:
Commodity contracts $ 2,571 $ 4,990 $ 1,231 $ (6,594)$ 2,198 
Interest rate contracts $ — $ 739 $ — $ (30) 709 
Foreign currency contracts $ — $ 86 $ — $ (17) 69 
Total derivative liabilities $ 2,976 
FPL – commodity contracts $ — $ 8 $ 5 $ (3)$ 10 
Net fair value by NEE balance sheet line item:
Current derivative assets $ 689 
Noncurrent derivative assets 1,135 
Total derivative assets $ 1,824 
Current derivative liabilities $ 1,263 
Noncurrent derivative liabilities 1,713 
Total derivative liabilities $ 2,976 
Net fair value by FPL balance sheet line item:
Current other assets $ 13 
Current other liabilities $ 9 
Noncurrent other liabilities 1 
Total derivative liabilities $ 10 
______________________
(a)Includes the effect of the contractual ability to settle contracts under master netting arrangements and the netting of margin cash collateral payments and receipts.
NEE and FPL also have contract settlement receivable and payable balances that are subject to the master netting arrangements but are not offset within the
consolidated balance sheets and are recorded in customer receivables – net and accounts payable, respectively.
(b)Reflects the netting of approximately $150 million in margin cash collateral received from counterparties.
(c)Reflects the netting of approximately $56 million in margin cash collateral received from counterparties.
(d)Reflects the netting of approximately $6 million in margin cash collateral paid to counterparties.
(e)Reflects the netting of approximately $172 million in margin cash collateral paid to counterparties
At December 31, 2022 and 2021, NEE had approximately $106 million (none  at FPL) and $56 million (none  at FPL), respectively , in
margin cash collateral received from counterparties that was not offset against derivative assets in the above presentation. These
amounts are included in current other liabilities on NEE's consolidated balance sheets. Additionally , at December 31, 2022 and 2021,
NEE had approximately  $268 million (none  at FPL) and $673 million (none  at FPL), respectively , in margin cash collateral paid to
counterparties that was not offset against derivative assets or liabilities in the above presentation. These amounts are included in
current other assets on NEE's consolidated balance sheets.
Significant Unobservable Inputs Used in Recu rring Fair Value Measurements  – The valuation of certain commodity contracts
requires the use of significant unobservable inputs. All forward price, implied volatility , implied correlation and interest rate inputs
used in the valuation of such contracts are directly based on third-party market data, such as broker quotes and exchange
settlements, when that data is available. If third-party market data is not available, then industry standard methodologies are used to
develop inputs that maximize the use of relevant observable inputs and minimize the use of unobservable inputs. Observable inputs,
including some forward prices, implied volatilitie s and interest rates used for determining fair value are updated daily to reflect the
best available market information. Unobservable inputs which are related to observable inputs, such as illiquid portions of forward
price or volatility curves, are updated daily as well, using industry standard techniques, such  as interpolation and extrapolation,
combining observable forward inputs supplemented by historical market and other relevant data. Other unobservable inputs, such as
implied correlations, block-to-hourly price shaping, customer migration rates from full(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
84
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
requirements contracts and some implied volatility curves, are modeled using proprietary models based on historical data and
industry standard techniques.
The significant unobservable inputs used in the valuation of NEE's commodity contracts categorized as Level 3 of the fair value
hierarchy at December 31, 2022 are as follows:
Transaction TypeFair V alue at
December 31, 2022Valuation
Technique(s)Significant
Unobservable Inputs RangeWeighted-
average
Assets Liabilities
(millions)
Forward contracts – power $ 222 $ 621 Discounted cash flow Forward price (per MWh ) $(9)— $564 $51
Forward contracts – gas 349 307 Discounted cash flow Forward price (per MMBtu ) $2 — $23 $4
Forward contracts – congestion 68 12 Discounted cash flow Forward price (per MWh ) $(21)— $26 $1
Options – power 114 5 Option models Implied correlations 44% — 90% 56%
Implied volatilities 32% —361% 134%
Options – primarily gas 726 736 Option models Implied correlations 44% — 90% 56%
Implied volatilities 24% —298% 59%
Full requirements and unit
contingent contracts457 1,037  Discounted cash flow Forward price (per MWh ) $13 — $424 $73
Customer migration rate —% —103% 6%
Forward contracts – other 158 230 
Total $ 2,094  $ 2,948  
______________________
(a)Unobservable inputs were weighted by volume.
(b)Megawatt-hours
(c)One million British thermal units
(d)Applies only to full requirements contracts.
The sensitivity of NEE's fair value measurements to increases (decreases) in the significant unobservable inputs is as follows:
Significant Unobservable Input PositionImpact on
Fair Value Measurement
Forward price Purchase power/gas Increase (decrease)
Sell power/gas Decrease (increase)
Implied correlations Purchase option Decrease (increase)
Sell option Increase (decrease)
Implied volatilities Purchase option Increase (decrease)
Sell option Decrease (increase)
Customer migration rate Sell power Decrease (increase)
————————————
(a)Assumes the contract is in a gain position.(a)
(b)
(c)
(b)
(b)
(d)
(a)
85
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
The reconciliation of changes in the fair value of derivatives that are based on significant unobservable inputs is as follows:
Years Ended December 31,
2022 2021 2020
NEE FPL NEE FPL NEE FPL
(millions)
Fair value of net derivatives based on significant unobservable inputs at
December 31 of prior year $ 170 $ 8 $ 1,374 $ (1)$ 1,207 $ (8)
Realized and unrealized gains (losses):
Included in earnings (2,343) — (1,488) — 547 — 
Included in other comprehensive income (loss) — — — — 1 — 
Included in regulatory assets and liabilities 158 158 8 8 2 2 
Purchases 542 — 243 — 191 — 
Sales — — — — 114 — 
Settlements 992 (157) 259 1 (562) 6 
Issuances (362) — (196) — (123) — 
Transfers in (4) — 2 — 18 (1)
Transfers out (7) — (32) — (21) — 
Fair value of net derivatives based on significant unobservable inputs at
December 31 $ (854)$ 9 $ 170 $ 8 $ 1,374 $ (1)
Gains (losses) included in earnings attributable to the change in unrealized gains
(losses) relating to derivatives held at the reporting date $ (1,162)$ — $ (924)$ — $ 317 $ — 
______________________
(a)For the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, realized and unrealized gains (losses) of approximately $(2,343) million, $(1,488) million and $569 million
are included in the consolidated statements of income in operating revenues and the balance is included in interest expense.
(b)Included in net unrealized gains (losses) on foreign currency translation in the consolidated statements of comprehensive income.
(c)See Note 1 – Disposal of Businesses/Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests.
(d)Transfers into Level 3 were a result of decreased observability of market data. Transfers from Level 3 to Level 2 were a result of increased observability of market
data.
(e)For the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, unrealized gains (losses) of approximately $(1,162) million, $(924) million and $317 million are included in
the consolidated statements of income in operating revenues and the balance is included in interest expense.
Income Statement Impact of Derivative Instruments  – Gains (losses) related to NEE's derivatives are recorded in NEE's
consolidated statements of income as follows:
Years Ended December 31,
2022 2021 2020
(millions)
Commodity contracts – operating revenues (including $2,346 unrealized losses, $2,235
unrealized losses and $163 unrealized losses, respectively) $ (3,297)$ (2,710)$ 352 
Foreign currency contracts – interest expense (including $53 unrealized losses, $89
unrealized losses and $26 unrealized gains, respectively) (61) (89) 8 
Interest rate contracts – interest expense (including $1,021 unrealized gains, $319
unrealized gains and $396 unrealized losses, respectively) 1,221 264 (421)
Losses reclassified from AOCI:
Interest rate contracts (5) (7) (35)
Foreign currency contracts – interest expense (3) (3) (3)
Total $ (2,145)$ (2,545)$ (99)
______________________
(a)For the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, FPL recorded gains of approximately $211 million, $7 million and $6 million, respectively, related to
commodity contracts as regulatory liabilities on its consolidated balance sheets.
(b)For the year ended December 31, 2020, approximately $23 million was reclassified to gains on disposal of businesses/assets – net (see Note 1 – Disposal of
Businesses/Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests); remaining balances were reclassified to interest expense on NEE's consolidated statements of
income.
Notional Volumes of Derivative Instruments  – The following table represents net notiona l volumes associated with derivative
instruments that are required to be reported at fair value in NEE's and FPL's consolidated financial statements. The table includes
significant volumes of transactions that have minimal exposure to commodity price changes because they are variably priced
agreements. These volumes are only an indicati on of the commodity exposure that is managed through the use of derivatives. They
do not represent net physical asset positions or non-derivative positions and the related hedge s, nor do they represent NEE's and
FPL's net economic exposure, but only the net notional derivative positions that fully or partially  hedge the related asset positions.
NEE and FPL  had derivative commodity contracts for the following net notional volumes:(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(d)
(e)
(a)
(b)
86
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
Commodity Type NEE FPL NEE FPL
(millions)
Power (104)MWh — (103)MWh — 
Natural gas (1,307)MMBtu 258 MMBtu (1,290)MMBtu 91 MMBtu
Oil (38)barrels — (33)barrels — 
At Decembe r 31, 2022 and 2021, NEE had interest rate contracts with a notional amount of approximately $19.7 billion and $11.2
billion, respectively , and foreign currency contracts with a notional amount of approximately $ 1.0 billion and $ 1.0 billion, respectively .
Credit-Risk-Related Contingent Features  – Certain derivative instruments contain credit-risk-related contingent features including,
among other things, the requirement to maintain  an investment grade credit rating from specifie d credit rating agencies and certain
financial ratios, as well as credit-related cross-default and material adverse change triggers. At December 31, 2022 and 2021, the
aggregate fair value of NEE's derivative instruments with credit-risk-related contingent features that were in a liability position was
approximately $ 7.4 billion ($ 15 million for FPL) and $ 4.1 billion ($ 12 million for FPL), respectively .
If the credit-risk-related contingent features underlying these derivative agreements were triggered, certain subsidiaries of NEE,
including FPL, could be required to post collater al or settle contracts according to contractual terms which generally allow netting of
contracts in offsetting positions. Certain derivative contracts contain multiple types of credit-related triggers. To the extent these
contracts contain a credit ratings downgrade trigger , the maximum exposure is included in the following credit ratings collateral
posting requirements. If FPL's and NEECH's credit ratings were downgraded to BBB/Baa2 (a three level downgrade for FPL and a
one level downgrade for NEECH from the current lowest applicable rating), applicable NEE subsidiaries would be required to post
collateral such that the total posted collateral would be approximately $1,625  million (none  at FPL) and $645 million (none  at FPL) at
December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively . If FPL's and NEECH's credit ratings were downgraded to below investment grade,
applicable NEE subsidiaries would be required to post additional collateral such that the total posted collateral would be
approximately $5.2 billion ($20 million at FPL) and $2.7 billion ($35 million at FPL) at December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively .
Some derivative contracts do not contain credit  ratings downgrade triggers, but do contain provisions that require certain financial
measures be maintained  and/or have credit-rela ted cross-default triggers. In the event these provisions were triggered, applicable
NEE subsidiaries could be required to post additional collateral of up to approximately $1.1 billion ($185 million at FPL) and $1.0
billion ($ 145 million at FPL) at December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively .
Collateral related to derivatives may be posted in the form of cash or credit support in the normal course of business. At
December 31, 2022 and 2021, applicable NEE subsidiaries have posted approximately $59 million (none  at FPL) and $84 million
(none  at FPL), respectively , in cash and $ 1.2 billion ( none  at FPL) and $ 1.1 billion ( none  at FPL), respectively , in the form of letters of
credit each of which could be applied toward the collateral requirements described above. FPL and NEECH have capacity under
their credit facilities generally in excess of the collateral requirements described above that would be available to support, among
other things, derivative activities. Under the terms of the credit facilities, maintenance of a specific credit rating is not a condition to
drawing on these credit facilities, although there are other conditions to drawing on these credit facilities.
Additionally , some contracts contain certain adequate assurance provisions whereby a counterparty may demand additional
collateral based on subjective events and/or conditions. Due to the subjective nature of these provisions, NEE and FPL are unable to
determine an exact value for these items and they are not included in any of the quantitative disclosures above.
4. Non-Derivative Fair Value Measurements
Non-derivative fair value measurements consist of NEE’ s and FPL’s cash equivalents and restricted cash equivalents, special use
funds and other investments. The fair value of these financial assets is determined by using the valuation techniques and inputs as
described in Note 3 – Fair V alue Measurements of Derivative Instruments as well as below .
Cash Equivalents  and Restricted Cash Equivalents – NEE and FPL hold investments in money market funds. The fair value of these
funds is estimated using a market approach based on current observable market prices.
Special Use Funds and Other Investments – NEE and FPL hold primarily debt and equity securities directly , as well as indirectly
through commingled funds. Substantially all directly held equity securities are valued at their quoted market prices. For directly held
debt securities, multiple prices and price types are obtained from pricing vendors whenever possible, which enables cross-provider
validations. A primary price source is identified based on asset type, class or issue of each security. Commingled funds, which are
similar to mutual funds, are maintained by banks  or investment companies and hold certain inves tments in accordance with a stated
set of objectives. The fair value of commingled funds is primarily derived from the quoted prices  in active markets of the underlying
securities. Because the fund shares are offered to a limited group of investors, they are not considered to be traded in an active
market.
87
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Fair Value Measurement Alternative – NEE holds investments in equity securities without readily determinable fair values, which are
initially recorded at cost, of approximately $485 millio n and $72 millio n at December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively , and are
included in noncurrent other assets on NEE's consolidated balance sheets. Adjustments to carrying values are recorded as a result
of observable price changes in transactions for identical or similar investments of the same issuer .
Recurring Non-Derivative Fair Value Measurements  – NEE's and FPL's financi al assets and other fair value measurements made on
a recurring basis by fair value hierarchy level are as follows:
 December 31, 2022
 Level 1 Level 2  Level 3 Total
 (millions)
Assets:      
Cash equivalents and restricted cash equivalents:      
NEE – equity securities $ 961 $ —  $ — $ 961 
FPL – equity securities $ 36 $ —  $ — $ 36 
Special use funds:   
NEE:   
Equity securities $ 2,062 $ 2,375 $ — $ 4,437 
U.S. Government and municipal bonds $ 641 $ 63  $ — $ 704 
Corporate debt securities $ 6 $ 716  $ — $ 722 
Asset-backed securities $ — $ 615  $ — $ 615 
Other debt securities $ 1 $ 19  $ — $ 20 
FPL:   
Equity securities $ 743 $ 2,162 $ — $ 2,905 
U.S. Government and municipal bonds $ 505 $ 29  $ — $ 534 
Corporate debt securities $ 6 $ 547  $ — $ 553 
Asset-backed securities $ — $ 473  $ — $ 473 
Other debt securities $ 1 $ 11  $ — $ 12 
Other investments:   
NEE:   
Equity securities $ 30 $ 1  $ — $ 31 
Debt securities $ 117 $ 300  $ 118 $ 535 
FPL:
Equity securities $ 9 $ — $ — $ 9 
Debt securities $ — $ 114 $ — $ 114 
______________________
(a)Includes restricted cash equivalents of approximately $69 million ($33 million for FPL) in current other assets on the consolidated balance sheets.
(b)Excludes investments accounted for under the equity method and loans not measured at fair value on a recurring basis. See Fair Value of Financial Instruments
Recorded at Other than Fair Value below.
(c)Primarily invested in commingled funds whose underlying securities would be Level 1 if those securities were held directly by NEE or FPL.
(d)Included in noncurrent other assets on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets.(a)
(b)
(c)
(c)
(d)
88
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
December 31, 2021
Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total
(millions)
Assets:      
Cash equivalents and restricted cash equivalents:      
NEE – equity securities $ 176 $ — $ — $ 176 
FPL – equity securities $ 58 $ — $ — $ 58 
Special use funds:      
NEE:      
Equity securities $ 2,538 $ 2,973 $ — $ 5,511 
U.S. Government and municipal bonds $ 770 $ 75  $ — $ 845 
Corporate debt securities $ 7 $ 955  $ — $ 962 
Asset-backed securities $ — $ 663  $ — $ 663 
Other debt securities $ 2 $ 33  $ — $ 35 
FPL:      
Equity securities $ 862 $ 2,690 $ — $ 3,552 
U.S. Government and municipal bonds $ 624 $ 44  $ — $ 668 
Corporate debt securities $ 6 $ 720  $ — $ 726 
Asset-backed securities $ — $ 515  $ — $ 515 
Other debt securities $ 2 $ 23  $ — $ 25 
Other investments:      
NEE:      
Equity securities $ 70 $ 2 $ — $ 72 
Debt securities $ 111 $ 162 $ 12 $ 285 
FPL – equity securities $ 13 $ — $ — $ 13 
______________________
(a)Includes restricted cash equivalents of approximately $56 million ($53 million for FPL) in current other assets on the consolidated balance sheets.
(b)Excludes investments accounted for under the equity method and loans not measured at fair value on a recurring basis. See Fair Value of Financial Instruments
Recorded at Other than Fair Value below.
(c)Primarily invested in commingled funds whose underlying securities would be Level 1 if those securities were held directly by NEE or FPL.
(d)Included in noncurrent other assets on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets.
Contingent Consideratio n – NEER had approximately $203 millio n and $261 millio n of contingent consideration liabilities at
December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively , which are included in noncurrent other liabilities on NEE's consolidated balance sheets.
The liabilities relate to contingent consideration for the completion of capital expenditures for future development projects in
connection with the acquisition  of GridLianc e Holdco, LP and GridLiance GP, LLC (GridLiance) (see Note 6 – GridLiance). NEECH
guarantees the contingent consideration obligations under the GridLiance acquisition agreements. Significant inputs and
assumptions used in the fair value measurement, some of which are Level 3 and require judgement, include the projected timing and
amount of future cash flows, estimated probability of completing future development projects as well as discount rates.
Fair Value of Financial Instruments Recorded at Other than Fair Value – The carrying  amounts of commercial paper and other short-
term debt approximate their fair values. The carrying amounts and estimated fair values of other financial instruments recorded at
other than fair value are as follows:(a)
(b)
(c)
(c)
(d)
89
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
Carrying
AmountEstimated
Fair ValueCarrying
AmountEstimated
Fair Value
 (millions)  
NEE:
Special use funds $ 998 $ 999 $ 906 $ 907 
Other receivables, net of allowances $ 221 $ 221 $ 26 $ 26 
Long-term debt, including current portion $ 61,889 $ 57,892 $ 52,745 $ 57,290 
FPL:
Special use funds $ 744 $ 744 $ 672 $ 672 
Long-term debt, including current portion $ 21,002 $ 19,364 $ 18,510 $ 21,379 
______________________
(a)Primarily represents investments accounted for under the equity method and loans not measured at fair value on a recurring basis (Level 2).
(b)Included in noncurrent other assets on NEE's consolidated balance sheets (primarily Level 3).
(c)At December 31, 2022 and 2021, substantially all is Level 2 for NEE and FPL.
Special Use Funds and Other Investments Carried at Fair Value – The speci al use funds noted above and those  carried at fair value
(see Recurr ing Non-De rivative Fair Value Measurements above) consist of NEE's nuclear decommissioning fund assets of
approximately $7,495  million ($5,220  million for FPL) and $8,846  million ($6,082  million for FPL) at Dece mber 31, 2022 and 2021,
respectively , and FPL's storm fund assets of $1 million and $76 million at December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively . The
investments held in the special use funds and other investments consist of equity and available for sale debt securities which are
primarily carried at estimated fair value. The amortized cost of debt securities is approximatel y $2,858  million ($1,873  million for
FPL) and $2,438  millio n ($1,877  millio n for FPL) at December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively . Debt securities included in the
nuclear decommissionin g funds have a weighted-average maturity at December 31, 2022 of approximately nine years at both NEE
and FPL. Other investments primarily consist of debt securities with a weighted-average maturity at December 31, 2022 of
approximately seven years . The cost of securities sold is determined using the specific identification method.
For FPL's special use funds, changes in fair value of debt and equity securities, including any estimated credit losses of debt
securities, result in a corresponding adjustment to the related regulatory asset or liability accounts, consistent with regulatory
treatment. For NEE's non-rate regulated operations, changes in fair value of debt securities result in a corresponding adjustment to
OCI, except for estimated credit losses and unrealized losses on debt securities intended or required to be sold prior to recovery of
the amortized cost basis , which are recognized in other – net in NEE's consolidated statements  of income. Changes in fair value of
equity securities are primarily recorded in change in unrealized gains (losses) on equity securities held in NEER's nuclear
decommissioning funds – net in NEE’ s consolidated statements of income.
Unrealized gains (losses) recognized on equity securities held at December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020 are as follows:
NEE FPL
Years Ended December 31, Years Ended December 31,
2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
(millions)
Unrealized gains (losses) $ (1,028)$ 981 $ 627 $ (677)$ 652 $ 444 
Realized gains and losses and proceeds from the sale or maturity of available for sale debt securities are as follows:
NEE FPL
Years Ended December 31, Years Ended December 31,
2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
(millions)
Realized gains $ 30 $ 78 $ 110 $ 24 $ 59 $ 83 
Realized losses $ 141 $ 73 $ 70 $ 111 $ 57 $ 56 
Proceeds from sale or maturity of securities$ 2,207 $ 1,831 $ 2,541 $ 1,371 $ 1,330 $ 2,162 
The unrealized gains and unrealized losses on available for sale debt securities and the fair value of available for sale debt
securities in an unrealized loss position are as follows:(a)
(b)
(c) (c)
(a)
(c) (c)
90
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
NEE FPL
December 31, December 31,
2022 2021 2022 2021
 (millions)  
Unrealized gains $ 4 $ 76 $ 3 $ 63 
Unrealized losses $ 285 $ 19 $ 193 $ 15 
Fair value $ 2,315 $ 1,100 $ 1,466 $ 857 
______________________
(a)Unrealized losses on available for sale debt securities in an unrealized loss position for greater than twelve months at December 31, 2022 and 2021 were not
material to NEE or FPL.
Regulations issued by the FERC and the NRC provide general risk management guidelines to protect nuclear decommissioning
funds and to allow such funds to earn a reasona ble return. The FERC regulations prohibit, among other investments, investments in
any securities of NEE or its subsidiaries, affiliates or associates, excluding investments tied to market indices or mutual funds.
Similar restrictions applicable to the decommiss ioning funds for NEER's nuclear plants are included in the NRC operating licenses
for those facilities or in NRC regulations applicable to NRC licensees not in cost-of-service environments. With respect to the
decommissioning fund for Seabrook, decommissioning fund contributions and withdrawals are also regulated by the NDFC pursuant
to New Hampshire law .
The nuclear decommissioning reserve funds are managed by investment managers who must comply with the guidelines of NEE
and FPL and the rules of the applicable regulato ry authorities. The funds' assets are invested giving consideration to taxes, liquidity ,
risk, diversification and other prudent investment objectives.
Nonrecurring Fair Value Measurements – NEE tests its equity method investments for impairment whenever events or changes in
circumstances indicate that the investment may be impaired. During the preparation of NEE's December 31, 2020 financial
statements, it was determined that NextEra Energy Resources' investment in Mountain Valley Pipeline, LLC (Mountain Valley
Pipeline) accounted for under the equity method  of accounting was other-than-temporarily impa ired. The impairment is the result of
continued legal and regulatory challenges that have resulted in substantial delays in achieving commercial operation and increased
costs to complete constr uction. More specifically at the end of 2020 and into early 2021, developments in the legal, regulatory and
political environment caused NextEra Energy Resources to consider the investment impaired and the impairment to be other than
temporary . The challenges included legal challenges to the various permits needed to complete construction and the regulatory
approvals received, regulatory challenges related to alternative construction plans and the extended construction period, and the
political and environme ntal challenges with the construction of an interstate pipeline. Accor dingly , NextEra Energy Resources
performed a fair value analysis based on the market approach to determine the amount of the impairment. The challenges to
complete construction and the resulting economic outlook for the pipeline were considered in determining the magnitude of the
other-than-temporary impairment. Based on the fair value analysis, the equity method investment with a carrying amount of
approximately $1.9 billion was written down to its estimated fair value of approximately $400 million as of December 31, 2020,
resulting in an impairment charge of $1.5 billion (or $1.2 billion after tax), which is recorded in equity in earnings (losses) of equity
method investees  in NEE’ s consolidated statements of income for the year ended December 31, 2020.
The fair value estimate was based on a probability-weighted earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization (EBITDA)
multiple valuation technique using a market participant view of the potential different outcomes for the investment. As part of the
valuation, NextEra Energy Resources used observable inputs where available, including the EBITDA  multiples of recent pipeline
transactions. Significant unobservable inputs (Level 3), including the probabilities assigned to the different potential outcomes, the
forecasts of operating revenues and costs, and the projected capital expenditures to complete the project, were also used in the
estimation of fair value. An increase in the revenue forecasts, a decrease in the projected operating or capital expenditures or an
increase in the probabili ty assigned to the full pipeline being completed would result in an increased fair market value. Changes in
the opposite direction of those unobservable inputs would result in a decreased fair market value.
On February  2, 2022, the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Fourth Circuit (the 4th Circuit) vacated and remanded Mountain Valley
Pipeline’ s Biological Opinion issued by the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service. While NextEra Energ y Resources continues to evaluate
options and next steps with its joint venture partners, this event along with the 4th Circuit vacatur and remand of the U.S. Forest
Service right-of-way grant on January 25, 2022 caused NextEra Energy Resources to re-evalua te its investment in Mountain Valley
Pipeline for further other-than-temporary impairment, which evaluation coincided with the preparation of NEE's December 31, 2021
financial statements. As a result of this evaluation, it was determined that the continued legal and regulatory challenges have
resulted in a very low probability of pipeline completion. Accordingly , NextEra Energy Resources updated its fair value estimate
using the same probability-weighted EBITDA  multiple valuation technique using a market participant view of the potential different
outcomes for the inves tment as discussed above. Based on this fair value analysis, NextE ra Energy Resources recorded an
impairment charge in the first quarter of 2022 of approximately $0.8 billion ($0.6 billion after tax), which is reflected in equity in
earnings (losses) of equity method investees in NEE's consolidated statements of income for the year(a)
91
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
ended December 31, 2022. This impairment charge resulted in the complete write off of NextEra  Energy Resources’  equity method
investment carrying amount of approximately $0.6 billion, as well as the recording of a liability of approximately $0.2 billion which
reflects NextEra Energy Resources’  share of estimated future dismantlement costs.
5. Income Taxes
On August 16, 2022, the IRA was signed into law which includes: (i) extensions for wind and solar tax credits on facilities that start
construction before the later of 2034 or the end of the calendar year following the year in which greenhouse gas emissions from U.S.
electric generation are reduced by 75% from 2022 levels; (ii) a new solar PTC and standalone battery ITC; (iii) the ability to transfer
renewable energy tax credits to an unrelated transferee; and (iv) a 15% corporate profits minimum tax based on pre-tax income for
years after 2022. This legislation does not require NEE or FPL to revalue their deferred income taxes given that there was no
change to the corporate  tax rate. Pursuant to FPL’s 2021 rate agreement, FPL refunded customers approximately $36 million in
January 2023 and will prospectively adjust base rates after a review by the FPSC for PTCs related to new solar generation facilities
recovered in base rates during the term of the 2021 rate agreement (see Note 1 – Rate Regulation).
The components of income taxes are as follows:
NEE FPL
Years Ended December 31, Years Ended December 31,
2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
(millions)
Federal:
Current $ 11 $ (26)$ 105 $ 3 $ 85 $ 16 
Deferred 497 311 (148) 684 545 474 
Total federal 508 285 (43) 687 630 490 
State:       
Current 41 (62) 18 2 1 32 
Deferred 37 125 69 258 207 156 
Total state 78 63 87 260 208 188 
Total income taxes $ 586 $ 348 $ 44 $ 947 $ 838 $ 678 
A reconciliation between the ef fective income tax rates and the applicable statutory rate is as follows:
 NEE FPL
 Years Ended December 31, Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Statutory federal income tax rate 21.0 % 21.0 % 21.0 % 21.0 % 21.0 % 21.0 %
Increases (reductions) resulting from:       
State income taxes – net of federal income
tax benefit 1.6 1.6 2.8 4.4 4.1 4.2 
Taxes attributable to noncontrolling
interests 4.9 5.0 4.8 — — — 
PTCs and ITCs (6.8) (11.3) (12.7) (1.1) (0.7) (0.6)
Amortization of deferred regulatory credit (4.8) (4.4) (7.2) (4.0) (3.5) (4.9)
Foreign operations 0.1 0.2 (2.4) — — — 
Other – net (0.7) (1.1) (4.5) 0.1 (0.2) (0.7)
Effective income tax rate 15.3 % 11.0 % 1.8 % 20.4 % 20.7 % 19.0 %
_________________________
(a)The 2020 gain on sale of the Spain solar projects was not taxable for federal and state income tax purposes (see Note 1 – Disposal of Businesses/Assets and Sale
of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests).(a)
92
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
The income tax ef fects of temporary dif ferences giving rise to consolidated deferred income tax liabilities and assets are as follows:
NEE FPL
December 31, December 31,
2022 2021 2022 2021
(millions)
Deferred tax liabilities:
Property-related $ 10,144 $ 10,018 $ 8,177 $ 7,831 
Pension 552 564 439 425 
Investments in partnerships and joint ventures 3,144 2,783 3 3 
Other 2,666 2,092 1,914 1,232 
Total deferred tax liabilities 16,506 15,457 10,533 9,491 
Deferred tax assets and valuation allowance:
Decommissioning reserves 306 296 306 296 
Net operating loss carryforwards 346 330 19 2 
Tax credit carryforwards 4,905 4,646 123 182 
ARO and accrued asset removal costs 199 199 107 126 
Regulatory liabilities 1,332 1,421 1,308 1,397 
Other 822 733 295 351 
Valuation allowance (257) (282) — — 
Net deferred tax assets 7,653 7,343 2,158 2,354 
Net deferred income taxes $ 8,853 $ 8,114 $ 8,375 $ 7,137 
______________________
(a)Reflects valuation allowances related to deferred state tax credits and state operating loss carryforwards.
Deferred tax assets and liabilities are included on the consolidated balance sheets as follows:
NEE FPL
December 31, December 31,
2022 2021 2022 2021
(millions)
Noncurrent other assets $ 219 $ 196 $ 1 $ — 
Deferred income taxes – noncurrent liabilities (9,072) (8,310) (8,376) (7,137)
Net deferred income taxes $ (8,853)$ (8,114)$ (8,375)$ (7,137)
The compon ents of NEE's deferred tax assets relating to net operating loss carryforward s and tax credit carryforwards at
December 31, 2022 are as follows:
AmountExpiration
Dates
(millions)
Net operating loss carryforwards:
Federal $ 11 2033 – 2037
State 315 2022 – 2042
Foreign 20 2026 – 2042
Net operating loss carryforwards $ 346 
Tax credit carryforwards:  
Federal $ 4,555 2028 – 2042
State 345 2023 – 2039
Foreign 5 2034 – 2042
Tax credit carryforwards $ 4,905 
______________________
(a)Includes $9 million of net operating loss carryforwards with an indefinite expiration period.
(b)Includes $1 million of net operating loss carryforwards with an indefinite expiration period.
(c)Includes $191 million of ITC carryforwards with an indefinite expiration period.(a)
(a)
(b)
(c)
93
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
6. Acquisitions
Merger of FPL and Gulf Power Company  – On January 1, 2021, FPL and Gulf Power Company merged, with FPL as the surviving
entity . However , during 2021, FPL continued to be regulated as two separate ratemaking entities in the former service areas of FPL
and Gulf Power Compan y. Effective January 1, 2022, FPL became regulated as one electric ratemaking entity with new unified rates
and tariffs, and also became one reportable segment of NEE. See Note 1 – Rate Regulation – Base Rates Effective January 2022
through December 2025 and Note 16. As a result of the merger , FPL acquired assets of approximately $6.7 billion, primarily relating
to property , plant and equipment, net of approximately $4.9 billion and regulatory assets of $1.2 billion, and assumed liabilities of
approximately $3.9 billion, including $1.8 billion of debt, primarily long-term debt, $729 million of deferred income taxes and
$566 million of regulatory liabilities. Additionally , goodwill of approximately $2.7 billion and purchase accounting adjustments
associated with the 2019 Gulf Power Company  acquisition by NEE were transferred to FPL from Corporate and Other  and, for
impairment testing, the goodwill is included in the FPL reporting unit. The assets acquired and liabilities assumed by FPL were at
carrying amounts as the merger was between entities under common control.
GridLiance – On March 31, 2021, a wholly owned subsidiary of NEET  acquired GridLiance, which owns and operates three  FERC-
regulated transmission utilities with approximately 700 miles of high-voltage transmission lines across six states, five in the Midwest
and Nevada. The purchase price included approximately $502 million in cash consideration, and the assumption of approximately
$175 million of debt, excluding post-closing adjustments.
Under the acquisition method, the purchase price was allocated to the assets acquired and liabilities assumed based on their fair
value. The approval by the FERC of GridLiance's rates, which is intended to allow GridLiance to collect total revenues equal to
GridLiance's costs for the development, financing, construction, operation and maintenance of GridLiance, including a reasonable
rate of return on investe d capital, is considered a fundamental input in measuring the fair value of GridLiance's assets and liabilities
and, as such, NEE concluded that the carrying values of all assets and liabilities recoverable through rates are representative of their
fair values. As a result, NEE acquired assets of approximately $384 million, primarily relating to property , plant and equipment, and
assumed liabilities of approximately $210 million, primarily relating to long-term debt. The acquisition agreements are subject to
earn-out provisions for additional payments, valued at approximately $264 millio n at March 31, 2021, to be made upon  the
completion of capital expenditures for future development projects (see Note 4 – Contingent Consideration). The excess of the
purchase price over the fair value of assets acqu ired and liabilities assumed resulted in approximately $592 million of goodwill which
has been recognized on NEE's consolidated balance sheets, of which approximately $586 million is expected to be deductible for
tax purposes. Goodwill associated with the GridLiance acquisition is reflected within NEER and, for impairment testing, is included in
the rate-regulated transmission reporting unit. The goodwill arising from the transaction represen ts expected benefits from continued
expansion of NEE's regulated businesses.
RNG Acquisition  – On October 27, 2022, a wholly owned subsidi ary of NextEra Energy Resources entered into several agreements
to acquire 100% of a portfolio of renewable energy projects from the owners of Energy Power Partners Fund I, L.P. and North
American Sustainable Energy Fund, L.P., as well as the related service provider , for approximately $1.1 billion, subject to closing
adjustments, plus the assumption of approximately $37 million of existing project finance debt estimate d at the time of closing. The
portfolio primarily consists of 31 biogas projects, one of which is an operating renewable natural gas facility and the others of which
are primarily operating landfill gas-to-electric facilities. The acquisition is expected to close in early 2023, subject to receipt of
required regulatory approvals including approvals from the FERC.
7. Property, Plant and Equipment
Property , plant and equipment consists of the following at December 31:
NEE FPL
2022 2021 2022 2021
(millions)
Electric plant in service and other property $ 124,963 $ 112,500 $ 74,353 $ 67,771 
Nuclear fuel 1,684 1,606 1,190 1,170 
Construction work in progress 15,675 14,141 7,026 6,326 
Property, plant and equipment, gross 142,322 128,247 82,569 75,267 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (31,263) (28,899) (17,876) (17,040)
Property, plant and equipment – net $ 111,059 $ 99,348 $ 64,693 $ 58,227 
FPL – At December 31, 2022, FPL's gross investm ent in electric plant in service and other property for the electric generation,
transmission, distributio n and general facilities of FPL represented approximately 44%, 14%, 35% and 7%, respectively; the
respective amounts at December 31, 2021 were 46%, 13%, 35% and 6%. Substant ially all of FPL's properties are subje ct to the lien
of FPL's mortgage, which secures most debt securities issued by FPL. The weighted annual composite depreciation and
94
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
amortization rate for FPL's electric plant in service, including capitalized software, but excluding the effects of decommissioning,
dismantlement and the depreciation adjustments discussed in the following sentences, was approximately 3.6%, 3.8% and 3.8% for
2022, 2021  and 2020, respectively . In 2022, FPL recorded a one-time reserve amortization adjustment of approximately
$114 million, as required under the 2021 rate agreem ent, 50% of which was used to reduce the capital recovery regulatory asset
balance and the other 50% to increase the storm reserve regulatory liability (see Note 1 – Storm  Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm
Cost Recovery). In acco rdance with the 2016 rate agreement (see Note 1 – Rate Regulation – Base Rates Effective January 2017
through December 2021), FPL recorded reserve amortization (reversal) of approximately $429 million and $(1) million in 2021 and
2020, respec tively . Durin g 2022, 2021 and 2020, FPL recorded AFUDC of approximately $136 million, $176 million and $117 million ,
respectively , including the equity component of AFUDC of approximately $ 105 million, $ 132 million and $ 87 million, respectively .
NEER  – At Decem ber 31, 2022, wind, solar and nuclear plants represented approximately 51%, 14% and 7%, respectiv ely, of
NEER's depreciable electric plant in service and other property; the respective amounts at Dece mber 31, 2021 were 53%, 14% and
8%. The estim ated useful  lives of NEER's plants range primarily from 30 to 35 years for wind plants, 30 to 35 years for solar plants
and 23 to 47 years for nuclear plants. NEER's oil and gas production assets represented approximately 15% and 14% of NEER's
depreciable electric plant in service and other property at December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively . A number of NEER's
generation, regulated transmission and pipeline facilities are encumbered by liens securing various financings. The net book value of
NEER's assets serving as collateral was approximately $14.4 billion at December 31, 2022. Interest capitalized on construction
projects amounted to approximately $ 172 million, $ 139 million and $ 168 million during 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively .
Jointly-Owned Electric Plants – Certain NEE subsidiaries own undivided interests in the jointly-owned facilities described below , and
are entitled to a proportionate share of the output from those facilities. The subsidiaries are responsible for their share of the
operating costs, as well as providing their own financing. Accordingly , each subsidiary's propo rtionate share of the facilities and
related revenues and expenses is included in the appropriate balance sheet and statement of income captions. NEE's and FPL's
respective shares of direct expenses for these facilities are included in fuel, purchased power and interchange expense, O&M
expenses, depreciation and amortization expense and taxes other than income taxes and other – net in NEE's and FPL's
consolidated statements of income.
NEE's and FPL's proportionate ownership interest in jointly-owned facilities is as follows:
 December 31, 2022
 Ownership
InterestGross
InvestmentAccumulated
DepreciationConstruction
Work
in Progress
  (millions)
FPL:     
St. Lucie Unit No. 2 85 %$ 2,276 $ 1,062 $ 163 
Daniel Units Nos. 1 and 2 50 %$ 753 $ 285 $ 22 
Scherer Unit No. 3 25 %$ 405 $ 169 $ 1 
NEER:     
Seabrook 88.23 %$ 1,355 $ 494 $ 74 
Wyman Station Unit No. 4 91.19 %$ 31 $ 12 $ — 
Stanton 65 %$ 139 $ 25 $ — 
Transmission substation assets located in Seabrook, New
Hampshire 88.23 %$ 140 $ 4 $ 4 
______________________
(a)Excludes nuclear fuel.
(b)FPL intends to retire its share of these units in 2024. Net book value is reflected in other property on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets.
(c)Together with its joint interest owner, FPL intends to retire this unit in 2028. Net book value is reflected in other property on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance
sheets.
8. Equity Method Investments
At December 31, 2022 and 2021, NEE's equity method investments totaled approximately $6,582  million and $6,159  million,
respectively . The principal entities included in investment in equity method investees on NEE's consolidated balance sheets are NEP
OpCo and Sabal Trail Transmission, LLC (Sabal Trail) (see Note 15 – Contracts), and in 2021 also included Mountain Valley Pipeline
(see Note 4 – Nonrecu rring Fair Value Meas urements and Note 15 - Contracts) and Silver State South Solar , LLC. As of
December 31, 2022, NEE's interest in the principal entities range from approximately 43% to 54%, and these entities primarily own
natural gas pipelines or electric generation facilities.(a) (a)
(b)
(c)
95
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Summarized combined information for these principal entities is as follows:
 2022 2021
 (millions)
Operating revenue $ 1,705 $ 1,469 
Operating income $ 1,423 $ 559 
Net income $ 1,380 $ 739 
Total assets $ 26,058 $ 29,537 
Total liabilities $ 9,779 $ 9,501 
Partners'/members' equity $ 16,279 $ 20,036 
NEE's share of underlying equity in the principal entities $ 2,379 $ 4,352 
Difference between investment carrying amount and underlying equity in net assets 2,589 1,133 
NEE's investment carrying amount for the principal entities $ 4,968 $ 5,485 
______________________
(a)Reflects NEE's interest, as well as third-party interests, in NEP OpCo.
(b)Approximately $2.5 billion in 2022 and $2.6 billion in 2021 is associated with NEP OpCo, of which approximately 75% relates to goodwill and is not being amortized
and the remaining balance is being amortized primarily over a period of 13 to 25 years. The difference for 2021 is net of an approximately $1.5 billion impairment
charge in 2020 related to NextEra Energy Resources' investment in Mountain Valley Pipeline. See Note 4 – Nonrecurring Fair Value Measurements for a discussion
of impairment charges in 2020 and 2022.
NextEra Energy Resources provides operational, management and administrative services as well as transportation and fuel
management services to NEP and its subsidiaries under various agreements (service agreeme nts). NextEra Energy Resources is
also party to a cash sweep and credit support (CSCS) agreement with a subsidiary of NEP. At December 31, 2022 and 2021, the
cash sweep amounts (due to NEP and its subsid iaries) held in accounts belonging to NextEra Energy Resources or its subsidiaries
were approximately $298 millio n and $57 millio n, respectively , and are included in accou nts payable. Fee income related to the
CSCS agreement and the service agreements totaled approximately $174 million, $148 million and $120 million for the years ended
December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectiv ely, and is included in operating revenues in NEE's consolidated statements of
income. Amounts due from NEP of approximately $94 million and $113 million are included in other receivables and $101 million and
$40 million are included in noncurrent other assets at December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively . See also Note 1 – Disposal of
Businesses/Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests for amounts due to NEP for reimbursement of construction-
related costs. NEECH or NextEra Energy Resources guaranteed or provided indemnifications, letters of credit or surety bonds
totaling approximately $4,600  million at December 31, 2022 primarily related  to obligations on behalf of NEP's subsidiaries with
maturity dates ranging from 2023 to 2059, including certain project performance obligations, obligations under financing and
interconnection agreeme nts and obligations, primarily incurred and future construction payables, associated with the December
2022 sale of projects to NEP (see Note 1 – Disposal of Businesses/Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests).
Payment guarantees and related contracts with respect to unconsolidated entities for which NEE or one of its subsidiaries are the
guarantor are recorded on NEE’ s consolidated  balance sheets at fair value. At December 31, 2022, approximately $56 millio n
related to the fair value of the credit support provided under the CSCS agreement is recorded as noncurrent other liabilities on NEE's
consolidated balance sheet.
During 2022, 2021 and 2020, certain services, primarily engineering, construction and maintenance services, were provided to
subsidiaries of NEE by related parties that NEE accounts for under the equity method of accounting. Charges for these services
amounted to approximately $579 million, $691 million and $721 million for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020,
respectively .
9. Variable Interest Entities (VIEs)
NEER  – At Decem ber 31, 2022, NEE consolidates a number of VIEs within the NEER segment. Subsidiaries within the NEER
segment are considered the primary beneficiary of these VIEs since they control the most significant activities of these VIEs,
including operations and maintenance, and they have the obligation to absorb expected losses of these VIEs.
Nine indire ct subsidiaries of NextEra Energy Resources have an ownership interest ranging from approximately 50% to 67% in
entities which own and operate solar facilities with the capability of producing a total of approximately 772 MW, and own a solar
generation and battery storage facility that is expected to have total generating/storage capacity of approximately 125 MW and 65
MW, respectively , upon completion of construction, which is expected in 2023. Each of the subsid iaries is considered a VIE since the
non-managing members have no substantive rights over the managing members, and is consolidated by NextEra Energy
Resources. These entities sell their electric output to third parties under power sales contracts with expiration dates ranging from
2035 through 2052. These entities have third-party debt which is secured by liens against the assets of the entities. The debt holders
have no recourse to the general credit of NextEra Energy Resources for the repayment of debt. The assets and liabilities of these
VIEs were approximately $2,084  million and $1,174  million, respectively , at December 31, 2022. There were eight  of these
consolidated VIEs at December 31, 2021 and the assets and liabilities of those VIEs at such date totaled approximately $1,851
million and $ 1,258  million, respectively . At December 31, 2022 and 2021, the assets and liabilities of these(a)
(b)
96
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
VIEs consisted primarily of property , plant and equipment and long-term debt. At December 31, 2022, subsidiaries of NEE had
guarantees related to certain obligations of one of these consolidated VIEs.
NEE consolidates a NEET VIE which owns and operates an approximately 280-mile electric transmission line that went into service
during the first quarter of 2022. A NEET  subsidiary is the primary beneficiary and controls the most significant activities of the VIE.
NEET  is entitled to recei ve 50% of the profits and losses of the entity . The asse ts and liabilities of the VIE totaled approximately $744
million and $18 million, respectively , at December 31, 2022, and $614 million and $64 million, respectively , at December 31, 2021. At
December 31, 2022 and 2021, the assets of this VIE consisted primarily of property , plant and equipment.
NextEra Energy Resources consolidates a VIE which has a 10% direct ownership interest in wind and solar generation facilities
which have the capabili ty of producing approximately 400 MW and 599 MW, respectively . Thes e entities sell their electric output
under power sales contracts to third parties with expiration dates ranging from 2025 throu gh 2040. These entities are also
considered a VIE because the holders of differential membership interests in these entities do not have substantive rights over the
significant activities of these entities. The assets and liabilities of the VIE were approximate ly $1,488  millio n and $86 millio n,
respectively , at December 31, 2022, and $1,518  million and $79 million, respectively , at December 31, 2021. At December 31, 2022
and 2021, the assets of this VIE consisted primarily of property , plant and equipment.
NextEra Energy Resources consolidates 31 VIEs that primarily relate to certain subsidiaries which have sold differential membership
interests in entities which own and operate wind generation, solar generation and battery storage facilities with generating/storage
capacity of approximately 11,712  MW, 600 MW and 324 MW, respec tively , and own wind generation, solar generation and battery
storage facilities that, upon completion of construction, which is anticipated in 2023, are expected to have generating/storage
capacity of approximately 301 MW, 1,161  MW and 390 MW, respectively . These entities sell, or will sell, their electric output either
under power sales contracts to third parties with expiration dates ranging from 2024 through 2053 or in the spot market. These
entities are considered VIEs because the holders of differential membership interests do not have substantive rights over the
significant activities of these entities. NextEra Energy Resources has financing obligations with respect to these entities, including
third-party debt which is secured by liens against the generation facilities and the other assets  of these entities or by pledges of
NextEra Energy Resources' ownership interest in these entities. The debt holders have no recourse to the general credit of NEER
for the repayment of debt. The assets and liabilities of these VIEs totaled approximately $19,690  millio n and $2,318  million,
respectively , at December 31, 2022. There were  33 of these consolidated VIEs at December 31, 2021 and the assets and liabilities
of those VIEs at such date totaled approximately $17,419  million and $1,480  million, respectively . At December 31, 2022 and 2021,
the assets and liabilities of these VIEs consisted  primarily of property , plant and equipment and accounts payable. At December 31,
2022, subsidiaries of NEE had guarantees related to certain obligations of three of these consolidated VIEs.
Other  – At December 31, 2022 and 2021, several NEE subsidiaries had investments totaling approxi mately $4,016  million ($3,331
million at FPL) and $4,559  million ($3,799  million at FPL), respectively , which are included in special use funds and noncurrent other
assets on NEE's consolidated balance sheets and in special use funds on FPL's consolidated balance sheets. These investments
represented primarily commingled funds and asset-backed securities. NEE subsidiaries, including FPL, are not the primary
beneficiaries and therefore do not consolidate any of these entities because they do not control any of the ongoing activities of these
entities, were not involved in the initial design of these entities and do not have a controlling financial interest in these entities.
Certain subsidiaries of NEE have noncontrolling interests in entities accounted for under the equity method, including NEE's
noncontrolling interest in NEP OpCo (see Note 8). These entities are limited partnerships or similar entity structures in which the
limited partners or non-managing members do not have substantive rights over the significant activities of these entities, and
therefore are considered VIEs. NEE is not the primary beneficiary because it does not have a controlling financial interest in these
entities, and therefore does not consolidate any of these entities. NEE’ s investment in these entities totaled approximately $5,214
million and $4,214  million at December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively . At December 31, 2022, subsidiaries of NEE had guarantees
related to certain obligations of one of these entities, as well as commitments to invest an additional approximately $180 million in
several of these entities. See further discussion of such guarantees and commitments in Note 15 – Commitments and – Contracts,
respectively .
10. Leases
NEE has operating and finance leases primarily related to land use agreements that convey exclusive use of the land during the
arrangement for certain of its renewable energy projects and substations, buildings, equipment and, in 2021, purchased power
agreements. Operating and finance leases primarily have fixed payments with expected expiratio n dates ranging from 2023 to 2083,
with the exception of operating leases related to three  land use agreements with an expiration date of 2106, some of which include
options to extend the leases up to 20 years and some have options to terminate at NEE's discretion. At December 31, 2022, NEE’ s
ROU assets  and lease liabilities  for operating leases totaled approximately $386 million and $400 million, respectively; the
respective amounts at December 31, 2021 were $ 547 million and $ 555 million. At December 31, 2022, NEE’ s
97
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
ROU assets  and lease liabiliti es for finance leases totale d approximately $378 million and $375 million, respectively; the respective
amounts at December 31, 2021 were $205 million and $200 million. NEE’ s lease liabilities at December 31, 2022 and 2021 were
calculated using a weighted-average incremental borrowing rate at the lease inception of 3.66% and 3.57%, respectively , for
operating leases and 3.98% and 3.52%, respectively , for finance leases, and a weighted-average remaining lease term of 45 years
and 39 years, respectively , for operating leases and 33 years and 31 years, respectively , for finance leases. At Decem ber 31, 2022,
expected lease paymen ts over the remaining terms of the leases were approximately $1.6 billion with no one year being material.
NEE's opera ting lease cost for the years ended  December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020 totaled approximately $70 million, $92 million
and $95 million, respectively . Other operating and finance lease-related amounts were not material to NEE's consolidated
statements of income or cash flows for the periods presented.
NEE has operating and sales-type leases primarily related to a natural gas and oil electric generation facility and certain battery
storage facilities that sell their electric output under power sales agreements to third parties which provide the customers the ability
to dispatch the facilities. At December 31, 2022 and 2021, NEE recorded a net investment in sales-type leases of approximately $53
million and $42 million, respectively . At December 31, 2022, the power sales agreements have expiration dates from 2024 to 2043
and NEE expects to receive approximately $1.1 billion of lease payments over the remaining terms of the power sales agreements
with no one year being material. Operating and sales-type lease-related amounts were not material to NEE's consolidated
statements of income for the periods presented.
11. Asset Retirement Obligations
NEE's AROs relate primarily to decommissioning obligations of FPL's and NEER's nuclea r units and to obligations for the
dismantlement of certain of NEER's wind and solar facilities. For NEE's rate-regulated operations, including FPL, the accounting
provisions result in timing differences in the recognition of legal asset retirement costs for financial reporting purposes and the
method the regulator allows for recovery in rates. See Note 1 – Rate Regulation and – Decommissioning of Nuclear Plants,
Dismantlement of Plants and Other Accrued Asset Removal Costs.
A rollforward of NEE's and FPL's AROs is as follows:
NEE FPL
(millions)
Balances, December 31, 2020 $ 3,166 $ 1,936 
Liabilities incurred 79 7 
Accretion expense 141 78 
Liabilities settled (88) (15)
Revision in estimated cash flows – net (119) 101 
Balances, December 31, 2021 3,179 2,107 
Liabilities incurred 82 — 
Accretion expense 145 81 
Liabilities settled (80) (22)
Revision in estimated cash flows – net 2 10 
Balances, December 31, 2022 $ 3,328 $ 2,176 
______________________
(a)Includes approximately $27 million and $35 million related to project sales to NEP as well as other sales of businesses and assets during the years ending
December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. See Note 1 – Disposal of Businesses/Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests.
(b)The increase at FPL discussed in (c) was offset primarily by the effect of revised cost estimates and useful lives of NEER's solar facilities.
(c)Primarily reflects the effect of pending license extension requests of St. Lucie Units Nos. 1 and 2 for an additional 20 years.
(d)Includes the current portion of AROs as of December 31, 2022 and 2021 of approximately $83 million ($68 million for FPL) and $97 million ($58 million for FPL),
respectively, which are included in other current liabilities on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets.
Restricted funds for the payment of future expenditures to decommission NEE's and FPL's nuclear units included in special use
funds on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets are presented below (see Note 4). Duane Arnold is being actively
decommissioned and was granted an exemption  from the NRC, which allows for use of the funds for certain other site restoration
activities in addition to decommissioning obligations recorded as AROs.
NEE FPL
(millions)
Balances, December 31, 2022 $ 7,495 $ 5,220 
Balances, December 31, 2021 $ 8,846 $ 6,082 
NEE and FPL have identified but not recognized ARO liabilities related to the majority of their electric transmission and distribution
assets and pipelines resulting from easements over property not owned by NEE or FPL. These easements are generally perpetual
and only require retirem ent action upon abandonment or cessation of use of the property or facility for its specified purpose. The
related ARO liability is not estimable for such easements as NEE and FPL  intend to use these properties(a)
(b) (c)
(d) (d)
(a)
(d) (d)
98
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
indefinitely . In the event NEE or FPL decide to abandon or cease the use of a particular easement, an ARO liability would be
recorded at that time.
12. Employee Retirement Benefits
Employee Pension Plan and Other Benefits Plans – NEE sponsors a qualified noncontributory defined benefit pension plan for
substantially all employees of NEE and its subsidiaries. NEE also has a supplemental executive retirement plan (SERP), which
includes a non-qualified supplemental defined benefit pension component that provides benefits to a select group of management
and highly compensated employees, and sponsors a contributory postretirement plan for other benefits for retirees of NEE and its
subsidiaries meeting certain eligibility requirements. The total accrued benefit cost of the SERP  and postretirement plans is
approximately $237 millio n ($115 millio n for FPL) and $300 millio n ($139 millio n for FPL) at December 31, 2022 and 2021,
respectively .
Pension Plan Assets, Benefit Obligations and Funded Status – The changes in assets, benefit obligations and the funded status of
the pension plan are as follows:
 2022 2021
 (millions)
Change in pension plan assets:   
Fair value of plan assets at January 1 $ 5,688 $ 5,314 
Actual return on plan assets (820) 627 
Benefit payments (325) (253)
Fair value of plan assets at December 31 $ 4,543 $ 5,688 
Change in pension benefit obligation:   
Obligation at January 1 $ 3,445 $ 3,607 
Service cost 86 90 
Interest cost 77 64 
Special termination benefit 52 — 
Plan amendments 3 — 
Actuarial gains – net (627) (63)
Benefit payments (325) (253)
Obligation at December 31 $ 2,711 $ 3,445 
Funded status:   
Prepaid pension benefit costs at NEE at December 31 $ 1,832 $ 2,243 
Prepaid pension benefit costs at FPL at December 31 $ 1,732 $ 1,657 
_________________________
(a)Reflects enhanced early retirement benefit.
(b)NEE's accumulated pension benefit obligation, which includes no assumption about future salary levels, at December 31, 2022 and 2021 was approximately $2,650
million and $3,352 million, respectively.
(c)Reflects FPL's allocated benefits under NEE's pension plan.
NEE's unrecognized amounts included in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) yet to be recognized as components of
prepaid pension benefit costs are as follows:
2022 2021
(millions)
Unrecognized prior service benefit (net of $0 tax expense and $1 tax expense, respectively) $ 1 $ 2 
Unrecognized gains (losses) (net of $33 tax benefit and $7 tax expense, respectively) (91) 41 
Total $ (90)$ 43 
NEE's unrecognized amounts included in regula tory assets (liabilities) yet to be recognized as components of net prepaid pension
benefit costs are as follows:
2022 2021
(millions)
Unrecognized prior service cost (benefit) $ 2 $ (1)
Unrecognized losses (gains) 277 (80)
Total $ 279 $ (81)(a)
(b)
(c)
99
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
The followin g table provides the assumptions used to determine the benefit obligation for the pension plan. These rates are used in
determining net periodic pension income in the following year .
2022 2021
Discount rate 5.05 % 2.87 %
Salary increase 4.90 % 4.90 %
Weighted-average interest crediting rate 3.82 % 3.79 %
NEE's investment policy for the pension plan recognizes the benefit of protecting the plan's funded status, thereby avoiding the
necessity of future employer contributions. Its broad objectives are to achieve a high rate of total return with a prudent level of risk
taking while maintaining suf ficient liquidity and diversification to avoid large losses and preserve capital over the long term.
The NEE pension plan fund's current target asse t allocation, which is expected to be reached over time, is 43% equity investments,
32% fixed income investments, 20% alternative investments and 5% convertible securities. The pension fund's investment strategy
emphasizes traditional investments, broadly diversified across the global equity and fixed income markets, using a combination of
different investment styles and vehicles. The pension fund's equity and fixed income holdings consist of both directly held securities
as well as commingled investment arrangemen ts such as common and collective trusts, pooled separate accounts, registered
investment companies and limited partnerships . The pension fund's convertible security assets are principally direct holdings of
convertible securities and include a convertible security oriented limited partnership. The pension fund's alternative investments
consist primarily of private equity and real estate oriented investments in limited partnerships as well as absolute return oriented
limited partnerships that use a broad range of investment strategies on a global basis.
The fair value measurements of NEE's pension plan assets by fair value hierarchy level are as follows:
December 31, 2022
Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical Assets
or Liabilities
(Level 1)Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3) Total
(millions)
Equity securities $ 1,246 $ 5 $ 1 $ 1,252 
Equity commingled vehicles — 731 — 731 
U.S. Government and municipal bonds 85 5 — 90 
Corporate debt securities — 272 — 272 
Asset-backed securities — 413 — 413 
Debt security commingled vehicles — 130 — 130 
Convertible securities 50 367 — 417 
Total investments in the fair value hierarchy $ 1,381 $ 1,923 $ 1 3,305 
Total investments measured at net asset value 1,238 
Total fair value of plan assets $ 4,543 
_____________________
(a)See Notes 3 and 4 for discussion of fair value measurement techniques and inputs.
(b)Includes foreign investments of $526 million.
(c)Includes foreign investments of $191 million.
(d)Includes foreign investments of $83 million.
(e)Includes foreign investments of $129 million.
(f)Includes foreign investments of $30 million.
(g)Includes foreign investments of $242 million.(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
(f)
(g)
100
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
 December 31, 2021
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical Assets
or Liabilities
(Level 1)Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3) Total
 (millions)
Equity securities $ 1,977 $ 29 $ 2 $ 2,008 
Equity commingled vehicles — 889 — 889 
U.S. Government and municipal bonds 131 6 — 137 
Corporate debt securities — 351 — 351 
Asset-backed securities — 386 — 386 
Debt security commingled vehicles — 219 — 219 
Convertible securities 91 489 — 580 
Total investments in the fair value hierarchy $ 2,199 $ 2,369 $ 2 4,570 
Total investments measured at net asset value 1,118 
Total fair value of plan assets $ 5,688 
______________________
(a)See Notes 3 and 4 for discussion of fair value measurement techniques and inputs.
(b)Includes foreign investments of $927 million.
(c)Includes foreign investments of $169 million.
(d)Includes foreign investments of $109 million.
(e)Includes foreign investments of $5 million.
(f)Includes foreign investments of $41 million.
(g)Includes foreign investments of $220 million.
Expected Cash Flows – The following table provides information about benefit payments expecte d to be paid by the pension plan for
each of the following calendar years (in millions):
2023 $ 198 
2024 $ 199 
2025 $ 201 
2026 $ 204 
2027 $ 203 
2028 – 2032 $ 1,008 
Net Periodic (Income) Cost – The components of net periodic (income) cost for the plans are as follows:
Pension Benefits Postretirement Benefits
2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
 (millions)
Service cost $ 86 $ 90 $ 85 $ 1 $ 2 $ 1 
Interest cost 77 64 92 5 4 8 
Expected return on plan assets (363) (339) (321) — — — 
Amortization of actuarial loss — 24 18 3 5 3 
Amortization of prior service benefit (1) (1) (1) (4) (15) (16)
Special termination benefit 52 — 16 — — — 
Benefit plan settlement 27 — — — — — 
Net periodic (income) cost at NEE $ (122)$ (162)$ (111)$ 5 $ (4)$ (4)
Net periodic (income) cost allocated to FPL $ (76)$ (108)$ (84)$ 4 $ (4)$ (4)(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
(f)
(g)
101
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Other Comprehensive Income – The components of net periodic income (cost) recognized in OCI for the pension plan are as
follows:
 2022 2021 2020
 (millions)
Prior service cost (net of $0 tax benefit) $ (1)$ — $ — 
Net gains (losses) (net of $43 tax benefit, $29 tax expense and $13 tax expense, respectively) (139) 95 42 
Amortization of unrecognized losses (net of $2 tax expense, $2 tax expense and $1 tax expense,
respectively) 7 6 5 
Total $ (133)$ 101 $ 47 
Regulatory Assets (Liab ilities) – The component s of net periodic income recognized during the year in regulatory assets (liabilities)
for the pension plan are as follows:
 2022 2021
 (millions)
Prior service cost (benefit) $ 2 $ (1)
Unrecognized losses (gains) 375 (226)
Amortization of prior service benefit 1 — 
Amortization of unrecognized losses (18) (16)
Total $ 360 $ (243)
The assumptions used to determine net periodic pension income for the pension plan are as follows:
 2022 2021 2020
Discount rate 2.87 % 2.53 % 3.22 %
Salary increase 4.90 % 4.40 % 4.40 %
Expected long-term rate of return, net of investment management fees 7.35 % 7.35 % 7.35 %
Weighted-average interest crediting rate 3.79 % 3.82 % 3.83 %
Employee Contribution Plan – NEE offers an employee retirement savings  plan which allows eligible participants to contribute a
percentage of qualified compensation through payroll deductions. NEE makes matching contributions to participants' accounts.
Defined contribution expense pursuant to this plan was approximately $68 million, $66 million and $64 million for NEE ($41 million,
$42 million and $ 40 million for FPL) for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively .
102
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
13. Debt
Long-term debt consists of the following:
December 31,
2022 2021
Maturity
Date BalanceWeighted-
Average
Interest Rate BalanceWeighted-
Average
Interest Rate
(millions) (millions)
FPL:  
First mortgage bonds – fixed 2023-2051 $ 15,790 4.03 % $ 14,290 4.20 %
Pollution control, solid waste disposal and industrial development revenue
bonds – primarily variable 2023-2052 1,366 3.20 % 1,407 0.15 %
Senior unsecured notes – primarily variable 2023-2072 4,042 3.99 % 2,697 1.37 %
Other long-term debt – primarily variable 2046 7 7.90 % 307 0.82 %
Unamortized debt issuance costs and discount (203) (191)
Total long-term debt of FPL 21,002 18,510 
Less current portion of long-term debt 1,547 536 
Long-term debt of FPL, excluding current portion 19,455 17,974 
NEER:  
   NextEra Energy Resources:
  Senior secured limited-recourse long-term debt – variable 2024-2037 3,582 6.24 % 3,100 1.74 %
       Senior secured limited-recourse long-term loans – fixed 2028-2052 2,452 3.43 % 2,475 3.30 %
    Other long-term debt – primarily variable 2026-2048 777 6.33 % 785 2.50 %
    NEET – long-term debt – primarily fixed 2023-2052 2,348 5.10 % 1,151 2.69 %
 Unamortized debt issuance costs and premium (108) (92)
 Total long-term debt of NEER 9,051 7,419 
 Less current portion of long-term debt 694 664 
 Long-term debt of NEER, excluding current portion 8,357 6,755 
NEECH:  
Debentures – fixed 2023-2062 17,865 2.99 % 10,990 2.21 %
Debentures – variable 2023-2024 2,200 4.14 % 3,850 0.56 %
Debentures, related to NEE's equity units – fixed 2025-2027 6,500 2.28 % 6,000 1.46 %
Junior subordinated debentures – primarily fixed 2057-2082 3,723 5.23 % 3,723 4.54 %
Japanese yen denominated long-term debt – primarily variable 2023-2030 506 0.73 % 582 1.49 %
Australian dollar denominated long-term debt – fixed 2026 338 2.20 % 360 2.20 %
Other long-term debt – fixed 2023 164 0.92 % 186 0.92 %
Other long-term debt – variable 2024 675 5.02 % 1,245 0.64 %
Unamortized debt issuance costs, premium (135) (120)
Total long-term debt of NEECH 31,836 26,816 
Less current portion of long-term debt 4,392 585 
Long-term debt of NEECH, excluding current portion 27,444 26,231 
Total long-term debt $ 55,256 $ 50,960 
______________________
(a)Includes variable rate tax exempt bonds that permit individual bondholders to tender the bonds for purchase at any time prior to maturity. In the event these variable
rate tax exempt bonds are tendered for purchase, they would be remarketed by a designated remarketing agent in accordance with the related indenture. If the
remarketing is unsuccessful, FPL would be required to purchase these variable rate tax exempt bonds. At December 31, 2022, these variable rate tax exempt bonds
totaled approximately $1,334 million. All variable rate tax exempt bonds tendered for purchase have been successfully remarketed. FPL's syndicated revolving credit
facilities are available to support the purchase of the variable rate tax exempt bonds. Variable interest rate is established at various intervals by the remarketing
agent.
(b)At December 31, 2022, includes approximately $1,327 million of floating rate notes that permit individual noteholders to require repayment at specified dates prior to
maturity. FPL’s syndicated revolving credit facilities are available to support the purchase of the floating rate notes.
(c)Variable rate is based on an underlying index plus a specified margin.
(d)Interest rate contracts, primarily swaps, have been entered into with respect to certain of these debt issuances. See Note 3.
(e)Foreign currency contracts have been entered into with respect to these debt issuances. See Note 3.
As of December 31, 2022, minimum annual maturities of long -term debt for NEE are approximately $6,633  million, $6,848  million,
$7,702  million, $1,218  million and $7,329  million for 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026 and 2027, respectively . The respective amounts for FPL
are approximately $ 1,547  million, $ 1,646  million, $ 1,700  million, $ 0.2 million and $ 328 million.
At December 31, 2022 and 2021, short-term borrowings had a weighted-average interest rate of 4.58% (4.41% for FPL) and 0.39%
(0.27% for FPL), respectively . Subsidiaries of NEE, including FPL, had credit facilities with total capa city at December 31, 2022 of
approximately $ 17.9 billion ($ 4.5 billion for FPL) which provide for the funding of loans and/or issuance of letters of(a)
(b)(c)
(c)
(c)(d)
(c)(d)
(d)
(c)
(d)
(c)(d)(e)
(e)
(c)
103
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
credit. At December 31, 2022, letters of credit outstanding under these credit facilities totaled approximately $3.7 billion ($3.0 million
for FPL). There were no borrowings outstanding under these credit facilities at December 31, 2022. At February 17, 2023, NEE,
including FPL, had credit facilities with total capacity of approximately $ 20.2 billion ($ 4.1 billion for FPL).
NEE has guaranteed certain payment obligations of NEECH, including most of those under NEECH's debt, including all of its
debentures and commercial paper issuances, as well as most of its payment guarantees and indemnifications. NEECH has
guaranteed certain debt and other obligations of subsidiaries within the NEER segment.
In August 2022, NEEC H completed a remarketing of $1.5 billion aggregate princ ipal amount of its Series J Debentures due
September 1, 2024 that were issued in September 2019 as components of equity units issue d concurrently by NEE (September
2019 equity  units). The debentures are fully and unconditionally guaranteed by NEE. In connection with the remarketing of the
debentures, the interest rate on the debentures was reset to 4.255 % per year, and interest  is payable on March 1 and September 1
of each year, commencing September 1, 2022. In connection with the settlement of the contrac ts to purchase NEE common stock
that were issued as components of the September 2019 equity units, on September 1, 2022, NEE issued approximately 21.6 million
shares of common stock in exchange for $ 1.5 billion.
As a result of the four-for-one stock split of NEE common stock effective October 26, 2020 (2020 stock split) (and adjustments
related to the dividend rate), the fixed settlement rates of NEE’ s two outstanding series of Corporate Units sold in 2020 have been
adjusted as described below. In addition, these two series of Corporate Units provide that the applicable market value (as described
below) for each series of Corporate Units will also be adjusted (when determined) to give effect to the 2020 stock split and certain
other anti-di lution adjus tments to determine the applicable settlement rate. However , for purposes of the presentation below ,
corresponding adjustme nts were instead made to the reference prices and the threshold appreciation prices for these two series of
Corporate Units to present the practical ef fect of the antidilution adjustments as of December 31, 2022.
In February 2020, NEE sold $2.5 billion of equity units (initially consisting of Corp orate Units). Each equity unit has a stated amount
of $50 and consists of a contra ct to purchase NEE common stock (stock purchase contract) and, initially , a 5% undivided  beneficial
ownership interest in a Series K Debenture due March 1, 2025, issued in the principal amount of $1,000  by NEECH. Each stock
purchase contract requir es the holder to purchase by no later than March 1, 2023 (the final settlement date) for a price of $50 in
cash, a number of share s of NEE common stock (subject to antidilution adjustments) based on a price per share range described in
the following sentence. If purchased on the final settlement date, as of December 31, 2022, the number of shares issued per equity
unit would (subject to antidilution adjustments) range from 0.7132  shares if the applicable market value of a share of NEE common
stock is less than or equal to $70.39  (the adjuste d reference  price) to 0.5703  share s if the applicable market value of a share is
equal to or greater than $87.99  (the adjuste d threshold appreciation price), with the applicable market value to be determined using
the average closing prices of NEE common stock over a 20-day trading period ending February 24, 2023. Total annual distributions
on the equity units are at the rate of 5.279 %, consisting of interest on the debentures (1.84% per year) and payments under the
stock purchase contracts (3.439 % per year). The interest rate on the debentures is expected to be reset on or after Septembe r 1,
2022. A holder of an equity unit may satisfy its purchase obligation with proceeds raised from remarketing the NEECH debentures
that are part of its equity unit. The undivided beneficial ownership interest in the NEECH debenture that is a component of each
Corporate Unit is pledged to NEE to secure the holder's obligation to purchase NEE common stock under the related stock purchase
contract. If a successful  remarketing does not occur on or before the third business day prior to the final settlement date, and a
holder has not notified NEE of its intention to settle the stock purchase contract with cash, the debentures that are components of
the Corporate Units will be used to satisfy in full the holders' obligations to purchase NEE common stock under the related stock
purchase contracts on the final settlement date. The debentures are fully and unconditionally guaranteed by NEE.
In September 2020, NEE sold $2.0 billion of equity units (initially consisting of Corporate Units). Each equity unit has a stated
amount of $50 and consists of a contr act to purchase NEE common stock (stock purchase contract) and, initially , a 5% undivided
beneficial ownership interest in a Series L Debe nture due September 1, 2025, issued in the principal amount of $1,000  by NEECH.
Each stock purchase contract requires the holde r to purchase by no later than September 1, 2023 (the final settlement date) for a
price of $50 in cash, a number of shares of NEE common stock (subject to antidilution adjustments) base d on a price per share
range descri bed in the following sentence. If purchased on the final settlement date, as of December 31, 2022, the number of shares
issued per equity unit would (subject to antidiluti on adjustments) range from 0.6802  shares if the applicable market value of a share
of NEE common stock is less than or equal to $73.79  (the adjuste d reference  price) to 0.5442  share s if the applicable market value
of a share is equal to or greater than $92.24  (the adjuste d threshold appreciation price), with the applicable market value to be
determined using the average closing prices of NEE common stock over a 20-day trading period ending August 29, 2023. Total
annual distri butions on the equity units are at the rate of 6.219 %, consistin g of interest on the debentures (0.509 % per year) and
payments under the stock purchase contracts (5.710 % per year). The interest rate on the debentures is expected to be reset on or
after March 1, 2023. A holder of an equity unit may satisfy its purchase obligation with proceeds raised from remarketing the NEECH
debentures that are part of its equity unit. The undivided beneficial ownership interest in the NEECH debenture that is a component
of each Corporate Unit is pledged to NEE to secure the holder's obligation to purchase NEE common stock under the related stock
purchase contract. If a successful remarketing does not occur on or before the third business day prior to the final settlement date,
and a holder has not notified NEE of its intention to settle the stock purchase contract with cash, the debentures that are
components of the Corporate Units will be used to satisfy in full the
104
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
holders' obligations to purchase NEE common stock under the related stock purchase contracts on the final settlement date. The
debentures are fully and unconditionally guaranteed by NEE.
In September 2022, NEE sold $2.0 billion of equity units (initially consisting of Corporate Units). Each equity unit has a stated
amount of $50 and consists of a contr act to purchase NEE common stock (stock purchase contract) and, initially , a 5% undivided
beneficial ownership interest in a Series M Debe nture due September 1, 2027, issued in the principal amount of $1,000  by NEECH.
Each stock purchase contract requires the holde r to purchase by no later than September 1, 2025 (the final settlement date) for a
price of $50 in cash, a number of shares of NEE common stock (subject to antidilution adjustments) base d on a price per share
range descri bed in the following sentence. If purchased on the final settlement date, as of December 31, 2022, the number of shares
issued per equity unit would (subject to antidiluti on adjustments) range from 0.5626  shares if the applicable market value of a share
of NEE common stock is less than or equal to $88.88  (the reference price) to 0.4500  shares if the applicable market value of a share
is equal to or greater than $111.10  (the threshold appreciation price), with the applicable market value to be determined using the
average closing prices of NEE common stock over a 20-day trading period endin g August 27, 2025. Total annual distributions on the
equity units are at the rate of 6.926 %, consisting of interest on the debentures (4.60% per year) and payments under the stock
purchase contracts (2.326 % per year). The interest rate on the debentures is expected to be reset on or after March 1, 2025. A
holder of an equity unit may satisfy its purchase obligation with proceeds raised from remarketing the NEECH debentures that are
part of its equity unit. The undivided beneficial ownership interest in the NEECH debenture that is a component of each Corporate
Unit is pledged to NEE to secure the holder's obligation to purchase NEE common stock under the related stock purchase contract.
If a successful remarketing does not occur on or before the third business day prior to the final settlement date, and a holder has not
notified NEE of its intention to settle the stock purchase contract with cash, the debentures that are components of the Corporate
Units will be used to satisfy in full the holders' obligations to purchase NEE common stock under the related stock purchase
contracts on the final settlement date. The debentures are fully and unconditionally guaranteed by NEE.
Prior to the issuance of NEE’s common stock, the stock purchase contracts, if dilutive, will be reflected in NEE’ s diluted earnings per
share calcul ations using  the treasury stock method. Under this method, the number of shares of NEE common stock used in
calculating diluted earnings per share is deemed to be increased by the excess, if any, of the number of shares that would be issued
upon settlement of the stock purchase contracts over the number of shares that could be purch ased by NEE in the market, at the
average market price during the period, using the proceeds receivable upon settlement.
On February 9, 2023, NEECH sold a total of $4.0 billion principal amount of its Debentures with interest rates ranging from 4.90% to
5.25% and maturity dates ranging from 2028 to 2053.
14. Equity
Earnings Per Share  – The reconciliation of NEE's basic and diluted earnings per share attributable to NEE is as follows:
 Years Ended December 31,
 2022 2021 2020
 (millions, except per share amounts)
Numerator – net income attributable to NEE $ 4,147 $ 3,573 $ 2,919 
Denominator:    
Weighted-average number of common shares outstanding – basic 1,972.6 1,962.5 1,959.0 
Equity units, stock options, performance share awards and restricted stock 6.0 9.7 9.8 
Weighted-average number of common shares outstanding – assuming dilution 1,978.6 1,972.2 1,968.8 
Earnings per share attributable to NEE:   
Basic $ 2.10 $ 1.82 $ 1.49 
Assuming dilution $ 2.10 $ 1.81 $ 1.48 
______________________
(a)Calculated using the treasury stock method. Performance share awards are included in diluted weighted-average number of common shares outstanding based
upon what would be issued if the end of the reporting period was the end of the term of the award.
Common shares issuable pursuant to equity units, stock options and/or performance share awards, as well as restricted stock which
were not included in the denominator above due to their antidilutive effect were approxima tely 38.1 millio n, 30.5 millio n and
27.1 million for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively .
On Septemb er 14, 2020, NEE's board of directo rs approved a four-for-one split of NEE common stock effective October 26, 2020.
NEE's autho rized common stock increased from 800 million to 3.2 billion shares. All share  and share-based  data included in NEE's
consolidated financial statements reflect the ef fect of the 2020 stock split.(a)
105
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Potentially Dilutive Securities at NEP – NEP senior unsecured convertible notes, when outstanding, are potentially dilutive securities
to NEE. In December 2022, June 2021 and December 2020, NEP issued $500 million, $500 million and $600 million, respectively ,
principal amount of new senior unsecured convertible notes. Holders of these notes may convert all or a portion of the notes in
accordance with the related indenture. Upon conversion, NEP will pay cash up to the principal amount of the notes to be converted
and pay or deliver , as the case may be, cash, NEP common units or a combination of cash and common units, at NEP's election, in
respect of the remainder , if any , of NEP's conversion obligation in excess of the principal amount of the notes being converted.
Common Stock Dividend Restrictions  – NEE's charter does not limit the dividends that may be paid on its common stock. FPL's
mortgage securing FPL's first mortgage bonds contains provisions which, under certain conditions, restrict the payment of dividends
and other distributions to NEE. These restrictions do not currently limit FPL's ability to pay dividends to NEE.
Stock-Based Compensation  – Net incom e for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020 includes approximate ly $142
million, $119 million and $107 million, respectively , of compensation costs and $20 million, $19 million and $21 million, respectively ,
of income tax benefits related to stock-based compensation arrangements. Compensation cost capitalized for the years ended
December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020 was not material. At December 31, 2022, there were approximately $160 millio n of
unrecognized compensation costs related to nonvested/nonexercisable stock-based compensat ion arrangements. These costs are
expected to be recognized over a weighted-average period of 2.5 years.
At December 31, 2022, approximately 81 million  shares of common stock were authorize d for awards to officers, employees and
non-employee directors of NEE and its subsidiaries under NEE's: (a) 2021 Long Term Incen tive Plan, (b) 2017 Non-Employee
Directors Stock Plan and (c) earlier equity comp ensation plans under which shares are reserved for issuance under existing grants,
but no additional shares are available for grant under the earlier plans. NEE satisfies restricted stock and performance share awards
by issuing new shares of its common stock or by purchasing shares of its common stock in the open market. NEE satisfies stock
option exerc ises by issuing new shares of its common stock. NEE generally grants most of its stock-based compensation awards in
the first quarter of each year .
Restricted Stock and Performance Share Awards  – Restricted stock typica lly vests within three years after the date of grant and is
subject to, among other things, restrictions on transferability prior to vesting. The fair value of restricted stock is measured based
upon the closing market price of NEE common stock as of the date of grant. Performance share awards are typically payable at the
end of a three-year  performance period if the specified performance criteria are met. The fair value for the majority of performance
share award s is estimated based upon the closin g market price of NEE common stock as of the date of grant less the present value
of expected dividends, multiplied by an estimated performance multiple which is subsequently trued up based on actual
performance.
The activity in restricted stock and performance share awards for the year ended December 31, 2022 was as follows:
Shares/UnitsWeighted-
Average
Grant Date
Fair Value
Per Share/Units
Restricted Stock:
Nonvested balance, January 1, 2022 1,817,732 $ 68.09 
Granted 1,001,259 $ 75.13 
Vested (758,006)$ 58.83 
Forfeited (68,940)$ 76.65 
Nonvested balance, December 31, 2022 1,992,045 $ 77.93 
Performance Share Awards:   
Nonvested balance, January 1, 2022 1,412,149 $ 61.22 
Granted 1,597,586 $ 58.67 
Vested (1,563,850)$ 56.08 
Forfeited (308,803)$ 74.01 
Nonvested balance, December 31, 2022 1,137,082 $ 71.17 
The weighted-average grant date fair value per share of restricted stock granted for the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020
was $82.69  and $68.25  respectively . The weighted-average grant date fair value per share of performance share awards  granted for
the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020 was $ 54.82  and $ 46.09 , respectively .
The total fair value of restricted stock and performance share awards vested was $175 million, $186 million and $177 million for the
years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively .
106
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Options – Options typica lly vest within three years  after the date of grant and have a maximum term of ten years . The exercise price
of each optio n granted equals the closing marke t price of NEE common stock on the date of grant. The fair value of the options is
estimated on the date of the grant using the Black-Scholes option-pricing model and based on the following assumptions:
 2022 2021 2020
Expected volatility 17.91 – 19.37% 17.32 – 17.75% 14.63 – 16.31%
Expected dividends 2.32 – 2.50% 2.30 – 2.44% 2.50 – 2.72%
Expected term (years) 6.5 7.0 7.0
Risk-free rate 1.91 – 3.85% 0.80 – 1.27% 0.49 – 1.52%
______________________
(a)Based on historical experience.
(b)Based on historical exercise and post-vesting cancellation experience adjusted for outstanding awards.
Option activity for the year ended December 31, 2022 was as follows:
 Shares
Underlying
OptionsWeighted-
Average
Exercise
Price
Per ShareWeighted-
Average
Remaining
Contractual
Term
(years)Aggregate
Intrinsic
Value
(millions)
Balance, January 1, 2022 10,013,312  $ 44.87    
Granted 1,304,270  $ 75.28    
Exercised (594,220 )$ 23.77    
Forfeited (23,952 )$ 78.33    
Balance, December 31, 2022 10,699,410  $ 49.67  5.7 $ 363 
Exercisable, December 31, 2022 8,152,185  $ 41.28  4.8 $ 345 
The weighted-average grant date fair value of options granted was $10.49 , $9.82 and $7.08 per share for the years ended
December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively . The total intrinsic value of stock options exercised was approximately $37 million,
$49 million and $ 71 million for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively .
Cash received from option exercises was approximately $14 million, $15 million and $30 million for the years ended December 31,
2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively . The tax benefits realized from options exercised were approximately $9 million, $11 million and
$17 million for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively .
Preferred Stock  – NEE's charter author izes the issuance of 100 million shares of serial preferred stock, $0.01 par value, none  of
which are outstanding. FPL's charter authorizes the issuance of 10,414,100  shares of preferred stock, $100 par value, 5 million
shares of subordinated preferred stock, no par value, and 5 millio n shares of preferred stock, no par value, none  of which are
outstanding.(a)
(b)
107
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)  – The components of AOCI, net of tax, are as follows:
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
Net Unrealized
Gains (Losses)
on Cash Flow
HedgesNet Unrealized
Gains (Losses)
on Available for
Sale SecuritiesDefined Benefit
Pension and
Other Benefits
PlansNet Unrealized
Gains (Losses)
on Foreign
Currency
TranslationOther
Comprehensive
Income
Related to Equity
Method Investees Total
(millions)
Balances, December 31, 2019 $ (27) $ 11 $ (114) $ (42) $ 3 $(169)
Other comprehensive income before
reclassifications — 12 37 13 1 63 
Amounts reclassified from AOCI 12 (3) 2 — — 11 
Net other comprehensive income 12 9 39 13 1 74 
Less other comprehensive income
attributable to noncontrolling interests — — — (7) — (7)
Impact of disposal of a business 23 — — (13) — 10 
Balances, December 31, 2020 8 20 (75) (49) 4 (92)
Other comprehensive income (loss)
before reclassifications — (11) 95 (1) 1 84 
Amounts reclassified from AOCI 6 (4) 5 — — 7 
Net other comprehensive income (loss) 6 (15) 100 (1) 1 91 
Less other comprehensive loss
attributable to noncontrolling interests — — — 1 — 1 
Balances, December 31, 2021 14 5 25 (49) 5 — 
Other comprehensive income (loss)
before reclassifications — (84) (133) (44) 1 (260)
Amounts reclassified from AOCI 6 10 7 — — 23 
Net other comprehensive income (loss) 6 (74) (126) (44) 1 (237)
Less other comprehensive loss
attributable to noncontrolling interests — — — 19 — 19 
Balances, December 31, 2022 $ 20 $ (69) $ (101) $ (74) $ 6 $(218)
Attributable to noncontrolling interests $ — $ — $ — $ (14) $ — $ (14)
______________________
(a)Reclassified to interest expense in NEE's consolidated statements of income. See Note 3 – Income Statement Impact of Derivative Instruments.
(b)Reclassified to gains on disposal of investments and other property – net in NEE's consolidated statements of income.
(c)Reclassified to other net periodic benefit income in NEE's consolidated statements of income.
(d)Reclassified to gains on disposal of businesses/assets – net and interest expense in NEE's consolidated statements of income. See Note 3 – Income Statement
Impact of Derivative Instruments and Note 1 – Disposal of Businesses/Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests.(a) (b) (c)
(d) (d)
(a) (b) (c)
(a) (b) (c)
108
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
15. Commitments and Contingencies
Commitments  – NEE and its subsidiaries have made commitments in connection with a portion of their projected capital
expenditures. Capital expenditures at FPL include, among other things, the cost for construction of additional facilities and
equipment to meet customer demand, as well as capital improvements to and maintenance of existing facilities. At NEER, capital
expenditures include, among other things, the cost, including capitalized interest, for developme nt, construction and maintenance of
its competitive energy businesses. Also see Note 4 – Contingent Consideration and Note 6 – RNG Acquisition.
At December 31, 2022, estimated capital expenditures, on an accrual basis, for 2023 through 2027  were as follows:
2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 Total
(millions)
FPL:       
Generation:       
New $ 3,060 $ 2,315 $ 2,820 $ 3,670 $ 3,150 $ 15,015 
Existing 1,615 1,175 1,045 1,280 1,465 6,580 
Transmission and distribution 3,545 3,975 3,645 3,340 3,575 18,080 
Nuclear fuel 125 160 200 200 225 910 
General and other 675 455 515 385 525 2,555 
Total $ 9,020 $ 8,080 $ 8,225 $ 8,875 $ 8,940 $ 43,140 
NEER:
Wind $ 2,650 $ 1,095 $ 315 $ 20 $ 20 $ 4,100 
Solar 4,020 1,145 225 — — 5,390 
Other clean energy 1,175 350 55 75 45 1,700 
Nuclear, including nuclear fuel 95 215 145 260 285 1,000 
Rate-regulated transmission 170 65 45 10 10 300 
Other 765 180 95 115 60 1,215 
Total $ 8,875 $ 3,050 $ 880 $ 480 $ 420 $ 13,705 
______________________
(a)Includes AFUDC of approximately $105 million, $105 million, $90 million, $125 million and $115 million for 2023 through 2027, respectively.
(b)Includes land, generation structures, transmission interconnection and integration and licensing.
(c)Includes AFUDC of approximately $60 million, $50 million, $55 million, $30 million and $30 million for 2023 through 2027, respectively.
(d)Represents capital expenditures for which applicable internal approvals and also, if required, regulatory approvals have been received.
(e)Consists of capital expenditures for new wind projects and repowering of existing wind projects totaling approximately 2,955 MW, and related transmission.
(f)Includes capital expenditures for new solar projects (including solar plus battery storage projects) totaling approximately 6,618 MW and related transmission.
(g)Includes capital expenditures primarily for battery storage projects and renewable fuels projects.
The above estimates are subject to continuing review and adjustment and actual capital expen ditures may vary significantly from
these estimates. For example, the timing and ultimate cost associated with solar capital expenditures may vary due to supply chain
disruptions from Southeast Asian locations.
In addition to guarantee s noted in Note 8 with regards to NEP, NEECH has guaranteed or provided indemnifications or letters of
credit related to third parties, including certain obligations of investments in joint ventures accounted for under the equity method,
totaling approximately $495 million at December 31, 2022. These obligations primarily related to guaranteeing the residual value of
certain finan cing leases. Payment guarantees and related contracts with respect to unconsolida ted entities for which NEE or one of
its subsidiaries are the guarantor are recorded at fair value and are included in noncurrent other liabilities on NEE’ s consolidated
balance sheets. Management believes that the exposure associated with these guarantees is not material.
Contracts  – In additio n to the commitments made in connection with the estimated capital expenditures included in the table in
Commitments above, FPL has firm commitments under long-term contracts primarily for the transportation of natural gas with
expiration dates through 2042.
At December 31, 2022, NEER has entered into contracts with expiration dates through 2033 primarily for the purchase of wind
turbines, wind towers and solar modules and related construction and development activities, as well as for the supply of uranium,
and the conversion, enrichment and fabrication of nuclear fuel. Approximately $3.7 billion of related commitments are included in the
estimated capital expenditures table in Commitments above. In addition, NEER has contracts primarily for the transportation and
storage of natural gas with expiration dates through 2041.(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
(f)
(g)
109
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
The required capacity and/or minimum payments under contracts, including those discussed above at December 31, 2022, were
estimated as follows:
2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 Thereafter
(millions)
FPL $ 1,040 $ 970 $ 940 $ 930 $ 850 $ 8,075 
NEER $ 2,995 $ 1,145 $ 135 $ 90 $ 80 $ 510 
_______________________
(a)Includes approximately $410 million, $410 million, $405 million, $400 million, $400 million and $5,560 million in 2023 through 2027 and thereafter, respectively, of
firm commitments related to the natural gas transportation agreements with Sabal Trail and Florida Southeast Connection, LLC. The charges associated with these
agreements are recoverable through the fuel clause and totaled approximately $418 million, $419 million and $386 million for the years ended December 31, 2022,
2021 and 2020, respectively, of which $102 million, $105 million and $108 million, respectively, were eliminated in consolidation at NEE.    
(b)Excludes commitments related to equity contributions and a 20-year natural gas transportation agreement (approximately $70 million per year) with a joint venture, in
which NEER has a 32.2% equity investment, that is constructing a natural gas pipeline. These commitments are subject to the completion of construction of the
pipeline which has a very low probability of completion. See Note 4 – Nonrecurring Fair Value Measurements.
(c)Includes approximately $260 million of commitments to invest in technology and other investments through 2031. See Note 9 – Other.
(d)Includes approximately $205 million, $865 million, $5 million, $5 million, $0 million and $0 million for 2023 through 2027 and thereafter, respectively, of joint
obligations of NEECH and NEER.
Insurance  – Liability for accidents at nuclear power plants is governed by the Price-Anderson Act, which limits the liability of nuclear
reactor owners to the amount of insurance available from both private sources and an indus try retrospective payment plan. In
accordance with this Act, NEE maintains $450 million of private liability insurance per site, which is the maximum obtainable, except
at Duane Arnold which obtained an exemption from the NRC and maintains a $100 million private liability insurance limit. Each site,
except Duan e Arnold, participates in a secondary financial protection system, which provides up to $13.2 billion of liability insuran ce
coverage per incident at any nuclear reactor in the U.S. Under the secondary financial protection system, NEE is subject to
retrospective assessmen ts of up to $963 million ($550 million for FPL), plus any applicable taxes, per incident at any nuclear reactor
in the U.S., payable at a rate not to exceed $143 million ($82 million for FPL) per incident per year. NextEra Energy Resources and
FPL are contractually entitled to recover a proportionate share of such assessments from the owners of minority interests in
Seabrook and St. Lucie Unit No. 2, which approximates $16 million and $20 million, plus any applicable taxes, per incident,
respectively .
NEE participates in a nuclear insurance mutual company that provides $2.75 billion of limited insurance coverage per occurr ence
per site for property damage, decontamination and premature decommissioning risks at its nuclear plants and a sublimit of $1.5
billion for non-nuclear perils, except for Duane Arnold which has a limit of $50 million for property damage, decontamination risks
and non-nuclear perils. NEE participates in co-insurance of 10% of the first $400 million of losses per site per occurrence, except at
Duane Arno ld. The proceeds from such insuran ce, however , must first be used for reactor stabilization and site decontamination
before they can be used for plant repair . NEE also participates in an insurance program that provides limited coverage for
replacement power costs if a nuclear plant is out of service for an extended period of time because of an accident. In the event of an
accident at one of NEE' s or another participating  insured's nuclear plants, NEE could be assessed up to $158 million ($101 million
for FPL), plus any applic able taxes, in retrospective premiums in a policy year. NextEra Energy Resources and FPL are contractually
entitled to recover a proportionate share of such assessments from the owners of minority intere sts in Seabrook, Duane Arnold and
St. Lucie Unit No. 2, which approximates $ 2 million, $ 2 million and $ 4 million, plus any applicable taxes, respectively .
Due to the high cost and limited coverage available from third-party insurers, NEE does not have property insurance coverage for a
substantial portion of either its transmission and distribution property or natural gas pipeline assets. If FPL's storm restoration costs
exceed the storm reser ve, such storm restoration costs may be recovered, subject to prude nce review by the FPSC, through
surcharges approved by the FPSC or through securitization provisions pursuant to Florida law. See Note 1 – Storm Funds, Storm
Reserves and Storm Cost Recovery .
In the event  of a loss, the amount of insurance available might not be adequate to cover property damage and other expenses
incurred. Uninsured losses and other expenses,  to the extent not recovered from customers in the case of FPL, would be borne by
NEE and FPL  and could have a material adverse ef fect on NEE's and FPL's financial condition, results of operations and liquidity .
16. Segment Information
The tables below presen t information for NEE's two reportable segments, FPL, a rate-regulated utility business, and NEER, which is
comprised of competitive energy and rate-regu lated transmission businesses. Corporate and Other represents other business
activities, includes eliminating entries, and may include the net effect of rounding. Effective Janu ary 1, 2022, the previous segments
known as the FPL segment and Gulf Power are no longer separate reportable segments. See Note 1 – Basis of Presentation and
Note 6 – Merger of FPL and Gulf Power Company . Prior year amounts for FPL and Corpor ate and Other were retrospectively
adjusted to reflect this segment change. See Note 2 for information regarding NEE's and FPL's operating revenues.(a)
(b)(c)(d)
110
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
NEE's segment information is as follows:
2022
FPL NEERCorp. and
OtherNEE
Consolidated
(millions)
Operating revenues $ 17,282 $ 3,720 $ (46)$ 20,956 
Operating expenses – net $ 11,992 $ 5,140 $ 265 $ 17,397 
Gains (losses) on disposal of businesses/assets – net $ 4 $ 536 $ (18)$ 522 
Interest expense $ 768 $ 128 $ (311)$ 585 
Depreciation and amortization $ 2,695 $ 1,722 $ 86 $ 4,503 
Equity in earnings of equity method investees $ — $ 202 $ 1 $ 203 
Income tax expense (benefit) $ 947 $ (391) $ 30 $ 586 
Net income (loss) $ 3,701 $ (616) $ 161 $ 3,246 
Net loss attributable to noncontrolling interests $ — $ 901 $ — $ 901 
Net income attributable to NEE $ 3,701 $ 285 $ 161 $ 4,147 
Capital expenditures, independent power and other investments and nuclear fuel
purchases $ 9,185 $ 9,645 $ 453 $ 19,283 
Property, plant and equipment – net $ 64,693 $ 45,840 $ 526 $ 111,059 
Total assets $ 86,559 $ 70,713 $ 1,663 $ 158,935 
Investment in equity method investees $ — $ 6,572 $ 10 $ 6,582 
_________________________
(a)Interest expense allocated from NEECH to NextEra Energy Resources' subsidiaries is based on a deemed capital structure of 70% debt and differential membership
interests sold by NextEra Energy Resources' subsidiaries. Residual NEECH corporate interest expense is included in Corporate and Other.
(b)FPL's income statement line for total operating expenses – net includes gains (losses) on disposal of businesses/assets – net.
(c)Includes PTCs that were recognized based on its tax sharing agreement with NEE. See Note 1 – Income Taxes.
2021
FPL NEERCorp. and
OtherNEE
Consolidated
(millions)
Operating revenues $ 14,102 $ 3,053 $ (86)$ 17,069 
Operating expenses – net $ 9,587 $ 4,434 $ 212 $ 14,233 
Gains (losses) on disposal of businesses/assets – net $ 1 $ 78 $ (2)$ 77 
Interest expense $ 615 $ 367 $ 288 $ 1,270 
Depreciation and amortization $ 2,266 $ 1,576 $ 82 $ 3,924 
Equity in earnings of equity method investees $ — $ 666 $ — $ 666 
Income tax expense (benefit) $ 838 $ (395) $ (95)$ 348 
Net income (loss) $ 3,206 $ (147) $ (232)$ 2,827 
Net loss attributable to noncontrolling interests $ — $ 746 $ — $ 746 
Net income (loss) attributable to NEE $ 3,206 $ 599 $ (232)$ 3,573 
Capital expenditures, independent power and other investments and nuclear fuel
purchases $ 7,570 $ 8,363 $ 144 $ 16,077 
Property, plant and equipment – net $ 58,227 $ 40,900 $ 221 $ 99,348 
Total assets $ 78,067 $ 62,113 $ 732 $ 140,912 
Investment in equity method investees $ — $ 6,150 $ 9 $ 6,159 
_________________________
(a)Interest expense allocated from NEECH to NextEra Energy Resources' subsidiaries is based on a deemed capital structure of 70% debt and differential membership
interests sold by NextEra Energy Resources' subsidiaries. Residual NEECH corporate interest expense is included in Corporate and Other.
(b)FPL's income statement line for total operating expenses – net includes gains (losses) on disposal of businesses/assets – net.
(c)Includes PTCs that were recognized based on its tax sharing agreement with NEE. See Note 1 – Income Taxes.(a)
(b)
(c) (c)
(a)
(b)
(c)
111
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Concluded)
2020
FPL NEERCorp. and
OtherNEE
Consolidated
(millions)
Operating revenues $ 13,060 $ 5,046 $ (109)$ 17,997 
Operating expenses – net $ 8,940 $ 4,125 $ 169 $ 13,234 
Gains (losses) on disposal of businesses/assets – net $ — $ 363 $ (10)$ 353 
Interest expense $ 641 $ 659 $ 650 $ 1,950 
Depreciation and amortization $ 2,526 $ 1,460 $ 66 $ 4,052 
Equity in losses of equity method investees $ — $ (1,351) $ — $ (1,351)
Income tax expense (benefit) $ 678 $ (416) $ (218)$ 44 
Net income (loss) $ 2,890 $ (19) $ (502)$ 2,369 
Net loss attributable to noncontrolling interests $ — $ 550 $ — $ 550 
Net income (loss) attributable to NEE $ 2,890 $ 531 $ (502)$ 2,919 
Capital expenditures, independent power and other investments and nuclear fuel
purchases $ 7,679 $ 6,893 $ 38 $ 14,610 
Property, plant and equipment – net $ 53,879 $ 37,842 $ 82 $ 91,803 
Total assets $ 71,001 $ 55,633 $ 1,050 $ 127,684 
Investment in equity method investees $ — $ 5,713 $ 15 $ 5,728 
_________________________
(a)Interest expense allocated from NEECH to NextEra Energy Resources' subsidiaries is based on a deemed capital structure of 70% debt and differential membership
interests sold by NextEra Energy Resources' subsidiaries. Residual NEECH corporate interest expense is included in Corporate and Other.
(b)Includes PTCs that were recognized based on its tax sharing agreement with NEE. See Note 1 – Income Taxes.(a)
(b)
112
Table of Contents
Item 9.  Changes in and Disagreements With Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure
None
Item 9A.  Controls and Procedures
Disclosure Controls and Procedures
As of December 31, 2022, each of NEE and FPL had performed an evaluation, under the supervision and with the participation of its
management, including NEE's and FPL's chief executive officer and chief financial officer, of the effectiveness of the design and
operation of each compa ny's disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Rules 13a-15(e)
and 15d-15(e)). Based upon that evaluation, the chief executive officer and the chief financia l officer of each of NEE and FPL
concluded that the company's disclosure controls and procedures were ef fective as of December 31, 2022.
Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
(a) Management's Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
See Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.
(b) Attestation Report of the Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
See Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.
(c) Changes in Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
NEE and FPL are continuously seeking to impro ve the efficiency and effectiveness of their operations and of their internal
controls. This results in refinements to processes throughout NEE and FPL. However , there has been no change in NEE's
or FPL's internal control  over financial reporting (as defined in the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Rules 13a-15(f) and
15d-15(f)) that occurred during NEE's and FPL's most recent fiscal quarter that has materially  affected, or is reasonably
likely to materially af fect, NEE's or FPL's internal control over financial reporting.
Item 9B.  Other Information
None
Item 9C.  Disclosure Regarding Foreign Jurisdictions that Prevent Inspections
Not applicable
113
Table of Contents
PART III
Item 10.  Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance
The information required by this item will be included under the headings "Business of the Annual Meeting," "Information About
NextEra Energy and Management" and "Corporate Governance and Board Matters" in NEE's Proxy Statement which will be filed
with the SEC in connection with the 2023 Annual Meeting of Shareholders (NEE's Proxy Statem ent) and is incorporated herein by
reference, or is included in Item 1. Business – Information About Our Executive Of ficers.
NEE has adopted the NextEra Energy , Inc. Code of Ethics for Senior Executive and Finan cial Officers (the Senior Financial
Executive Code), which is applicable to the chief executive officer, the chief financial officer, the chief accounting officer and other
senior execu tive and financial officers. The Senio r Financial Executive Code is available under Corporate Governance in the Investor
Relations section of NEE’ s internet website at www .nexteraenergy .com. Any amendments or waivers of the Senior Financial
Executive Code which are required to be disclo sed to shareholders under SEC rules will be disclosed on the NEE website at the
address listed above.
Item 11.  Executive Compensation
The information required by this item will be included in NEE's Proxy Statement under the headings "Executive Compensation" and
"Corporate Governance and Board Matters" and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters
The information required by this item relating to security ownership of certain beneficial owners and management will be included in
NEE's Proxy Statement under the heading "Information About NextEra Energy and Management" and is incorporated herein by
reference.
Securities Authorized For Issuance Under Equity Compensation Plans
NEE's equity compensation plan information at December 31, 2022 is as follows:
Plan CategoryNumber of
securities to be
issued upon
exercise of
outstanding
options, warrants
and rights
(a)Weighted-average
exercise price of
outstanding
options, warrants
and rights
(b)Number of
securities
remaining
available for future
issuance under
equity
compensation
plans (excluding
securities reflected
in column (a))
(c)
Equity compensation plans approved by security holders 15,598,100 $ 49.67 64,026,892 
Equity compensation plans not approved by security holders — — — 
Total 15,598,100 $ 49.67 64,026,892 
______________________
(a)Includes an aggregate of 10,699,410 outstanding options, 3,163,736 unvested performance share awards (at maximum payout), 1,035,825 deferred fully vested
performance shares, 203,949 deferred stock awards and 443,238 unvested restricted stock units (including future reinvested dividends) under the NextEra Energy,
Inc. 2021 Long Term Incentive Plan and former LTIPs, and 51,942 fully vested shares deferred by directors under the NextEra Energy, Inc. 2017 Non-Employee
Directors Stock Plan, and its predecessors the FPL Group, Inc. 2007 Non-Employee Directors Stock Plan and the FPL Group, Inc. Amended and Restated Non-
Employee Directors Stock Plan.
(b)Relates to outstanding options only.
(c)Includes 62,222,683 shares under the NextEra Energy, Inc. 2021 Long Term Incentive Plan and 1,804,210 shares under the NextEra Energy, Inc. 2017 Non-
Employee Directors Stock Plan.
Item 13.  Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence
The information required by this item, to the extent applicable, will be included in NEE's Proxy Statement under the heading
"Corporate Governance and Board Matters" and is incorporated herein by reference.(a)
(a) (b) (c)
114
Table of Contents
Item 14.  Principal Accountant Fees and Services
NEE – The information requi red by this item will be included in NEE's Proxy Statement under the heading "Audit-Related Matters"
and is incorporated herein by reference.
FPL – The follow ing table presents fees billed for professional services rendered by Deloitte & Touche LLP, the member firms of
Deloitte Touche Tohmatsu, and their respective affiliates (collectively , Deloitte & Touche) for the fiscal years ended December 31,
2022 and 2021. The amounts presented below reflect allocations from NEE for FPL's portion of the fees, as well as amounts billed
directly to FPL.
 2022 2021
Audit fees $ 4,240,000 $ 3,834,000 
Audit-related fees 549,000 752,000 
Tax fees 570,000 404,000 
All other fees 180,000 57,000 
Total $ 5,539,000 $ 5,047,000 
______________________
(a)Audit fees consist of fees billed for professional services rendered for the audit of FPL's and NEE's annual consolidated financial statements for the fiscal year, the
reviews of the financial statements included in FPL's and NEE's Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q during the fiscal year and the audit of the effectiveness of internal
control over financial reporting, comfort letters, and consents.
(b)Audit-related fees consist of fees billed for assurance and related services that are reasonably related to the performance of the audit or review of FPL's and NEE's
consolidated financial statements and are not reported under audit fees. These fees primarily relate to audits of subsidiary financial statements and financial systems
pre-implementation internal control assessment.
(c)Tax fees consist of fees billed for professional services rendered for tax compliance, tax advice and tax planning. These fees primarily relate to research and
development tax credit advice and planning services.
(d)All other fees consist of fees for products and services other than the services reported under the other named categories. In 2022, these fees relate to training and
advisory services for Human Resources optimization, and in 2021, these fees relate to training and advisory services for development of a request for proposal on
financial systems implementation services.
In accordance with the requirements of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, the Audit Committee Charter and the Audit Committee's
pre-approval policy for services provided by the independent registered public accounting firm, all services performed by Deloitte &
Touche are approved in advance by the Audit Committee, except for audits of certain trust funds where the fees are paid by the trust.
Permitted services specifically identified in an appendix to the pre-approval policy are pre-approved by the Audit Committee each
year. This pre-approval allows management to request the specified permitted services on an as-needed basis during the year,
provided any such services are reviewed with the Audit Committee at its next regularly scheduled meeting. Any permitted service for
which the fee is expected to exceed $500,000, or that involves a service not listed on the pre-approval list, must be specifically
approved by the Audit Committee prior to commencement of such service. The Audit Committee has delegated to the Chair of the
committee the right to approve audit, audit-related, tax and other services, within certain limitati ons, between meetings of the Audit
Committee, provided any such decision is prese nted to the Audit Committee at its next regularly scheduled meeting. At each Audit
Committee meeting (other than meetings held to review earnings materials), the Audit Committe e reviews a schedule of services for
which Deloitte & Touche has been engaged since the prior Audit Committee meeting under existing pre-approvals and the estimated
fees for those services. In 2022 and 2021, none of the amounts presented above represent services provided to NEE or FPL by
Deloitte & Touche that were approved by the Audit Committee after services were rendered pursuant to Rule 2-01(c)(7)(i)(C) of
Regulation S-X  (which provides for a waiver of the otherwise applicable pre-approval requirement if certain conditions are met).(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
115
Table of Contents
PART IV
Item 15.  Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules
Page(s)
(a) 1. Financial Statements
Management's Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting 56
Attestation Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 57
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm (PCAOB ID 34) 58
NEE:
Consolidated Statements of Income 60
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income 61
Consolidated Balance Sheets 62
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 63
Consolidated Statements of Equity 64
FPL:
Consolidated Statements of Income 65
Consolidated Balance Sheets 66
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 67
Consolidated Statements of Common Shareholder's Equity 68
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements 69 – 112
2. Financial Statement Schedules – Schedules are omitted as not applicable or not required.
3. Exhibits (including those incorporated by reference)
Certain exhibits listed below refer to "FPL  Group" and "FPL  Group Capital," and were effective prior to the change of the
name FPL Group, Inc. to NextEra Energy , Inc., and of the name FPL Group Capital Inc to NextEra Energy Capital
Holdings, Inc., during 2010.
Exhibit
Number Description NEE FPL
*2(a) Agreement and Plan of Merger , dated as of December 18, 2020, between Gulf Power
Company and Florida Power & Light Company (filed as Exhibit 2 to Form 8-K dated
December 18, 2020 , File No. 2-27612 )x
*3(i)a Restated Articles of Incorporation of NextEra Energy, Inc. (filed as Exhibit 3(i) to Form 8-K
dated October 26, 2020, File No. 1-8841)x
*3(i)b Restated Articles of Incorporation of Florida Power & Light Company (filed as Exhibit 3(i)b
to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010, File No. 2-27612)x
*3(i)c Articles of Merger of Florida Power & Light Company and Gulf Power Company  (filed as
Exhibit 3(i)(c) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2020, File No. 2-27612)x
*3(ii)a Amended and Restated Bylaws of NextEra Energy , Inc., effective October 14, 2016 (filed
as Exhibit 3(ii)(b) to Form 8-K dated October 14, 2016, File No. 1-8841)x
*3(ii)b Amended and Restated  Bylaws of Florida Power & Light Company , as amende d through
October 17, 2008 (filed as Exhibit 3(ii)b to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30,
2008, File No. 2-27612)x
116
Table of Contents
Exhibit
Number Description NEE FPL
*4(a) Mortgage and Deed of Trust dated as of January 1, 1944, as amended, between Florida
Power & Light Company and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas, Trustee (filed as
Exhibit B-3, File No. 2-4845; Exhibit 7(a), File No. 2-7126; Exhibit 7(a), File No. 2-7523;
Exhibit 7(a), File No. 2-7990; Exhibit 7(a), File No. 2-9217; Exhibit 4(a)-5, File No. 2-10093;
Exhibit 4(c), File No. 2-11491; Exhibit 4(b)-1, File No. 2-12900; Exhibit 4(b)-1, File No. 2-
13255; Exhibit 4(b)-1, File No. 2-13705; Exhibit 4(b)-1, File No. 2-13925; Exhibit 4(b)-1,
File No. 2-15088; Exhibi t 4(b)-1, File No. 2-15677; Exhibit 4(b)-1, File No. 2-20501; Exhibit
4(b)-1, File No. 2-22104 ; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-23142; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-24195;
Exhibit 4(b)-1, File No. 2-25677; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-27612; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-
29001; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-30542; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-33038; Exhibit 2(c), File No.
2-37679; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-39006; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-41312; Exhibit 2(c), File No.
2-44234; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-46502; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-48679; Exhibit 2(c), File No.
2-49726; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-50712; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-52826; Exhibit 2(c), File No.
2-53272; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-54242; Exhibit  2(c), File No. 2-56228; Exhibits 2(c) and
2(d), File No. 2-60413; Exhibits 2(c) and 2(d), File No. 2-65701; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-
66524; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-67239; Exhibit 4(c), File No. 2-69716; Exhibit 4(c), File No.
2-70767; Exhibit 4(b), File No. 2-71542; Exhibit 4(b), File No. 2-73799; Exhibits 4(c), 4(d)
and 4(e), File No. 2-757 62; Exhibit 4(c), File No. 2-77629; Exhibit 4(c), File No. 2-79557;
Exhibit 99(a) to Post-Ef fective Amendment No. 5 to Form S-8, File No. 33-18669; Exhibit
99(a) to Post-Ef fective Amendment No. 1 to Form S-3, File No. 33-46076; Exhibit 4(b) to
Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 1995, File No. 1-3545 ; Exhibit 4(a) to Form 10-Q
for the quart er ended March 31, 1996, File No. 1-3545 ; Exhibit 4(o), File No. 333-102169 ;
Exhibit 4(k) to Post-Ef fective Amendment No. 1 to Form S-3, File No. 333-102172 ; Exhibit
4(l) to Post-Ef fective Amendment No. 2 to Form S-3, File No. 333-102172 ; Exhibit 4(m) to
Post-Ef fective Amendm ent No. 3 to Form S-3, File No. 333-102172 ; Exhibit 4(f) to
Amendment No. 1 to Form S-3, File No. 333-125275 ; Exhibit 4(y) to Post-Ef fective
Amendment No. 2 to Form S-3, File Nos. 333-116300, 333-116300-01 and 333-116300-
02; Exhibit 4(z) to Post-Ef fective Amendment No. 3 to Form S-3, File Nos. 333-116300,
333-116300-01 and 333-116300-02 ; Exhibit 4(b) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
March 31, 2006, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4(a) to Form 8-K dated April 17, 2007, File No.
2-27612 ; Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated January 16, 2008, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4(a) to
Form 8-K dated March 17, 2009, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated February 9,
2010 , File No. 2-27612; Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated December 9, 2010, File No. 2-27612 ;
Exhibit 4(a) to Form 8-K dated June 10, 2011, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K
dated December 13, 2011, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated May 15, 2012,
File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated December 20, 2012, File No. 2-27612 ;
Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated June 5, 2013, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated
May 15, 2014, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated September 10, 2014, File No.
2-27612 ; Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated November 19, 2015, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4(b) to
Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2017, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4(a) to Form
10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2018, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4(j), File Nos. 333-
226056, 333-226056-01 and 333-226056-02 ; Exhibit 4(k), File Nos. 333-226056, 333-
226056-01 and 333-226056-02 ; Exhibit 4(a) to Form 10-Q  for the quarter ended March 31,
2019, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4(f) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30,
2019, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4(e) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2020,
File No. 2-27612 ; and Exhibit 4(b) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2020,
File No. 2-27612) ; Exhibit 4(b) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2021, File
No. 2-27612;  and Exhibit 4(c) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2021, File
No. 2-27612x x
*4(b) Indenture (For Unsecured Debt Securities), dated as of November 1, 2017, between
Florida Power & Light Company and The Bank of New York Mellon (as Trustee) (filed as
Exhibit 4(a) to Form 8-K dated November 6, 2017, File No. 2-27612)x x
*4(c) Officer's Certificate of Florida Power & Light Company , dated June 15, 2018, creating the
Floating Rate Notes, Series due June 15, 2068 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated June
15, 2018, File No. 2-27612)x x
*4(d) Officer's Certificate of Florida Power & Light Company , dated November 14, 2018, creating
the Floating Rate Notes , Series due November  14, 2068 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K
dated November 14, 2018, File No. 2-27612)x x
117
Table of Contents
Exhibit
Number Description NEE FPL
*4(e) Officer's Certificate of Florida Power & Light Company , dated March 27, 2019, creating the
Floating Rate Notes, Series due March 27, 2069 (filed as Exhibit 4(b) to Form 8-K dated
March 27, 2019, File No. 2-27612)x x
*4(f) Officer's Certificate of Florida Power & Light Company , dated March 13, 2020, creating the
Floating Rate Notes, Series due March 13, 2070 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated
March 13, 2020, File No. 2-27612)x x
*4(g) Officer's Certificate of Florida Power & Light Company , dated August 24, 2020, creating the
Floating Rate Notes, Series due August 24, 2070 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated
August 24, 2020, File No. 2-27612)x x
*4(h) Officer's Certificate of Florida Power & Light Company , dated March 1, 2021, creating the
Floating Rate Notes, Series due March 1, 2071 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated March
1, 2021, File No. 2-27612)x x
*4(i) Officer's Certificate of Florida Power & Light Company , dated May 10, 2021, creating the
Floating Rate Notes, Series due May 10, 2023 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated
May 10, 2021, File No. 2-27612)x x
*4(j) Officer's Certificate of Florida Power & Light Company , dated Janua ry 14, 2022, creating
the Floating Rate Notes, Series due January 12, 2024  (filed as Exhibi t 4(l) to Form 10-K for
the year ended December 31, 2021, File No. 2-27612)x x
*4(k) Officer's Certi ficate of Florida Power & Light Company , dated June 7, 2022, creating  the
Floating Rate Notes, Series due June 15, 2072 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated June
7, 2022, F ile No . 2-27612)x x
*4(l) Indenture (For Unsecured Debt Securities), dated as of June 1, 1999, between FPL Group
Capital Inc and The Bank of New York Mellon  (as Trustee ) (filed as Exhibit 4(a) to Form 8-
K dated July 16, 1999, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(m) First Supple mental Indenture to Indenture (For Unsecured Debt Securities) dated as of
June 1, 1999, dated as of September 21, 2012, between NextEra Energy Capital Holdings,
Inc. and The Bank of New York Mellon, as Trustee (filed as Exhibit 4(e) to Form 10-Q for
the quarter ended September 30, 2012, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(n) Guarantee Agreement, dated as of June 1, 1999 , between FPL Group, Inc. (as Guarantor)
and The Bank of New York Mellon (as Guarantee Trustee) (filed as Exhibit 4(b) to Form 8-
K dated July 16, 1999, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(o) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated April 28, 2017, creating
the 3.55% Debentures, Series due May 1, 2027 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated April
28, 2017, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(p) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated April 4, 2019, creating
the 3.50% Debentures, Series due April 1, 2029 (filed as Exhibit 4(d) to Form 8-K dated
April 4, 2019, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(q) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated September 9, 2019,
creating the Series J Debentures due September 1, 2024 (filed as Exhibit 4(e) to Form 10-
Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2019, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(r) Letter , dated August 5, 2022, from NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc. to The Bank of
New York Mellon, as trustee, setting forth certain terms of the Series J Debentures due
September 1, 2024 effective August 5, 2022 (filed as Exhibit 4(b) to Form 8-K dated August
5, 2022, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(s) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated October 3, 2019,
creating the 2.75% Debentures, Series due November 1, 2029 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form
8-K dated October 3, 2019, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(t) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated February 21, 2020,
creating the Series K Debentures due March 1, 2025 (filed as Exhibit 4(c) to Form 10-Q for
the quarter ended March 31, 2020, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(u) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated May 12, 2020, creating
the 2.25% Debentures, Series due June 1, 2030 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated May
12, 2020, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(v) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated September 18, 2020,
creating the Series L Debentures due September 1, 2025 (filed as Exhibit 4(e) to Form 10-
Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2020, File No. 1-8841)x
118
Table of Contents
Exhibit
Number Description NEE FPL
*4(w) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capita l Holdings, Inc., dated March 17, 2021,
creating the 0.65% Debentures, Series due March 1, 2023 (filed as Exhibit 4(ak), File Nos.
333-254632, 333-254632-01 and 333-254632-02)x
*4(x) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capita l Holdings, Inc., dated March 17, 2021,
creating the Floating Rate Debentures, Series due March 1, 2023 (filed as Exhibit 4(al),
File Nos. 333-254632, 333-254632-01 and 333-254632-02)x
*4(y) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated June 8, 2021, creating
the 1.90% Debentures, Series due June 15, 2028 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated
June 8, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(z) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated November 3, 2021,
creating the Floating Rate Debentures, Series due November 3, 2023 (filed as Exhibit 4 to
Form 8-K dated November 3, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(aa) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated December 13, 2021,
creating the 1.875% Debentures, Series due January 15, 2027 (filed as Exhibit 4(a) to
Form 8-K dated December 13, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(bb) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated December 13, 2021,
creating the 2.440% Debentures, Series due January 15, 2032 (filed as Exhibit 4(b) to
Form 8-K dated December 13, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(cc) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated December 13, 2021,
creating the 3.000 % Debentur es, Series due January 15, 2052 (filed as Exhibit 4(c) to
Form 8-K dated December 13, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(dd) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated  March 21, 2022,
creating the 2.94% Debentures, Series due March 21, 2024 (filed as Exhibit 4(a) to Form
8-K dated March 21, 2022, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(ee) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capita l Holdings, Inc., dated March 21, 2022,
creating the Floating Rate Debentures, Series due March 21, 2024 (filed as Exhibit 4(b) to
Form 8-K dated March 21, 2022, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(ff) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capita l Holdings, Inc., dated March 24, 2022,
creating the 4.30% Debentures, Series due 2062 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated
March 24, 2022, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(gg) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated June 23, 2022,
creating the 4.20% Debentures, Series due June 20, 2024 (filed as Exhibit 4(a) to Form 8-
K dated June 23, 2022, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(hh) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated June 23, 2022,
creating the 4.45% Debentures, Series due June 20, 2025 (filed as Exhibit 4(b) to Form 8-
K dated June 23, 2022, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(ii) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated June 23, 2022,
creating the 4.625% Debentures, Series due July 15, 2027 (filed as Exhibit 4(c) to Form 8-
K dated June 23, 2022, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(jj) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated June 23, 2022,
creating the 5.00% Debe ntures, Series due July 15, 2032 (filed as Exhibit 4(d) to Form 8-K
dated June 23, 2022, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(kk) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated September 19, 2022,
creating the Series M Debentures due September 1, 2027 (filed as Exhibit 4(e) to Form 10-
Q quarter ended  September 30, 2022, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(ll) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated February 9, 2023,
creating the 4.90% Debentures, Series due February 28, 2028 (filed as Exhibit 4(a) to
Form 8-K dated February 9, 2023, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(mm) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated February 9, 2023,
creating the 5.00% Debentures, Series due February 28, 2030 (filed as Exhibit 4(b) to
Form 8-K dated February 9, 2023, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(nn) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated February 9, 2023,
creating the 5.05% Debentures, Series due February 28, 2033 (filed as Exhibit 4(c) to
Form 8-K dated February 9, 2023, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(oo) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated February 9, 2023,
creating the 5.25% Debentures, Series due February 28, 2053 (filed as Exhibit 4(d) to
Form 8-K dated February 9, 2023, File No. 1-8841)x
119
Table of Contents
Exhibit
Number Description NEE FPL
*4(pp) Indenture (For Unsecured Subordinated Debt Securities relating to Trust Securities), dated
as of March 1, 2004, among FPL Group Capital Inc, FPL Group, Inc. (as Guarantor) and
The Bank of New York Mellon (as Trustee) (filed as Exhibit 4(au) to Post-Ef fective
Amendment No. 3 to Form S-3, File Nos. 333-102173, 333-102173-01, 333-102173-02
and 333-102173-03)x
*4(qq) Indenture (For Unsecured Subordinated Debt Securities), dated as of September 1, 2006,
among FPL Group Capital Inc, FPL Group, Inc. (as Guarantor) and The Bank of New York
Mellon (as Trustee) (filed as Exhibit 4(a) to Form 8-K dated September 19, 2006, File
No. 1-8841)x
*4(rr) First Supplemental Indenture to Indenture (For Unsecured Subordinated Debt Securities)
dated as of September 1, 2006, dated as of November 19, 2012, between NextEra Energy
Capital Holdings, Inc., NextEra Energy , Inc. as Guarantor , and The Bank of New York
Mellon, as Trustee (filed as Exhibit 2 to Form 8-A dated January 16, 2013, File No. 1-
33028)x
*4(ss) Officer's Certificate of FPL Group Capital Inc and FPL Group, Inc., dated September 19,
2006, creating the Series B Enhanced Junior Subordinated Debentures due 2066 (filed as
Exhibit 4(c) to Form 8-K dated September 19, 2006, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(tt) Replacement Capital Covenant, dated Septembe r 19, 2006, by FPL Group Capital Inc and
FPL Group, Inc. relating to FPL Group Capital Inc's Series B Enhanced Junior
Subordinated Debentures due 2066 (filed as Exhibit 4(d) to Form 8-K dated September 19,
2006, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(uu) Amendment, dated November 9, 2016, to the Replacement Capital Covenant, dated
September 19, 2006, by NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc. (formerly known as FPL
Group Capit al Holdings Inc) and NextEra Energy , Inc. (formerly known as FPL Group, Inc.),
relating to FPL Group Capital Inc's Series B Enhanced Junior Subordinated Debentures
due 2066 (filed as Exhibit 4(cc) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2016, File
No. 1-8841)x
*4(vv) Officer's Certificate of FPL Group Capital Inc and FPL Group, Inc., dated June 12, 2007,
creating the Series C Junior Subordinated Debentures due 2067 (filed as Exhibit 4(a) to
Form 8-K dated June 12, 2007, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(ww) Replacement Capital Covenant, dated June 12, 2007, by FPL Group Capital Inc and FPL
Group, Inc. relating to FPL Group Capital Inc's Series C Junior Subordinated Debentures
due 2067 (filed as Exhibit 4(b) to Form 8-K dated June 12, 2007, File No. 1-8841)x  
*4(xx) Amendment, dated November 9, 2016, to the Replacement Capital Covenant, dated June
12, 2007 by NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc. (formerly known as FPL Group Capital
Holdings Inc) and NextEra Energy , Inc. (formerly known as FPL Group, Inc.), relating to
FPL Group Capital Inc's Series C Junior Subordinated Debentures due 2067 (filed as
Exhibit 4(hh) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2016, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(yy) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc. and NextEra Energy , Inc.,
dated Septe mber 29, 2017, creating the Series L Junior Subordinated Debentures due
September 29, 2057 (filed as Exhibit 4(c) to Form 8-K dated September 29, 2017, File No.
1-8841)x
*4(zz) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc. and NextEra Energy , Inc.,
dated Nove mber 2, 2017, creating the Series M Junior Subordinated Debentures due
December 1, 2077 (filed as Exhibit 4(a) to Form 8-K dated November 2, 2017, File No. 1-
8841)x
*4(aaa) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc. and NextEra Energy , Inc.,
dated Marc h 15, 2019, creating the Series N Junior Subordinated Debentures due
March 1, 2079 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated March 15, 2019, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(bbb) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc. and NextEra Energy , Inc.,
dated April 4, 2019, creating the Series O Junior Subordinated Debentures due
May 1, 2079 (filed as Exhibit 4(e) to Form 8-K dated April 4, 2019, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(ccc) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated December 14, 2021,
creating the Series P Junior Subordinated Debentures due March 15, 2082 (filed as Exhibit
4 to Form 8-K dated December 14, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(ddd) Purchase Contract Agreement, dated as of February 1, 2020, between NextEra Energy ,
Inc. and The Bank of New York Mellon, as Purchase Contract Agent (filed as Exhibit 4(a) to
Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2020, File No. 1-8841)x
120
Table of Contents
Exhibit
Number Description NEE FPL
*4(eee) Pledge Agre ement, dated as of February 1, 2020 , between NextEra Energy , Inc., Deutsche
Bank Trust Company Americas, as Collateral Agent, Custodial Agent and Securities
Intermediary , and The Bank of New York Mellon, as Purchase Contract Agent (filed as
Exhibit 4(b) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2020, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(fff) Purchase Contract Agreement, dated as of September 1, 2020, between NextEra Energy ,
Inc. and The Bank of New York Mellon, as Purchase Contract Agent (filed as Exhibit 4(c) to
Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2020, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(ggg) Pledge Agreement, dated as of September 1, 2020, between NextEra Energy , Inc.,
Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas, as Collateral Agent, Custodial Agent and
Securities Intermediary , and The Bank of New York Mellon, as Purchase Contract Agent
(filed as Exhibit 4(d) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2020, File No. 1-
8841)x
*4(hhh) Purchase Contract Agreement , dated as of September  1, 2022, between NextEra Energy ,
Inc. and The Bank of New York Mellon, as Purchase Contract Agent  (filed  as Exhibit 4(c) to
Form 10-Q for the quarter  ended September 3 0, 2022, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(iii) Pledge Agreement, dated as of September 1, 2022, between NextEra Energy , Inc.,
Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas, as Collateral Agent, Custodial Agent and
Securities Intermediary , and the Bank of New York Mellon, as Purchase Contract Agent
(filed as Exhibit 4(d) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2022, File No. 1-
8841)x
*4(jjj) Senior Note Indenture dated as of January 1, 1998, between Florida Power & Light
Company (as successor to Gulf Power Compa ny) and Computershare Trust Company ,
N.A., as Successor Trustee, and certain indentures supplemental thereto (filed as Exhibit
4.1 to Form 8-K dated June 17, 1998, File No. 0-2429 ; Exhibit 4.2 to Form 8-K dated
September 9, 2010, File No. 1-31737 ; Exhibit 4.2 to Form 8-K dated May 15, 2012, File
No. 1-31737 ; Exhibit 4.2 to Form 8-K dated June 10, 2013, File No. 1-31737 ; Exhibit 4.2 to
Form 8-K dated September 16, 2014, File No. 1-31737 ; Exhibit 4.2 to Form 8-K dated May
15, 2017, File No. 1-31737 ; and Exhibit 4(ddd) to Form 10-K for the year ended December
31, 202 0, File No. 2-27612 )x x
4(kkk) Description of Securities  Registered Pursuant to Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act
of 1934x
*10(a) FPL Group, Inc. Supplem ental Executive Retirement Plan, amended and restated effective
April 1, 1997 (SERP) (filed as Exhibit 10(a) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31,
1999, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(b) FPL Group, Inc. Supplem ental Executive Retirement Plan, amended and restated effective
January 1, 2005 (Restated SERP) (filed as Exhibit 10(b) to Form 8-K dated December 12,
2008, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(c) Amendment Number 1 to the Restated SERP  changing name to NextEra Energy , Inc.
Supplemental Executive  Retirement Plan (filed  as Exhibit 10(b) to Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended June 30, 2010, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(d) Appendix A1 (revised as of March 16, 2016) to the NextEra Energy , Inc. Supplemental
Executive Retirement Plan (filed as Exhibit 10(d) to Form 10-K dated December 31, 2017,
File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(e) Appendix A2 (revised as of October 1, 2017) to the NextEra Energy , Inc. Supplemental
Executive Retirement Plan (filed as Exhibit 10(e) to Form 10-K dated December 31, 2017,
File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(f) Supplement to the Restated SERP  relating to a special credit to certain executive officers
and other officers effective February 15, 2008 (filed as Exhibit 10(g) to Form 10-K for the
year ended December 31, 2007, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(g) NextEra Energy, Inc. (formerly known as FPL Group, Inc.) Amended and Restated Long-
Term Incentive Plan, most recently amended and restated on May 22, 2009 (filed as
Exhibit 10(a) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2009, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(h) NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan (filed as
Exhibit 10(c) to Form 8-K dated March 16, 2012, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(i) Form of Performance Share Award Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended
and Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit
10(b) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2018, File No. 1-8841)x x
121
Table of Contents
Exhibit
Number Description NEE FPL
*10(j) Form of Restricted Stock Award Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and
Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit
10(c) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2018, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(k) Form of Restricted Stock Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and
Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit
10(a) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(l) Form of Restricted Stock Unit Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and
Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit
10(b) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(m) Form of Restricted Stock Unit Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and
Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit
10(c) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(n) Form of Restricted Stock Unit Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and
Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit
10(d) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(o) Form of Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended
and Restated 2011 Long  Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit
10(f) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(p) Form of Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended
and Restated 2011 Long  Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit
10(g) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(q) Form of Non-Qualified Stock Option agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended
and Restated 2011 Long  Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit
10(d) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2018, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(r) Form of Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended
and Restated 2011 Long  Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit
10(e) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(s) Form of Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended
and Restated 2011 Long  Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit
10(f) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(t) Form of Performance Share Award Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended
and Restated 2011 Long  Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit
10(g) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(u) Form of Performance Share Award Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended
and Restated 2011 Long  Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit
10(h) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(v) NextEra Energy, Inc. 2021 Long Term Incentive Plan (filed as Exhibit 10 to Form 8-K dated
May 20, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(w) Form of Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. 2021 Long
Term Incenti ve Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(b) to Form 10‑Q for
the quarter ended June 30, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(x) Form of Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. 2021 Long
Term Incenti ve Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(b) to Form  10-Q for
the quarter ended March 31, 2022, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(y) Form of Performance Share Award Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. 2021 Long
Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(c) to Form 10-Q for
the quarter ended June 30, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(z) Form of Restricted Stock Award Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. 2021 Long
Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(d) to Form 10-Q for
the quarter ended June 30, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(aa) Form of FPL Group, Inc. Amended and Restated Long-T erm Incentive Plan Amended and
Restated Deferred Stock Award Agreement effective February 12, 2010 between FPL
Group, Inc. and James L. Robo (filed as Exhibit 10(dd) to Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2009, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(bb) Form of Deferred Stock Award Agreement under NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and
Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan (filed as Exhibit 10(a) to Form 8-K dated
March 16, 2012, File No. 1-8841)x x
122
Table of Contents
Exhibit
Number Description NEE FPL
*10(cc) NextEra Energy, Inc. 2013 Executive Annual Incentive Plan (filed as Exhibit 10(c) to Form
8-K dated October 11, 2012, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(dd) NextEra Energy, Inc. 2023 Executive Annual Incentive Plan (filed as Exhibit 10(a) to Form
8-K dated December 16, 2022, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(ee) NextEra Energy , Inc. Deferred Compensation Plan effective January 1, 2005 as amended
and restated  through February 11, 2016 (filed as Exhibit 10(h) to Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended March 31, 2016, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(f f) FPL Group, Inc. Deferre d Compensation Plan, amended and restated effective January 1,
2003 (filed as Exhibit 10(k) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2002, File No.
1-8841)x x
*10(gg) FPL Group, Inc. Execut ive Long-T erm Disability Plan effective January 1, 1995 (filed as
Exhibit 10(g) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 1995, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(hh) FPL Group, Inc. Amende d and Restated Non-Employee Directors Stock Plan, as amended
and restated  October 13, 2006 (filed as Exhibit 10(b) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
September 30, 2006, File No. 1-8841)x  
*10(ii) FPL Group, Inc. 2007 Non-Employee Directors Stock Plan (filed as Exhibit 99 to Form S-8,
File No. 333-143739)x  
*10(jj) NextEra Energy, Inc. 2017 Non-Employee Direc tors Stock Plan, as amended and restated
as of May 18, 2017 (filed  as Exhibit 10 to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2017,
File No. 1-8841)x
*10(kk) NextEra Energy , Inc. Non-Employee Director Compensation Summary effective January 1,
2021 (filed as Exhibit 10(bb) to Form 10-K for the year ended December  31, 2020, File No.
1-8841)x
*10(ll) NextEra Energy , Inc. Non-Employee Director Compensation Summary effective January 1,
2022 (filed as Exhibit 10(jj) to Form 10-K for the year ended December  31, 2021, File No.
1-8841)x
10(mm) NextEra Energy , Inc. Non-Employee Director Compensation Summary effective January 1,
2023x
*10(nn) Form of Amended and Restated Executive Retention Employment Agreement effective
December 10, 2009 between FPL Group, Inc. and each of James L. Robo and Charles E.
Sieving (filed  as Exhibit 10(nn) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009, File
No. 1-8841)x x
*10(oo) Executive Retention Employment Agreement between NextEra Energy , Inc. and Eric E.
Silagy dated  as of May 2, 2012 (filed as Exhibit 10(b) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
June 30, 2012, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(pp) Form of 2012 409A  Amendment to NextEra Energy, Inc. Executive Retention Employment
Agreement effective October 11, 2012 between NextEra Energy , Inc. and each of James L.
Robo, Eric E. Silagy and Charles E. Sieving (filed as Exhibit 10(ddd) to Form 10-K for the
year ended December 31, 2012, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(qq) Executive Retention Employment Agreement between NextEra Energy , Inc. and Deborah
H. Caplan dated as of April 23, 2013 (filed as Exhibit 10(e) to Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended June 30, 2013, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(rr) Executive Retention Employment Agreement between NextEra Energy , Inc. and Miguel
Arechabala dated as of January 1, 2014 (filed as Exhibit 10(bbb) to Form 10‑K for the year
ended December 31, 2013, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(ss) Executive Retention Employment Agreement between NextEra Energy , Inc. and John W.
Ketchum dated as of March 4, 2016 (filed as Exhibit 10(i) to Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended March 31, 2016, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(tt) Executive Retention Employment Agreement between NextEra Energy , Inc. and Rebecca
J. Kujawa dated as of March 1, 2019 (filed as Exhibit 10(b) to Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended March 31, 2019, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(uu) Executive Retention Employment Agreement between NextEra Energy , Inc. and Ronald
Reagan dated as of January 1, 2020 (filed as Exhibit 10(tt) to Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2019, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(vv) Executive Retention Employment Agreement between NextEra Energy , Inc. and Robert P.
Coffey dated  as of June 14, 2021 (filed as Exhibit 10(e) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
June 30, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x x
123
Table of Contents
Exhibit
Number Description NEE FPL
*10(ww) Executive Retention Employment Agreement between NextEra Energy , Inc. and T. Kirk
Crews II dated as of March 1, 2022 (filed as Exhibit 10 to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
September 30, 2022, File No. 1-8841)x x
10(xx) Executive Retention Employment Agreement between NextEra Energy , Inc. and Mark
Lemasney dated as of January 1, 2023x x
*10(yy) NextEra Energy , Inc. Executive Severance Bene fit Plan effective February 26, 2013 (filed
as Exhibit 10(eee) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(zz) Guarantee Agreement between FPL Group, Inc. and FPL Group Capital Inc, dated as of
October 14, 1998 (filed as Exhibit 10(y) to Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2001, File No. 1-8841)x  
*10(aaa) NextEra Energy Partners, LP 2014 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (filed as Exhibit 10.8 to Form
8-K dated July 1, 2014, File No. 1-36518)x
*10(bbb) Form of Restricted Unit Award Agreement under the NextEra Energy Partners, LP 2014
Long-T erm Incentive Plan (filed as Exhibit 10.1 to Form 10-Q for the quarter  ended  March
31, 202 1, File No. 1-36518)x
*10(ccc) Confirmation of Post-Retirement Covenants Agreement and Release, dated as of
January 23, 2023, between Eric E. Silagy and NextEra Energy , Inc. (filed as Exhibit 10 to
Form 8-K dated January 23, 2023, File No. 1-8841)x x
21 Subsidiaries of NextEra Energy , Inc. x  
22 Guaranteed Securities x
23 Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm x x
31(a) Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a) Certification of Chief Executive Of ficer of NextEra Energy , Inc. x  
31(b) Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a) Certification of Chief Financial Of ficer of NextEra Energy , Inc. x
31(c) Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a ) Certification of Chief Executive Officer of Florida Power & Light
Companyx
31(d) Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a) Certification of Chief Financial Officer of Florida Power & Light
Companyx
32(a) Section 1350 Certification of NextEra Energy , Inc. x
32(b) Section 1350 Certification of Florida Power & Light Company x
101.INS XBRL  Instan ce Document – the instance document does not appear in the Interactive Data
File because its XBRL  tags are embedded within the Inline XBRL  documentx x
101.SCH Inline XBRL  Schema Document x x
101.PRE Inline XBRL  Presentation Linkbase Document x x
101.CAL Inline XBRL  Calculation Linkbase Document x x
101.LAB Inline XBRL  Label Linkbase Document x x
101.DEF Inline XBRL  Definition Linkbase Document x x
104 Cover Page Interactive Data File (formatted as Inline XBRL  and contained in Exhibit 101) x x
______________________
* Incorporated herein by reference
NEE and FPL agree to furnish to the SEC upon request any instrument with respect to long-ter m debt that NEE and FPL have not
filed as an exhibit pursuant to the exemption provided by Item 601(b)(4)(iii)(A) of Regulation S-K.
Item 16.  Form 10-K Summary
Not applicable
124
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
NextEra Energy , Inc.
JOHN W. KETCHUM
John W. Ketchum
Chairman, President and Chief Executive Of ficer
and Director
(Principal Executive Of ficer)
Date: February 17, 2023
Pursuant to the requirem ents of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signe d below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
Signature and Title as of February 17, 2023:
TERRELL KIRK CREWS II  JAMES M. MAY
Terrell Kirk Crews II
Executive V ice President, Finance
and Chief Financial Of ficer
(Principal Financial Of ficer) James M. May
Vice President, Controller and Chief Accounting
Officer
(Principal Accounting Of ficer)
Directors:
NICOLE S. ARNABOLDI AMY B. LANE
Nicole S. Arnaboldi  Amy B. Lane
SHERRY S. BARRAT DAVID L. PORGES
Sherry S. Barrat  David L. Porges
JAMES L. CAMAREN  RUDY E. SCHUPP
James L. Camaren  Rudy E. Schupp
KENNETH B. DUNN JOHN L. SKOLDS
Kenneth B. Dunn  John L. Skolds
NAREN K. GURSAHANEY JOHN A. STALL
Naren K. Gursahaney  John A. Stall
KIRK S. HACHIGAN DARRYL L. WILSON
Kirk S. Hachigian Darryl L. Wilson
125
Table of Contents
FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
Florida Power & Light Company
ARMANDO PIMENTEL, JR.
Armando Pimentel, Jr.
President and Chief Executive Of ficer and Director
(Principal Executive Of ficer)
Date: February 17, 2023
Pursuant to the requirem ents of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signe d below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
Signature and Title as of February 17, 2023:
TERRELL KIRK CREWS II KEITH FERGUSON
Terrell Kirk Crews II
Executive V ice President, Finance
and Chief Financial Of ficer and Director
(Principal Financial Of ficer) Keith Ferguson
Controller
(Principal Accounting Of ficer)
Director:
JOHN W. KETCHUM
John W. Ketchum
Supplemental Information to be Furnished With Reports Filed Pursuant to Section 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934 by Registrants Which Have Not Registered Securities Pursuant to Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
No annual report, proxy  statement, form of proxy or other proxy soliciting material has been sent to security holders of FPL during
the period covered by this Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2022.
126
